
This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 
to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 
to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 
are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 
publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 

We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 



at |http : //books . google . com/ 



^ 



^^ 






lA 




SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



IN THE UGHT OF 



PHYSIOLOGICAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL 
AND PHYSICAL INQUIRY 



BY 

DR. ERNST MACH 

BlOEBrrUS FBOFBflSOB IN THB XTNfTXBSITT OF YlXStlA 



FROM THE GERMAN BY 

THOMAS J. MoCORMACK 

FBOrOIPAI. OF THB I.A 8AIXE-FEBU TOWNSHIP 
HIOH SCHOOL 



CHICAGO 

THE OPEN COURT PUBLISHING COMPANY 

LONDON 

KEGAN PAUL, TRENCH, TRÜBNER & CO., LTD. 

1906 



ES 



COPTBIGHT BT 

Tke Open Coubt Püblishinq Ca 

CHICAGO, U. S. A. 

1906 
All riQhts reserved. 






PREFATORY NOTE. 

The three essays constituting the present volume were 
written originally for The Monist, and appeared in that mag- 
azine in the issues for April, 1901, July, 1902, and October, 
^^g: Last year they were partly incorporated in their orig- 
inal German in Professor Mach's latest published work, Er- 
kenntniss und Irrthum: Skizzen zur Psychologie der Forsch- 
ung (Leipsic, J. A. Barth). 

In these essays Professor Mach discusses the questions of 
the nature, origin, and development of our concepts of space from 
the three points of view of the physiology and psychology of 
the senses, history, and physics, in all which departments his 
profound researches have gained for him an authoritatfve and 
commanding position. While in most works on the founda- 
tions of geometry one point of view only is emphasized, — ^be 
it that of logic, epistemology, psychology, history, or the 
formal technology of the science, — ^here light is shed upon 
the subject from all points of view combined, and the differ-, 
ent sources from which the many divergent forms that the 
science of space has historically assumed, are thus shown 
forth with a distinctness and precision that in suggestiveness 
at least leave little to be desired. 

In the belief that these essays in breadth and comprehen- 
siveness of view constitute a unique and indispensable contri- 
bution to the discussions now waging concerning the philo- 
sophical foundations of metageometry, they are herewith given 
to the public in permanent and generally accessible form. 
The methodology of both physical and formal science will 
receive from them a salutary stimulus. 

Thomas J. McCormack. 
La Salle, III., July, 1906. 



oGiOll 



CONTENTS. 



I. 



On Physiological, as Distinguished from 

Geometrical, Space ; 5 

II. 

On the Psychology and Natural Devel- 
opment OF Geometry 38 

III. 

Space and Geometry from the Point of 

View of Physical Inquiry 94 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 



ON PHYSIOLOGICAL, AS DISTINGUISHED 
FROM GEOMETRICAL, SPACE 

The Space of Vision. 

The sensible space of our immediate perception, 
which we find ready at hand on awakening to full 
consciousness, is considerably different from geo- 
metrical space. Our geometrical concepts have 
been reached for the most part by purposeful experi- 
ence. The space of the Euclidean geometry is 
everywhere and in all directions constituted alike; 
it is unbounded and it is infinite in extent. On the 
other hand, the space of sight, or "visual space," as 
it has been termed by Johannes Müller and Hering, 
is found to be neither constituted everywhere and in 
all directions alike, nor infinite in extent, nor un- 
bounded.^ The facts relating to the vision of forms, 
which I have discussed in another place, show that 
entirely different feelings are associated with "up- 
ness'' and "downness," as well as with "nearness" 
and "farness." "Rightness" and "leftness" are like- 



^ These terms are used in Biemann 's sense. 

5 



6 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

wise the expression of different feelings, although in 
this case the similarity, owing to considerations of 
physiological symmetry,^ is greater. The unlikeness 
of different directions finds its expression in the phe- 
nomena of physiological similarity. The apparent 
augmentation gf the stones at the entrance to a tun- 
nel as we rapidly approach it in a railway train, the . 
shrinkage of the same objects on the train's emerg- 
ing from the tunnel, are exceptionally distinct cases 
only of the fact of daily experience that objects in 
visual space cannot be moved about without suffer- 
ing expansion and contraction, — so that the space 
of vision resembles in this respect more the space of 
the metageometricians than it does the space of 
Euclid. 

Even familiar objects at rest exhibit the same 
peculiarities. A long cylindrical glass vessel tipped 
over the face, a walking-stick laid endwise against 
one of the eyebrows, appear strikingly conical in 
shape. The space of our vision is not only bound- 
ed, but at times it appears to have even very nar- 
row boundaries. It has been shown by an experi- 
ment of Plateau that an after-image no longer suf- 
fers appreciable diminution when projected upon a 
surface the distance of which from the eye exceeds 
thirty meters. All ingenuous people, who rely on 
direct perception, like the astronomers of antiquity, 
see the heavens approximately as a sphere, finite in 



^Analysis of the Sensations, 1886. English trans. Chicago, 
1897, p. 49 et seq. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE f 

extent. In fact, the oblateness of the celestial vault 
vertically, — a phenomenon with which even 
Ptolemy was acquainted, and which Euler has dis- 
cussed in modern times, — ^is proof that our visual 
space is of unequal extent even in different direc- 
tions. Zoth appears to have found a physiological 
explanation of this fact, closely related to the con- 
jecture of Ptolemy, in that he interprets the phe- 
nomenon as due to the elevation of the line of sight 
with respect to the head/ The narrow boundaries 
of space follow, indeed, directly from the possi- 
bility of panoramic painting. Finally, let us observe 
that visual space in its origin is in nowise metrical. 
The localities, the distances, etc., of visual space 
differ only in quality, not in quantity. What we 
term visual measurement is ultimately the upshot 
of primitive physical and metrical experiences. 

The Space of Touch. 

Likewise the skin, which is a closed surface of 
complicated geometrical form, is an agency of spa- 
tial perception. Not only do we distinguish the 
quality of the irritation, but by some sort of a 
supplementary sensation we also distinguish its 
locality. Now this supplementary sensation need 
only differ from place to place (the difference in- 



* Zoth 's researches have recently been completed by F. Hille- 
brand, "Theorie der scheinbaren Groesse bei binocularem 
Sehen" {Denkschrift der Wiener Akademie, math.-naturw. Gl. 
Bd. 72, 1906). 



8 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

creasing with the distance apart of the spots irri- 
tated) for the purely biological needs of the organ- 
ism to be satisfied. The great discrepancies that the 
space-sense of the skin presents with metrical space 
have been investigated by E. H. Weber/ The dis- 
tance apart at which the two points of a pair of 
dividers are distinctly recognizable, is from fifty to 
sixty times less oil the tip of the tongue than it is 
on the middle of the back. At different parts the 
skin shows great divergencies of spatial sensibility. 
A pair of dividers the points of which enclose the 
upper and lower lips, appears sensibly to shut when 
moved horizontally towards the side of the face 
(Fig. i). If the points of the dividers be placed 
on two adjacent finger-tips and thence carried over 
the fingers, the palm of the hand, and down the fore- 
arm, they will appear at the latter point to close 
completely (Fig. 2). (The real path of the points 
is dotted in the figure; the apparent, marked by 
lines.) The forms of bodies that touch the skin 
are indeed distinguished;^ but the spatial sense of 
the skin is nevertheless greatly inferior to that of 
the eye, although the tip of the tongue will recog- 



*'*Ueber den Raumsinn und die Empfindungskreise in der 
Haut und im Auge'' {Berichte der Kg, Sachs, Gesellsch, der 
Wissenschaften, math.-naturw. Gl. 1852, p. 85 et seq.). 

* Gare must be taken that the bodies come into intimate con- 
tact with the skin. Various objects having been placed in my 
paralyzed hand, I was unable to recognize some, and the con« 
elusion was formed that the sensibility of the skin had been 
impaired. But the conclusion was erroneous; for immediately 
after the examination, I had another person, close my hand and 
I recognized at once all objects put in it. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 



nize the circular form of the cross-section of a tube 
2 mm. in diameter. 

The space of the skin is the analogue of a two- 
dimensional, finite, unbounded and closed Rieman- 
nian space. Through the sensations induced by the 




I 



Figs. 1 and 2. 

movements of the various members of the body 
(notably the arms, the hands, and the fingers) 
something analogous to a third dimension is super- 
posed. Gradually we are led to the interpretation 
of this system of sensations by the simpler and more 
salient relations of the physical world. Thus we 



10 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. \ 

estimate with considerable exactness the thickness 
of a plate that we grasp in the dark with the fore- 
finger and thumb of our hand ; and we may do the 
same tolerably well also by touching the upper sur- 
face with the finger of one hand and the lower with | 
the finger of the other. Haptic space, or the space 
of touch, has as little in common with metric space 
as has the space of vision. Like the latter, it also 
is anisotropic and non-homogeneous. The cardinal 
directions of the organism, "forwards and back- 
wards," "upwards and downwards," "right and 
left," are in both physiological spaces alike non- 
equivalent. 

Sense of Space Dependent on Biological 
Function. 

The fact that our sense of space is not developed 
at points where it can have no biological function, 
should not be a cause of special astonishment to us. 
What purpose could it serve to be informed con- 
cerning the location of internal organs over the 
functions of which we have no control ? Thus, our 
sense of space does not extend to any great distance 
into the interior of the nostrils. We cannot tell 
whether we perceive scents introduced by one of a 
pair of pipettes, at the right or at the left. (E. H. 
Weber, loc. cit., p. 126.) On the other hand, tactual 
sensibility, in the case of the ear, according to 
Weber, extends as far as the tympanum, and enables \ 

us to determine whether the louder of two sound- 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE II 

impressions comes from the right or the left. Rough 
information as to the locality of the source of the 
sound may be effected in this manner; but it is 
inadequate for exact purposes. 

Correspondence of Physiological and Geomet- 
ric Space. 

Physiological space, thus, has but few qualities 
in common with geometric space. Both spaces 
are threefold manifoldnesses. To every point of 
geometric space. A, B, C, D, corresponds a point A', 
B', C, D' of physiological space. If C lies between 
B and D, then also will C lie between B' and D\ 
We may also say that to a continuous motion 
of a point in geometric space there corresponds 
a continuous motion of a co-ordinate point in physi- 
ological space. I have remarked elsewhere that 
this continuity, which is merely a convenient fiction, 
need not in the case of either space be an actual 
continuity. As every system of sensations, so also 
the system of space-sensations, is finite, — ^a fact 
which cannot astonish us. An endless series of sen- 
sational qualities or intensities is psychologically 
inconceivable. The other properties of visual space 
also are adapted to biological conditions. The bio- 
logical needs would not be satisfied with the pure 
relations of geometric space. **Rightness,'' **left- 
ness," "aboveness,'' "belowness,'' ''nearness," and 
*'farness," must be distinguished by a sensational 
quality. The locality of an object, and not merely 



12 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

its relation to other localities, must be known, if an 
animal is to profit by such knowledge. It is also 
advantageous that the sensational indices of visual 
objects which are near by and consequently more 
important biologically, are sharply graduated; 
whereas with the limited stock of indices at hand in 
the case of remote and less important objects econ- 
omy is practiced.. 

A Teleological Explanation. 

We shall now develop a simple general con- 
sideration, which is again essentially of a teleologi- 
cal nature. Let several distinct spots on the skin 
of a frog be successively irritated by drops of acid ; 
the frog will respond to each of the several irrita- 
tions with a specific movement of defense corre- 
sponding to the spot irritated. Qualitatively like 
stimuli affecting different elementary organs and 
entering by different paths give rise to processes 
which are propagated back to the environment of 
the animal again by different organs along different 
paths. As self-observation shows, we not only 
recognize the sameness of the irritational quality 
of a burn at whatever sensitive spot it may 
occur, but we also distinguish the spots irri- 
tated; and our conscious or unconscious move- 
ment for protection is executed accordingly. 
The same holds true for itching, tickling, pressure 
on the skin, etc. We may be permitted to assume, 
accordingly, that in all these cases there is resident 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE I3 

in the* sensation, which qualitatively is the same, 
some differentiating constituent which is due to the 
specific character of the elementary organ or spot 
irritated, or, as Hering would say, to the locality of 
the attention. Conditions resembling those which 
hold for the skin doubtless also obtain for the ex- 
tended surface of any sensory organ; although, as 
in the case of the retina, the facts are here somewhat 
more complicated. Instead of movements for pro- 
tection or flight, may appear also, conformably with 
. the quality of the irritation, movements* of attack, 
the form of which is also determined by the spot 
irritated. The snapping reflex of the frog, which 
is produced optically, and the picking of young 
chicks, may serve as examples. The perfect biologi- 
cal adaptation of large groups of connected elemen- 
tary organs among one another is thus very dis- 
tinctly expressed in the perception of space. 

All Sensation Spatial in Character. 

This natural and ingenuous view leads directly to 
the theory advanced by Prof. William James, ac- 
cording to which every sensation is in part spatial 
in character; a distinct locality, determined by the 
element irritated, being its invariable accompani- 
ment. Since generally a plurality of elements en- 
ters into play, voluminousness would also have to 

^I accept, it will be seen, in a somewhat modified and ex- 
tended form, the opinion advanced by Wlassak. Cf. his beau- 
tiful remarks, *'Ueber die statischen Functionen des Ohrlaby- 
rinths," Vierteljahrssch, f, w, Philos, XVII. 1 s. 29. 



14 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

be ascribed to sensations. In support of his hypoth- 
esis James frequently refers to Hering. This con- 
ception is, in fact, almost universally accepted for 
optical, tactual, and organic sensations. Many 
years ago, I myself characterized the relationship 
of tones of different pitch as spatial, or rather as 
analogous to spatial; and I believe that the casual 
remark of Hering, that deep tones occupy a greater 
volume than high tones, is quite apposite.* The 
highest audible notes of Koenig's rods give as a fact 
the impression of a needle-thrust, while deep tones 
appear to fill the entire head. The possibility of 
localizing sources of sound, although not absolute, 
also points to a relation between sensations of sound 
and space. In the first place, we clearly distinguish, 
in the case of high tones at least, whether the right 
or the left ear is more strongly affected. And 
although the parallel between binocular vision and 
binaural audition, which Steinhäuser^ assumes, may 
possibly not extend very far, there exists, neverthe- 
less, a certain analogy between them; and the fact 
remains that the localizing of sources of sound is 
effected preferentially by the agency of high tones^ 



* I am unable to give the reference for this remark definitely; 
it was therefore doubtless made to me orally. Germs of a sim- 
ilar view, as well as suggestions toward the modern physical 
theories of audition, are to be found even in Johannes Müller 
(Zur vergleich, Physiolog. des Gesichtssinnes, Leipsic, 1826, p. 
455 et seq.). 

"Steinhauser, Ueber binaurcays Hören, Vienna. 1877. 

"''lieber die Funktion der Ohrmuschel.*' Tröltsch, Archiv 
für Ohrenheilkunde, N. F., Band 3, S. 72. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 1 5 

(of small volume and more sharply distinguished 
locality). 

Non-Coincidence of the Physiological Spaces. 

The physiological spaces of the different senses 
embrace in general physical domains which are only 
in part coincident. Almost the entire* surface of 
the skin is accessible to the sense of touch, but only 
a part of it is visible. On the other hand, the 
sense of sight, as a telescopic sense, extends in 
general very much farther physically. We can- 
not see our internal organs, which, like the 
elementary organs of sense, we feel as existing 
in space and invest with locality only when 
their equilibrium is disturbed; and these same or- 
gans fall only partly within range of the sense of 
touch. Similarly, the determination of position in 
space by means of the ear is far more uncertain and 
is restricted to a much more limited field than that 
by the eye. Yet, loosely connected as the different 
space-sensations of the different ^enses may origin- 
ally have been, they have still entered into connec- 
tion through association, and that system which has 
the greater practical importance at the time being, 
is prepared to take the place of the other (James). 
The space-sensations of the different senses are un- 
doubtedly related, but they are certainly not identi-. 
cal. It is of little consequence whether all these 
sensations be termed space-sensations or whether 



l6 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

one species only be invested with this name and the 
others be conceived as analogues of them. 

Sensation in Its Biological Relationship. 

If sensation generally, inclusive of sensation of 
space, be conceived not as an isolated phenomenon, 
but in its biological functioning, in its biological 
relationship, the entire subject will be rendered more 
intelligible. As soon as an organ or system of or- 
gans is irritated, the appropriate movements are 
induced as reflexes. If in complicated biological 
conditions these movements be found to be evoked 
spontaneously in response to a part only of the 
original irritation, in response to some slight im- 
pulse, in response to a memory, then we .are 
obliged to assume that traces corresponding to the 
character of the irritation as well as to that of the 
irritated organs must be left behind in the memory. 
It is intelligible thus that every sensory field has its 
own memory and its own spatial order. 

The physiological spaces arc multiple manifold- 
nesses of sensation. The wealth of the manifold- 
ness must correspond to the wealth of the elements 
irritated. The more nearly elements of the same 
kind lie together, the more nearly are they akin 
embryologically, and the more nearly alike are the 
space-sensations which they produce. If A and B 
be two elementary organs, it is permissible to as- 
sume that the space-sensation produced by each of 
them is composed of two constituent parts, a and b. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE I7 

of which the one, a, diminishes the more, and the 
other, b, increases the more, the farther B is re- 
moved from A, or the more the ontogenetic rela- 
tionship oi Bto A decreases. The elements situated 
in the series AS present a continuously graduated 
onefold manifoldness of sensation. The multiplicity 
of the spatial manifoldness must be determined in 
each case by a special investigation; for the skin, 
which is a closed surface, a twofold manifoldness 
would suffice, although a multiple manifoldness is 
not excluded, and is, by reason of the varying im- 
portance of different parts of the skin, even very 
probable. 

It may be said that sensible space consists of a 
system of graduated feelings evoked by the sensory 
organs, which, while it would not exist without the 
sense-impressions arising from these organs, yet 
when aroused by the latter constitutes a sort of scale 
in which our sense-impressions are registered. Al- 
though every single feeling due to a sensory organ 
(feeling of space) is registered according to its spe- 
cific character between those next related to it, a 
plurality of excited organs is nevertheless very ad- 
vantageous for distinctness of localization, for the 
reason that the contrasts between the feelings of 
locality are enlivened in this way. Visual space, 
therefore, which ordinarily is well filled with ob- 
jects, thus affords the best means of localization. 
Localization becomes at once uncertain and fluctu- 
ant for a single bright spot on a dark background. 



l8 space and geometry. 

Origin of the Three Dimensions. 

It may be assumed that the system of space-sen- 
sations is in the main very similar, though un- 
equally developed, in all animals which, liße man, 
have three cardinal directions distinctly marked on 
their bodies. Above and below, the bodies of such 
animals are unlike, as they are also in front and be- 
hind and to the right and to the left. To the right 
and the left, these animals are apparently alike, but 
their geometrical and mechanical symmetry, which 
subserves purposes of rapid locomotion, should not 
deceive us with regard to their anatomical and phy- 
siological asymmetry. Though the latter may ap- 
pear slight, it is yet distinctly marked in the fact 
that species very closely allied to symmetrical ani- 
mals sometimes assume strikingly unsymmetrical 
forms. The asymmetry of the plaice (flatfish) is a 
familiar instance, while the externally symmetric 
form of the slug forms an instructive contrast to 
the unsymmetric shapes of some of its nearer rela- 
tives. This trinity of conspicuously marked cardi- 
nal directions might indeed be regarded as the phy- 
siological basis for our familiarity with the three di- 
mensions of geometric space. 

Biological Importance of Tactual Space. 

Visual space forms the clearest, precisest, and 
broadest system of space-sensations; but, biologi- 
cally, tactual space is perhaps more important. Irri- 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE I9 

tations of the skin are spatially registered from the 
very outset; they disengage the corresponding pro- 
tective movement; the disengaged movement then 
again induces sensations in the extended or con- 
tracted skin, in the joints, in the muscles, etc., which 
are associated with sensations of space. The first 
localizations in tactual space are presumably effected 
on the body itself; as when the palm of the hand, 
for example, is carried over the surface of the thigh, 
which also is sensitive to impressions of space. In 
this manner are experiences in the field of tactual 
space gathered. But the attempt which is frequent- 
ly made of deriving tactual space psychologically 
from such experiences, by aid of the concept of time 
and on the assumption of spaceless sensations, is an 
altogether futile one. 

Visual and Tactual Space Correlated. 

It is my opinion that the space of touch and the 
space of vision may be conceived after quite the 
same manner. This can be done (so far as I can 
infer from what has already been attempted in this 
direction) only by transferring Hering^s view of 
visual space to tactual space. This also accords 
best with general biological considerations. A 
newly-hatched chick notices a small object, looks 
toward it, and immediately pecks at it. A certain 
area in the central organ is excited by the irritation, 
and the looking movement of the muscles of the eye, 
as well as the picking movements of the head and 



20 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

neck, are forthwith automatically disengaged there- 
by. The excitation of the above-mentioned area of 
the central organ, which on the one hand is deter- 
mined by the geometric locality of the physical irri- 
tation, is on the other hand the basis of the space- 
sensation. The disengaged muscular movements 
themselves become a source of sensations in greatly 
varying degree. Whereas the sensations attending 
the movements of the eyes, in the case of man at 
least, usually disappear almost altogether, the move- 
ments of the muscles made in the performance of 
work leave behind them a powerful impression. 
The behavior of the chick is quite similar to that of 
an infant which spies a shining object and snatches 
at it. 

It will scarcely be questioned that in addition to 
optical irritations other irritations, acoustic, ther- 
mal, and gustatory in character, are also able to 
evoke movements of prehension or defense, espe- 
cially so in the case of blind people, and that to the 
same movements, the same irritated parts of the cen- 
tral organ, and therefore also the same sensation of 
space, will correspond. The irritations affecting 
blind people are, as a general thing, merely limited 
to a more restricted sphere and less sharply deter- 
mined as to locality. The system of spatial sensa- 
tions of such people must at first be rather meager 
and obscure; consider, for instance, the situa- 
tion of a blind person endeavoring to protect him- 
self from a wasp buzzing around his head. Yet edu- 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 21 

cation can do very much toward3 perfecting the 
spatial sense of Hind people, as the achievements of 
the blind geometer Saunderson clearly show. Spa- 
tial orientation must notwithstanding have been 
somewhat difficult for him, as is proved by the con- 
struction of his table, which was divided in the sim- 
plest manner into quadratic spaces. He was wont 
to insert pins into the corners and centers of these 
squares and to connect their heads by threads. His 
highly original work, however, must by reason of 
its very simplicity have been particularly easy for 
beginners to understand; thus he demonstrated the 
proposition that the volume of a pyramid is equal 
to one-third of the volume of a prism of the same 
base and height by dividing a cube into six congru- 
ent pyramids, each having a side of the cube for its 
base and its vertex in the center of the cube.* 

Tactual space exhibits the same peculiarities of 
anisotropy and of dissimilarity in the three cardinal 
directions as visual space, and differs in these pe- 
culiarities also from the geometric space of Euclid. 
On the other hand, optical and tactual space-sensa- 
tions are at many points in accord. If I stroke with 
my hand a stationary surface having upon it dis- 
tinct tangible objects, I shall feel these objects as at 
rest, just as I should feel visual objects to be when 
voluntarily causing my eyes to pass over them, al- 
though the images themselves actually move across 
the retina. On the other hand, a moving object 



^Diderot, Lettre aur les aveugles. 



22 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

appears in motion to the seeing or touching organ 
either when the latter is at rest or when it is follow- 
ing the object. Physiological symmetry and simi- 
larity find the same expression in the two domains, 
as has been elsewhere shown in detail ;^ but, however 
intimately allied they may be, the two systems of 
space-sensations cannot nevertheless be identical. 
When an object excites me in one case to look at it 
and in another to grasp it, certainly the portions of 
the central organ which are affected must be in part 
different, no matter how nearly contiguous they 
may be. If both results take place, the domain is 
naturally larger. For biological reasons, we may 
expect that the two systems readily coalesce by asso- 
ciation, and readily adapt themselves to one another, 
as is actually the case. 

Feelings of Space Involve Stimulus to 
Motion. 

But the province of the phenomena with which 
we are concerned is not yet exhausted. A chick can 
look at an object, pick at it, or even be determined 
by the stimulus presented to run to it, turn towards 
or around to it. A child that is creeping toward an 
objective point, and then some day gets up and runs 
with several steps toward it, acts likewise. We are 
under the necessity of conceiving these cases, which 
pass continuously into one another, from some simi- 
lar point of view. There must be certain parts of 



^Analysis of the Sensations, Eng. trans., p. 50 et seq. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 23 

the brain which, having been irritated in a compara- 
tively simple manner, on the one hand give rise to 
feelings of space and on the other hand, by their 
organization, produce automatic movements which 
at times may be quite complicated. The stimulus 
to extensive locomotion and change of orientation 
not only proceeds from optical excitations, but may 
also be induced, even in the case of blind animals, 
by chemical, thermal, acoustic, and galvanic excita- 
tions/ In point of fact, we also observe extensive 
movements of locomotion and orientation in animals 
that are constitutionally blind (blind worms), as 
well as in such as are blind by retrogression (moles 
and cave animals). We may accordingly conceive 
sensations of space as determined in a perfectly 
analogous manner both in animals with and in ani- 
mals without sight. 

A person watching a centipede creeping uniform- 
ly along is irresistibly impressed with the idea that 
there proceeds from some organ of the animal a 
uniform stream of stimulation which is answered 
by the motor organs of its successive segments with 
rhythmic automatic movements. Owing to the dif- 
ference of phase of the hind as compared with the 
fore segments, there is produced a longitudinal wave 
which we see propagated through the legs of the 
animal with mechanical regularity. Analogous 
phenomena cannot be wanting in the higher ani- 



*Loeb, Vergleichende Gehimphysiologie, Leipzig, 1899, paire 
108 et seq. ' «- o 



24 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

mals, and as a matter of fact do exist there. We 
have an analogous case during active or passive ro- 
tation about the vertical axis, when the irritation 
induced in the labyrinth disengages the well known 
nystagmic movements of the eyes. The organism 
adapts itself so perfectly to certain regular altera- 
tions of excitations that on the cessation of these 
alterations under certain circumstances negative 
after-images are produced. I have but to recall to 
the reader's mind the experiment of Plateau and Op- 
pel with the expanding spiral, which when brought 
to rest appears to shrink, and the corresponding re- 
sults which Dvorak produced by alterations of the 
intensity of light. Phenomena of this kind led me 
long ago to the assumption that there corresponded 
to an alteration of the stimulus u with the time t, 

du 
to a rate of alteration, -r: a special process which 

under certain circumstances might be felt and which 
is of course associated with some definite organ. 
Thus, rate of motion, within the limits within 
which the perceiving organ can adapt itself, is felt di- 
rectly ; this is therefore not only an abstract idea, as 
is the speed of the hand of a clock or of a projectile, 
but it is also a specific sensation, and furnished the 
original impulse to the formation of the idea. Thus, 
a person feels in the case of a line not only a succes- 
sion of points varying in position, but also the di- 
rection and the curvature of the line. If the inten- 
sity of illumination of a surface is given by w = 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 25 

du du 

f(x, y), then not only u but also ^ ^ and 

-— -j^ find their expression in sensation, — a cir- 
cumstance which points to a complicated relation- 
ship between the elementary organs. 

The Central Motor Organ and the Will to 
Move. 

If there actually exists, then, as in the centipede, 
an organ which on simple irritation disengages the 
complicated movements belonging to a definite kind 
of locomotion, it will be permissible to regard this 
simple irritation, provided it is conscious, as the will 
or the attention appurtenant to this locomotion and 
carrying the latter spontaneously with it. At the 
same time, it will be recognized as a need of the or- 
ganism that the effect of the locomotion should be 
felt in a correspondingly simple manner. 

Biological Necessity Paramount. 

For detailed illustration, we will revert once more 
to the consideration of visual space. The perception 
of space proceeds from a biological need, and will 
be best understood in its various details from this 
point of view. The greater distinctness and the 
greater nicety of discrimination exercised at a sin- 
gle specific spot on the retina of vertebrate animals 
is an economic device. By it, the possibility of mov- 



26 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

ing the eye in response to changes of attention is 
rendered necessary, but at the same time the dis- 
turbing effects of willed movements of the eyes on 
the sensations of space induced by objects at rest 
have to be excluded. Perception of the movement 
of an image across the retina when the retina is at 
rest, perception of the movement of an object when 
the eye is at rest, is a biological necessity. As for 
the perception of objects at rest in the unfrequent 
contingency of a movement of the eye due to some 
occurrence extrinsic to consciousness (external me- 
chanical pressure, or twitching of the muscles), this 
was unnecessary for the organism. The foregoing 
requirements are to be harmonized only on the 
assumption that the displacement of the image on 
the retina of the eye in voluntary movement is off- 
set as to spatial value by the volitional character of 
the movement. It follows from this that objects at 
rest may be made, while the eye also is at rest, to 
suffer displacement in visual space by the tendency 
to movement merely, as has been actually shown by 
experiment.^ The second offsetting factor is also 
directly indicated in this experiment. The organ- 
ism is not obliged, further, in accomplishing its 
adaptation, to take account of the second contin- 
gency mentioned, which arises only under patho- 
logical or artificial circumstances. Paradoxical as 
the conditions here involved may appear, and far 
removed as we may still be from a causal compre- 
hension of them, they are nevertheless easily under- 

^ Analysis of the Sensations. English Trans. Page 59. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 7^ 

stood when thus viewed teleologically as a con- 
nected whole. 

Sensations of Movement. 

Shut up in a cylindrical cabinet rotating about a 
vertical axis, we see and feel ourselves rotating, 
along with the cylindrical wall, in the direction in 
which the motion takes place. The impression 
made by this sensation is at first blush highly para- 
doxical, inasmuch as there exists not a vestige of a 
reason for our supposing that the rotation is a rela- 
tive one. It appears as if it would be actually pos- 
sible for us to have sensations of movement in ab- 
solute space, — a conception to which no physical 
significance can possibly be attached. But physio- 
logically the case easily admits of explanation. An 
excitation is produced in the labyrinthine canals of 
the internal ear,* and this excitation disengages, in- 
dependently of consciousness, a reflex rotary move- 
ment of the eyes in a direction opposite to that of 
the motion,^ by which the retinal images of all ob- 
jects resting against the body are displaced exactly 
as if they were rotating in the direction of the mo- 
tion. Fixing the eyes intentionally upon some such 
object, the rotation does not, as might be supposed, 
disappear. The eye's tendency to motion is then ex- 
actly counterbalanced by the introduction of a fac- 



'^ Bev^egung^em'giinäwigen, 41 et seq. Leipsic, 1875. 

•Breuer, Vorläufige Mittheilung im Anzeiger der kJc. Gesell- 
schaft der Aerete in Wien, vom 20. Nov. 1873. 



28 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

tor extrinsic to consciousness.^ We have here the 
case mentioned above, where the eye, held externally 
at rest, becomes aware of a displacement in the 
direction of its tendency to motion. But what be- 
fore appeared as a paradoxical exception is now a 
natural result of the adaptation of the organism, 
by which the animal perceives the motion of its 
own body when external objects at rest remain sta- 
tionary. Analogous adaptive results with which 
even Purkynje was in part acquainted are met with 
in the domain of the tactile sense.^ 

The eyes of an observer watching the water rush- 
ing underneath a bridge are impelled without notice- 
able effort to follow the motion of the flowing water 
and to adapt themselves to the same. If the ob- 
server will now look at the bridge, he will see both 
the latter and himself moving in a direction oppo- 
site to that of the water. Here ag^in the eye 
which fixates the bridge must be maintained at rest 
by a willed motional effort made in opposition to 
its unconsciously acquired motional tendency, and 
it now sees apparent motions to which no real mo- 
tions correspond. 

But the same phenomena which appear here para- 
doxical and singular undoubtedly serve an impor- 
tant function in the case of progressive motion or 



^Analysis of the Serisations. English Trans. Page 71. 

* Purkynje, ' ' Beiträge zur Kenntniss des Schwindels. ' ' Medi- 
zin. Jahrbücher des österreichischen Staates, VI. Wien, 1820. 
** Versuche über den Schwindel, lOth Bulletin der naturw. Sec- 
tion der schles. Gesellschaft. Breslau, 1825, s. 25. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 29 

locomotion. To the property of the visual apparatus 
referred to is due the fact that an animal in pro- 
gressive motion sees itself moving and the station- 
ary objects in its environment at rest/ Anomalies 
of this character, where a body appears to be in 
motion without moving from the spot which it 
occupies, where a body contracts without really 
growing smaller (which we are in the habit of 
calling illusions on the few rare occasions when 
we notice them) have accordingly their important 
normal and common function. 

As* the process which we term the will to turn 
round or move forward is of a very simple nature, 
so also is the result of this will characterized by 
feelings of a very simple nature. Fluent spatial 
values of certain objects, instead of stable, make 
their appearance in the domain of the tactual as well 
as the visual sense. But even where visual and 
tactual sensations are as much as possible excluded; 
unmistakable sensations of motion are produced; 
for example, a person placed in a darkened room, 
with closed eyes, on a seat affording support to the 
body on all sides, will be conscious of the slightest 
progressive or angular acceleration in the move- 
ment of his body, no matter how noiselessly and 
gently the same may be produced.^ By association, 
these sirriple sensations also are translated at once 
into the motor images of the other senses. Between 

^Analysis of the Sensations, English Trans. Pages 63, 64, 
^ Bewegungsempfindungen, Leipsic, 1875. 



30 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

this initial and terminal link of the process are sit- 
uated the various sensations of the extremities 
moved, which ordinarily enter consciousness, how- 
ever, only when obstructions intervene. 

Primary and Secondary Space. 

We have now, as I believe, gained a fair insight 
into the nature of sensations of space. The last- 
discussed species of sensations of space, which were 
denominated sensations of movement, are sharply 
distinguished from those previously investigated, by 
their uniformity and inexhaustibility. These sen- 
sations of movement make their appearance only in 
animals that are free to move about, whereas ani- 
mals that are confined to a single spot are restricted 
to the sensations of space first considered, which 
we shall designate primary sensations of space, as 
distinguished from secondary sensations (of move- 
ment). A ßxed animal possesses necessarily a 
botcnded space; Whether that space be symmetrical 
or unsymmetrical depends upon the conditions of 
symmetry of its own body. A vertebrate animal 
confined to a single spot and restricted as to orien- 
tation could construct only a bounded space which 
would be dissimilar above and below, before and 
behind, and accurately speaking also to the right 
and to the left, and which consequently would pre- 
sent a sort of analogy with the physical, properties of 
ä triclinic crystal. If the animal acquired the power 
of moving freely about, it would obtain in this way 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 3I 

in addition an inßnite physiological space; for the 
sensations of movement always admit of being pro- 
duced anew when not prevented by accidental ex- 
ternal hindrances. Untrammeled orientation, the 
interchangeability of every orientation with every 
other, invests physiological space with the property 
of equality in all directions. Progressive motion 
and the possibility of orientation in any direction 
together render space identi(!ally constituted at all 
places and in all directions. Nevertheless, we may 
remark at this juncture that the foregoing result 
has not been obtained through the operation of 
physiological factors exclusively, for the reason that 
orientation with respect to the vertical, or the di- 
rection of the acceleration of gravity, is not alto- 
gether optional in the case of any animal. Marked 
disturbances of orientation with respect to the ver- 
tical make themselves most strongly felt in the 
higher vertebrate animals by their physico-physio- 
logical results, by which they are restricted as re- 
gards both duration and magnitude. Primary space 
cannot be absolutely supplanted by secondary space, 
for the reason that it is phylogenetically and onto- 
genetically older and stronger. If primary space 
decreases in significance during motion, the sen- 
sation of movement in its turn immediately vanishes 
when the motion ceases, as does every sensation 
which 1$ not kept alive by reviviscence and contrast. 
Primary space then again enters upon its rights. It 
is doubtless unnecessary to rernark that physiological 



32 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

space is in no wise concerned with metrical rela- 
tions. 



Biological Theory of Spatial Perception. 

We have assumed that physiological space is an 
adaptive result of the interaction of the elementary 
organs, which are constrained to live together and 
are thus absolutely dependent upon co-operation, 
without which they would not exist. Of cardinal 
and greatest importance to animals are the parts 
of their own body and their relations to one an- 
other; outward bodies come into consideration only 
in so far as they stand in some way in relation 
to the parts of the animal body. The conditions 
here involved are physiological in character, — 
which does not exclude the fact that every part of 
the body continues to be a part of the physical world, 
and so subject to general physical laws, as is most 
strikingly shown by the phenomena which take 
place in the labyrinth during locomotion, or by a 
change of orientation. Geometric space embraces 
only the relations of physical bodies to one another, 
and leaves the animal body in this connection alto- 
gether out of account. 

We are aware of but one species of elements of 
consciousness: sensations. In our perceptions of 
space we are dependent on sensations. The char- 
acter of these sensations, and the organs that are 
in operation while they are felt, are matters that 
must be left undecided. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 33 

The view on which the preceding reflections are 
based is as follows : The feeling with which an ele- 
mentary organ is affected when in action, depends 
partly upon the character (or quality) of the irri- 
tation; we will call this part the sense-impression. 
A second part of the feeling, on the other hand, 
may be conceived as determined by the individuality 
of the organ, being the same for every stimulus and 
varying only from organ to organ, the degree of 
variation being inversely proportional to the onto- 
genetic relationship. This portion of the feeling 
may be called the space-sensation. Space-sensation 
can accordingly be produced only when there is 
some irritation of elementary organs; and every 
time the same organ or the same complexus of or- 
gans is irritated, every time the same concatenation 
of organs is aroused, the same space-sensation is 
evoked. We make only the same assumptions here 
with regard to the elementary organs that we should 
deem ourselves quite justified in making with re- 
spect to isolated individual animals of the same 
phylogenetic descent but different degrees of af- 
finity. 

The prospect is here opened of a phylogenetic and 
ontogenetic understanding of spatial perception ; and 
after the conditions of the case have been once thor- 
oughly elucidated, a physical and physiological ex- 
planation seems possible. I am far from thinking 
that the exjDlanation here offered is absolutely ade- 
quate or exhaustive on all sides ; but I am convinced 
that I have made some approach to the truth by it. 



34 space and geometry. 

The a Priori Theory of Space. 

Kant asserted that "one could never picture to 
oneself that space did not actually exist, although 
one might quite easily imagine that there were no 
objects in space." To-day, scarcely any one doubts 
that sensations of objects and sensations of space 
can enter consciousness only in combination with one 
another; and that, vice versa, they can leave con- 
sciousness only in combination with one another. 
And the same must hold true with regard to the con- 
cepts which correspond to these sensations. If for 
Kant space is not a "concept," but a "pure (mere?) 
intuition a priori/' modern inquirers on the other 
hand are inclined to regard space as a concept, and 
in addition as a concept which has been derived 
from experience. We cannot intuite our system of 
space-sensations per se: but we may neglect sensa- 
tions of objects as something subsidiary; and if we 
overlook what we have done, the notion may easily 
arise that we are actually concerned with a pure in- 
tuition. If our sensations of space are independent 
of the quality of the stimuli which go to produce 
them, then we may make predications concerning 
the former independently of external or physical 
experience. It is the imperishable merit of Kant 
to have called attention to this point. But this basis 
is. unquestionably inadequate to the complete deveU 
opment of a geometry, inasmuch as concepts, and in 
addition thereto concepts derived from experience, 
are also requisite to this purpose. 



physiological and metric space 35 

Physiological Influences in Geometry. 

Physiological, and particularly visual, space ap- 
pears as a distortion of geometrical space when de- 
rived from the metrical data of geometrical space. 
But the properties of continuity and threefold mani- 
foldness are preserved in such a transformation, 
and all the consequences of these* properties may be 
derived without recourse to physical experience, by 
our representative powers solely. 

Since physiological space, as a system of sensa- 
tions, is much nearer at hand than the geometric 
concepts that are based thereon, the properties of 
physiological space will be found to assert them- 
selves quite frequently in our dealings with geo- 
metric space. We distinguish near and remote 
points in our figures, those at the right from those 
at the left, those at the top from those at the bot- 
tom, entirely by physiological considerations and 
despite the fact that geometric space is not cog- 
nizant of any relation to our body, but only of re- 
lations of the points to one another. Among geo- 
metric figures, the straight line and the plane are 
especially marked out by their physiological prop- 
erties; as they are indeed the first objects of geo- 
metrical investigation. Symmetry is also distinctly 
revealed by- its physiological properties, and attracts 
thus immediately the attention of the geometer. 
It has doubtless also been efficacious in determining 
the division of space into right angles. The fact 
that similitude was investigated previously to other 



36 SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

geometric affinities likewise is due to physiological 
facts. The Cartesian geometry of co-ordinates in a 
manner liberated geometry from physiological in- 
fluences, yet vestiges of their thrall still remain in 
the distinction of positive and negative co-ordinates, 
according as these are reckoned to the right or to 
the left, upward or downward, and so on. This is 
convenient, but not necessary. A fourth co-ordinate 
plane, or the determination of a point by its dis- 
tances from four fundamental points not lying in 
the same plane, exempts geometric space from the 
necessity of constantly recurring to physiological 
space. The necessity of such restrictions as 
"around to the right'* and "around to the left," and 
the distinction of symmetrical figures by these 
means would then be eliminated. The historical in- 
fluences of physiological space on the development 
of the concepts of geometric space are, of course, not 
to be eliminated. 

Also in other provinces, as in physics, the influ- 
ence of the properties of physiological space is 
traceable, and not alone in geometry. Even sec- 
ondary physiological space is considerably different 
from Euclidean space, owing to the fact that the 
distinction between "above" and "below" does not 
absolutely disappear in the former. Sosikles of 
Corinth (Herodotus v. 92) asseverated that "sooner 
should the heavens be beneath the earth and the 
earth soar in the air above the heavens, than that 
the Spartans should lose their freedom." And his 
assertion, together with the tirades of Lactantius 



PHYSIOLOGICAL AND METRIC SPACE 37 

(De falsa sapientia, c. 24) and St. Augustine (De 
civitate dei, XVIL, 9), against the doctrine of the 
antipodes, against men hanging with inverted heads 
and trees growing downward, — considerations 
which even after centuries touch in us a sympathetic 
chord, — all had their good physiological grounds, 
We have, in fact less reason to be astpnished at 
the narrow-mindedness of these opponents of the 
doctrine of the antipodes than we have to be filled 
with admiration for the great powers of abstrac- 
tion exhibited by Archytas of Tarentum and Aris- 
tarchus of Samos. 



ON THE PSYCHOLOGY AND NATURAL 
DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY. 

For the' animal organism, the relations of the dif- 
ferent parts of its own body to one another, and of 
physical objects to these different parts, are primarily 
of the greatest importance. Upon these relations is 
based its system of physiological sensations of space. 
More complicated conditions of life, in which the 
simple and direct satisfaction of needs is impossible, 
result in an augmentation of intelligence. The 
physical, and particularly the spatial, behavior of 
bodies toward one another may then acquire a medi- 
ate and indirect interest far transcending our inter- 
est in our momentary sensations. In this way, a 
spatial image of the world is created, at first in- 
stinctively, then in the practical arts, and finally 
scientifically, in the form of geometry. The mutual 
relations of bodies are geometrical in so far as they 
are determined by sensations of space, or find their 
expression in such sensations. Just as without sen- 
sations of heat there would have been no theory of 
heat, so also without sensations of space th!ere 
would be no geometry ; but both the theory of heat 
and the theory of geometry stand additionally in 
need of experiences concerning bodies; that is to 
say, both must pursue their inquiries beyond the 

38 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 39 

narrow boundaries of the domains of sense that con- 
stitute their peculiar foundation. 

The Role of Bodies. 

Isolated sensations have independent significance 
only in the lowest stages of animal life; as, for ex- 
ample, in reflex motions, in the removal of some dis- 
agreeable irritation of the skin, in the snapping re- 
flex of the frog, etc. In the higher stages, attention 
is directed, not to space-sensation alone, but to those 
intricate and intimate complexes of other sensations 
with space-sensations which we call bodies. Bodies 
arouse our interest ; they are the objects of our activi- 
ties. But the character of our activities is coinci- 
dently determined by the place of the body, whether 
near or far, whether above or below, etc.,-^-in other 
words, by the space-sensations characterizing that 
body. The mode of reaction is thus determined by 
which the body can be reached, whether by extend- 
ing the arms, by taking few or many steps, by 
hurling missiles, or what not. The quantity of sen- 
sitive elements which a body excites, the number of 
places which it covers, that is to say, the volume of 
the body, is, all other things being the same, pro- 
portional to its capacity for satisfying our needs, 
and possesses a consequent biological import. Al- 
though our sensations of sight and touch are pri- 
marily produced only by the surfaces of bodies, nev- 
ertheless powerful associations impel especially prim- 
itive man to imagine more, or, as he thinks, to per- 



40 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

ceive more, than he actually observes. He imagines 
to be filled with matter the places enclosed by the 
surface which alone he perceives; and this is espe- 
cially the case when he sees or seizes bodies with 
which he is in some measure familiar. It requires 
considerable power of abstraction to bring to con- 
sciousness the fact that we perceive the surfaces 
only of bodies, — a power which cannot be ascribed 
to primitive man. 

Of importance in this regard are also the peculiar 
distinctive shapes of objects of prey and utility. 
Certain definite forms, that is, certain specific com- 
binations of space-sensations, which man learns to 
know through intercourse with his environment, 
are unequivocally characterized even by purely phy- 
siological features. The straight line and the plane 
are distinguished from all other forms by their 
physiological simplicity, as are likewise the circle 
and the sphere. The affinity of symmetric and 
geometrically similar forms is revealed by purely 
physiological properties. The variety of shapes with 
which we are acquainted from our physiological ex- 
perience is far from being inconsiderable. Finally, 
through employment with bodily objects, physical 
experience also contributes its quota of wealth to the 
general store. 

The Notion of Constancy. 
Crude physical experience impels us to attribute 
to bodies a certain constancy. Unless there are spe- 
cial reasons for not doing so, the same constancy is 



PSYCHOLCXSY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 4I 

also ascribed to the individual attributes of the com- 
plexus **body'' ;* thus we also regard the color, hard- 
ness, shape, etc.,- of the body as constant; and par- 
ticularly we look upon the body as constant with 
respect to space, as indestructible. This assump- 
tion of spatial constancy, of spatial substantiality, 
finds its direct expression in geometry. Our physi- 
ological and psychological organization is independ- 
ently predisposed to emphasize constancy; for gen- 
eral physical constancies must necessarily have found 
lodgment in our organization, which is itself phys- 
ical, while in the adaptation of the species very defi- 
nite physical constancies were at work. Inasmuch 
as tnemory revives the images of bodies, before per- 
ceived, in their original forms and dimensions, it 
supplies the condition for the recognition of the 
same bodies, thus furnishing the first foundation 
for the impression of constancy. But geometry is 
additionally in need of certain individual experi- 
ences. 

Let a body K move away from an observer A by 
being suddenly transported from the environment 
FGH to the environment MNO. To the optical 
observer A the body K decreases in size and assumes 
generally a different form. But to an optical ob- 
server B, who moves along with K and who always 
retains the same position with respect to K, K re- 
mains unaltered. An analogous sensation is ex- 
perienced by the tactual observer, although the per- 



* See my Analysis of the Sensations, introductory chapter. 



42 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

spective diminution is here wanting for the reason 
that the sense of touch is not a telepathic sense. The 
experiences of A and B must now be harmonized 
and their contradictions eliminated, — a requirement 
which becomes especially imperative when the same 
observer plays alternately the parts of A and of B. 
And the only method by which they can be har- 
monized is, to attribute to K certain constant spatial 
properties independently of its position with respect 
to other bodies. The space-sensations determined 
by K in the observer A are recognized as dependent 
on other space-sensations (the position of K with 
respect to the body of the observer A). But these 
same space-sensations determined hy K m A are 
independent of other space-sensations, characteriz- 
ing the position of K with respect to B, or with re- 
spect to FGH . . .MNO. In this independence lies 
the constancy with which we are here concerned. 
The fundamental assumption of geometry thus 
reposes on an experience, although on one of an 
idealized kind. 

The Notion of Rigidity. 
In order that the experience in question may as- 
sume palpable and perfectly determinate form, the 
body K must be a so-called rigid body. If the space- 
sensations associated with three distinct acts of 
sense-perception remain unaltered, then the condi- 
tion is given for the invariability of the entire com- 
plexus of space-sensations determined by a rigid 
body. This determination of the space-sensations 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 43 

produced by a body by means of three space-sensa- 
tional elements accordingly characterizes the rigid 
body, from the point of view of the physiology of 
the senses. And this holds good for both the visual 
and the tactual sense. In so doing we are not think- 
ing of the physical conditions of rigidity (in de- 
fining which we should be compelled .to enter dif- 
ferent sensory domains), but merely of the fact 
given to our spatial sense. Indeed, we are now re- 
garding every body as rigid which possesses the 
property assigned, even liquids, so long as their 
parts are not in motion with respect to one another. 

Physical Origin of Geometry. 
Correct as the oft-repeated asseveration is that 
geometry is concerned, not with physical, but with 
ideal objects, it nevertheless cannot be doubted that 
geometry has sprung from the interest centering in 
the spatial relations of physical bodies. It bears the 
distinctest marks of this origin, and the course of its 
development is fully intelligible only on a considera- 
tion of this fact. Our knowledge of the spatial 
behavior of bodies is based upon a comparison of 
the space-sensations produced by them. With- 
out the least artificial or scientific assistance we ac- 
quire abundant experience of space. We can judge 
approximately whether rigid bodies which we per- 
ceive alongside one another in different positions at 
different distances, will, when brought successively 
into the same position, produce approximately the 
same or dissimilar space-sensations. We know 



44 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

fairly well whether one body will coincide with 
another, — ^whether a pole lying flat on the ground 
will reach to a certain height. Our sensations of 
space are, however, subject to physiological cir- 
cumstances, which can never be absolutely identical 
for the members compared, • In every case, rigor- 
ously viewed, a memory-trace of a sensation is nec- 
essarily compared with a real sensation. If, there- 
fore, it is a question of the exact spatial relation- 
ship of bodies to one another, we must provide jchar- 
acteristics that depend as little as possible on physi- 
ological conditions, which are so difficult to control. 

Measurement. 
This is accomplished by comparing bodies with 
bodies. Whether a body A coincides with another 
body By whether it can be made to occupy exactly 
the space filled by the other — ^that is, whether under 
like circumstances both bodies produce the same 
space-sensations— can be estimated with great pre- 
cision. We regard such bodies as spatially or geo- 
metrically equal in every respect, — as congruent. 
The character of the sensations is here no longer 
authoritative; it is now solely a question of their 
equality or inequality. If both bodies are rigid 
bodies, we can apply ,to the second body B all the 
experiences which we have gathered in connection 
with the first, more convenient, and more easily 
transportable, standard body A, We shall revert 
later to the circumstance that it is neither necessary 
nor possible to employ a special body of comparison, 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 45 

or Standard, for every body. The most convenient 
bodies of comparison, though applicable only after 
a crude fashion, — ^bodies whose invariance during 
transportation we always have before our eyes, — 
are our hands and feet, our arms and legs. The 
names of the oldest measures show distinctly that 
originally we made our measurements with hands'- 
breadths, forearms (ells), feet (paces), etc. Noth- 
ing but a period of greater exactitude in measure- 
ment began with the introduction of conventional 
and carefully preserved physical standards; the 
principle remains the same. The measure enables 
us to compare bodies which are difficult to move or 
are practically immovable. 

The Role of Volume. 

As has been remarked, it is not the spatial, but 
predominantly the material, properties of bodies that 
possess the strongest interest. This fact certainly 
finds expression even in the beginnings of geometry. 
The volume of a body is instinctively taken into ac- 
count as representing the quantity of its material 
properties, and so comes to form an object of corir- 
tcntion long before its geometric properties receive 
anything approaching to profound consideration. It 
is here, however, that the comparison, the measure- 
ment of volumes acquires its initial import, and 
thus takes its place among the first and most im- 
portant problems of primitive geometry. 

The first measurements of volume were doubtless 
of liquids and fruit, and were made with hollow 



46 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

measures. The object was to ascertain conveniently 
the quantity of like matter, or the quantity (number) 
of homogeneous, similarly shaped (identical) bod- 
ies. Thus, conversely, the capacity of a store-room 
(granary) was in all likelihood originally estimated 
by the quantity or number of homogeneous bodies 
which it was capable of containing. The measure- 
ment of volume by a unit of volume is in all prob- 
ability a much later conception, and can only have 
developed on a higher stage of abstraction. Esti- 
mates of areas were also doubtless made from the 
number of fruit-bearing or useful plants which a 
field would accommodate, or from the quantity of 
seed that could be sown on it ; or possibly also from 
the labor which such work required. 

Measurement of Surfaces. 

The measurement of a surface by a surface was 
readily and obviously suggested in this connection 
when fields of the same size and shape lay near one 
another. There one could scarcely doubt that the 
field made up of n fields of the same size and form 
possessed also «-fold agricultural value. We shall 
not be inclined to underrate the significance of this 
intellectual step when we consider the errors in the 
measurement of areas which the E^ptians* and 
even the Roman agrimensores^ commonly com- 
mitted. 



*Eisenlohr, Ein mathematisches Handbuch der alten Aegyp- 
ter: Papyrus Bhind, Leipsic, 1877. 
*M. Cantor, Die römischen Agrimensoren, Leipsic, 1875. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 47 

Even with a people so splendidly endowed with 
geometrical talent as the Greeks, and in so late a 
period, we meet with the sporadic expression of the 
idea that surfaces having equal perimeters are 
equal in area.* When the Persian "Overman," 
Xerxes,^ wished to count the army which was his to 
destroy, and which he drove under the lash across 
the Hellespont against the Greeks, he adopted the 
following procedure. Ten thousand men were 
drawn up closely packed together. The area which 
they covered was surrounded with an enclosure, and 
each successive division of the army, or rather, each 
successive herd of slaves, that was driven into and 
filled the pen, counted for another ten thousand. We 
meet here with the converse application of the idea 
by which a surface is measured by the quantity 
(number) of equal, identical, immediately adjacent 
bodies which cover it. In abstracting, first instinc- 
tively and then consciously, from the height of these 
bodies, the transition is made to measuring surfaces 
by means of a unit of surface. The analogous step 
to measuring volumes by volume demands a far 
more practiced, geometrically disciplined intuition. 
It is effected later, and is even at this day less easy 
to the masses. 

All Measurement by Bodies. 
The oldest estimates of long distances, which were 
computed by days' journeys, hours of travel, etc., 

»Thucydides, VI., 1. 

«Herodotus, VTL, 22, 56, 103, 223. 



48 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

were based doubtless upon the effort, labor, and ex- 
penditure of time necessary for covering these dis- 
tances. But when lengths are measured by the re- 
peated application of the hand, the foot, the arm, 
the rod, or the chain, then, accurately viewed, the 
measurement is made by the enumeration of like 
bodies, and we have again really a measurement 
by volume. The singularity of this conception will 
disappear in the course of this exposition. If, now, 
we abstract, first instinctively and then consciously, 
from the two transverse dimensions of the bodies 
employed in the enumeration, we reach the meas- 
uring of a line by a line. 

A surface is commonly defined as the boundary 
of a space. Thus, the surface of a metal sphere 
is the boundary between the metal and the air; it 
is not part either of the metal or of the air; two 
dimensions only are ascribed to it. Analogously, 
the one-dimensional line is the boundary of a sur- 
face; for example^ the equator is the boundary of 
the surface of a hemisphere. The dimensionless 
point is the boundary of a line ; for example, of the 
arc of a circle. A point, by its motion, generates a 
one-dimensional line, a line a two-dimensional sur- 
face, and a surface a three-dimensional solid space. 
No difficulties are presented by this concept to minds 
at all skilled in abstraction. It suffers, however, 
from the drawback that it does not exhibit, but on 
the contrary artificially conceals, the natural and 
actual way in which the abstractions have been 
reached. A certain discomfort is therefore felt 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 49 

when the attempt is made from this point of view 
to define the measure of surface or unit of area 
after the measurement of lengths has been dis- 
cussed.* 

A more homogeneous conception is reached if 
every measurement be regarded as a counting of 
space by means of immediately adjacent, spatially 
identical, or at least hypothetically identical, bodies, 
whether we be concerned with volumes, with sur- 
faces, or with lines. Surfaces may be regarded as 
corporeal sheets, having everywhere th^ same con- 
stant thickness which we may make small at will, 
vanishingly small; lines, as strings or threads of 
constant, vanishingly small thickness. A point then 
becomes a small corporeal space from the extension 
of which we purposely abstract, whether it be part 
of another space, of a surface, or of a line. The 
bodies employed in the enumeration may be of any 
smallness or any form which conforms to our needs. 
Nothing prevents our idealizing in the usual manner 
these images, reached in the natural way indicated, 
by simply leaving out of account the thickness of 
the sheets and the threads. 

The usual and somewhat timid mode of present- 
ing the fundamental notions of geometry is doubt- 
less due to the fact that the infinitesimal method 
which freed mathematics from the historical and 
accidental shackles of its early elementary form, did 



* Holder, Anschauung und Benlcen in der Geometrie, Leipsic, 
1900, p. 18. W. Killing, Einführung in die Grundieren der 
Geometrie, Paderborn, 1898, II., p. 22 et seq. 



50 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

not begin to influence geometry until a later period 
of development, and that the frank and natural 
alliance of geometry with the physical sciences was 
not restored until still later, through Gauss. But 
why the elements shall not now partake of the 
advantages of our better insight, is not to be clearly 
seen. Even Leibnitz adverted to the fact that it 
would be more rational to begin with the solid in 
our geometrical definitions.* 

Method of Indivisibles. 

The measurement of spaces, surfaces, and lines by 
means of solids is a conception from which our re- 
fined geometrical methods have become entirely 
estranged. Yet this idea is not merely the forerun- 
ner of the present idealized methods, but it plays 
an important part in the psychology of geometry, 
and we find it still powerfully active at a late period 
of development in the workshop of the investigators 
and inventors in this domain. 

Cavalieri's Method of Indivisibles appears best 
comprehensible through this idea. Taking his own 
illustration, let us consider the surfaces to be com- 
pared (the quadratures) as covered with equidis- 
tant parallel threads of any number we will, after 
the manner of the warp of woven fabrics, and the 
spaces to be compared (the cubatures) as filled with 
parallel sheets of paper. The total length of the 



* Letter to Vitale Giordano, Leibnigens mathematische Schrif- 
ten, edited by Gerhardt, Section I., Vol. I., page 199. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOi'MENT OF GEOMETRY 51 

threads may then serve as measure of the surfaces, 
and the total area of the sheets as measure of the 
volumes, and the accuracy of the measurement may 
be carried to any point we wish. The number of 
like equidistant bodies, if close enough together and 
of the right form, can just as well furnish the nu- 
merical measures of surfaces and solid spaces as 
the number of identical bodies absolutely covering 
the surfaces or absolutely filling the spaces. If we 
cause these bodies to shrink until they become lines 
(straight lines) or until they become surfaces 
(planes), we shall obtain the division of surfaces 
into surface-elements and of spaces into space-ele- 
ments, and coincidently the customary measure- 
ment of surfaces by surfaces and of spaces by spaces. 
Cavalieri's defective exposition, which was not 
adapted to the state of the geometry of his time, has 
evoked from the historians of geometry some very 
harsh criticisms of his beautiful and prolific proce- 
dure.* The fact that a Holmholtz, his critical judg- 
ment yielding in an unguarded moment to his fancy, 
could, in his great youthful work,^ regard a surface 
as the sum of the lines (ordinates) contained in it, 
is merely proof of the great depth to which this orig- 
inal, natural conception reaches, and of the facility 
with which it reasserts itself. 



^ Weissenborn, Prindpien der höheren Analysis in ihrer 
Entwickelung. Halle, 1856. Gerhardt, Entdeckung der Ana- 
lysis, Halle, 1855, p. 18. Cantor, Geschichte der Mathematik, 
Leipsic, 1892, II. Bd. 

* Helmholtz, Erhaltung der Kraft. Berlin, 1847, p. 14. 



52 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



The following simple illustration of Cavalieri's 
method may be helpful to readers not thoroughly 
conversant with geometry. Imagine a right circu- 
lar cylinder of horizontal base cut out of a stack of 
paper sheets resting on a table and conceive in- 
scribed in the cylinder a cone of the same base and 
altitude. While the sheets cut out by the cylinder 
are all equal, those forming the cone increase in size 
as the squares of their distances from the vertex. 
Now from elementary geometry we know that the 






Fig. 8. 

volume of such a cone is one-third that of the cylin- 
der. This result may be applied at once to the quadra- 
ture of the parabola (Fig. 3). Let a rectangle be 
described about a portion of a parabola, its sides co- 
inciding with the axis and the tangent to the curve 
at the origin. Conceiving the rectangle to be covered 
with a system of threads running parallel to y, every 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 53 

thread of the rectangle will be divided into two parts, 
of which that lying outside the parabola is propor- 
tional to x^. Therefore, the area outside the para- 
bola is to the total area of the rectangle precisely as 
is the volume of the cone to that of the cylinder, 
viz., as I is to 3. 

It is significant of the naturalness of Cavalieri's 
view that the writer of these lines, hearing of the 
higher geometry when a student at the Gymnasium, 
but without any training in it, lighted on very simi- 
lar conceptions, — a performance not attended with 
any difficulty in the nineteenth century. By the aid 
of these he made a number of little discoveries, which 
were of course already long known, found Guldin's 
theorem, calculated some of Kepler's solids of rota- 
tion, etc. 

Practical Origin of Geometry. 

We have then, first, the general experience that 
movable bodies exist, to which, in spite of their mo- 
bility, a certain spatial constancy in the sense above 
described, a permanently identical property, must be 
attributed, — a property which constitutes the 
foundation of all notions of measurement. But in 
addition to this there has been gathered instinctively, 
in the pursuit of the trades and the arts, a consid- 
erable variety of special experiences, which have 
contributed their share to the development of geom- 
etry. Appearing in part in unexpected form, in 
part harmonizing with one another, and sometimes, 



54 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

when incautiously applied, even becoming involved 
in what appears to be paradoxical contradictions, 
these experiences disturb the course of thought and 
incite it to the pursuit of the orderly logical connec- 
tion of these experiences. We shall now devote our 
attention to some of these processes. 

Even though the well known statement of Hero- 
dotus^ were wanting, in which he ascribes the origin 
of geometry to land-surveying among the Egyp- 
tians ; and even though the account were totally lost^ 
which Eudemus has left regarding the early history 
of geometry, and which is known to us from an ex- 
tract in Proclus, it would be impossible for us to 
doubt that a pre-scientific period of geometry ex- 
isted. The first geometrical knowledge was ac- 
quired accidentally and without design by way of 
practical experience, and in connection with the most 
varied employments. It was gained at a time when 
the scientific spirit, or interest in the interconnection 
of the experiences in question, was but little devel- 
oped. This is plain even in our meager history of 
the beginnings of geometry, but still more so in the 
history of primitive civilization at large, where tech- 
nical geometrical appliances are known to have ex- 
isted at so early and barbaric a day as to exclude 
absolutely the assumption of scientific effort. 

All savage tribes practice the art of weaving, and 
here, as in their drawing, painting, and wood-cut- 

^ Herodotus, IL, 109. 

* James Gow, A Short History of Greek Mathematics, Cam- 
bridge, 1884, p. 134. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 55 

ting, the ornamental themes employed consist of the 
simplest geometrical forms. For such forms, like 
the drawings of our children, correspond best to 
their simplified, typical, schematic conception of the 
objects which they are desirous of representing and 




Fig. 4. 

it is also these forms that are most easily produced 
with their primitive implements and lack of manual 
dexterity. Such an ornament consisting of a series 
of similarly shaped triangles alternately inverted, or 
of a series of parallelograms (Fig. 4), clearly sug- 
gests the idea, that the sum of the three angles of a 
triangle, when their vertices are placed together, 
makes up two right angles. Also this fact could 
not possibly have escaped the clay and stone work- 
ers of Assyria, Egypt, Greece, etc., in constructing 
their mosaics and pavements from differently col- 
ored stones of the same shape. The theorem of the 
Pythagoreans that the plane space about a point 
can be completely filled by only three regular poly- 
gons, viz., by six equilateral triangles, by four 
squares, and by three regular hexagons, points to 
the same source.* A like origin of this truth is re- 
vealed also in the early Greek method of demonstrat- 

* This theorem is attributed to the Pythagoreans by Produs, 
Cf. Gow, A Short History of Greek Mathematics, p. 143, foot- 
note. 



56 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

ing the theorem regarding the angle-sum of any 
triangle by dividing it (by drawing the altitude) 
into two right-angled triangles and completing the 
rectangles corresponding to the parts so obtained.* 
The same experiences arise on many other occa- 
sions. If a surveyor walk round a polygonal piece 
of land, he will observe, on arriving at the starting 




Fig. 6. 

point, that he has performed a complete revolution, 
consisting of four right angles. In the case of a 
triangle, accordingly, of the six right angles con- 
stituting the interior and exterior angles (Fig. 5) 
there will remain, after subtracting the three ex- 
terior angles of revolution, a> b, c, two right angles 
as the sum of the interior angles. This deduction 
of the theorem was employed by Thibaut,^ a con- 



* Hankel, Geschichte der Mathematik, Leipsic, 1874, p. 96. 

^Thibaut, Chrundriss der reinen Mathematik ^ Göttingen, 1809, 
p. 177. The objections which may be raised to this and the 
following deductions will be considered later. [The same proof 
is also given by Playfair (1813). See Halsted's translation of 
Bolyai's Science Absolute of Space, p. 67. — Tr.] 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY <ff 

temporary of Gauss. If a draughtsman draw a tri- 
angle by successively turning his ruler round the in- 
terior angles, always in the same direction (Fig. 6), 
he will find on reaching the first side again that if the 
edge of his ruler lay toward the outside of the tri- 
angle on starting, it will now lie toward the inside. 
In this procedure the ruler has swept out the in- 



Fig. e. 

terior angles of the triangle in the same direction, 
and in doing so has performed half a revolution.^ 
Tylor* remarks that cloth or paper- folding may have 
led to the same results. If we fold a triangular 
piece of paper in the manner shown in Fig. 7, we 
shall obtain a double rectangle, equal in area to one- 
half the triangle, where it will be seen that the sum 
of the angles of the triangle coinciding at a is two 

* Noticed by the writer of this artiele while drawing. 

•Tylor, Anthropology, An Introduction to the Study of Man, 
etc., Qerman trans., Brunswick, 1883, p. 383. 



58 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

right angles. Although some very astonishing re- 
sults may be obtained by paper-folding/ it can 
scarcely be assumed that these processes were his- 
torically very productive for geometry. The mate- 




Fig. 7. 

rial is of too Umited application, and artisans em- 
ployed with it have too little incentive to exact ob- 
servation. 

Experimental Knowledge of Geometry. 

The knowledge that the angle-sum of the plane 
triangle is equal to a determinate quantity, namely, 
to two right angles, has thus been reached by ex- 
perience, not otherwise than the law of the lever or 
Boyle and Mariotte's law of gases. It is true that 
neither the unaided eye nor measurements with the 
most delicate instruments can demonstrate abso- 
lutely that the sum of the angles of a plane triangle 
is exactly equal to two right angles. But the case 
IS precisely the same with the law of the lever and 
with Boyle's law. All these theorems are therefore 
idealized and schematized experiences; for real 



*See, for example, Sundara Bow's Geometric Exercises in 
Paper-Folding, Chicago ; The Open Court Publishing Co., 1901. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 59 

measurements will always show slight deviations 
from them. But whereas the law of gases has been 
proved by further experimentation to be approxi- 
mate only and to stand in need of modification when 
the facts are to be represented with great exactness, 
the law of the lever and the theorem regarding the 
angle-sum of a triangle have remained in as exact 
accord with the facts as the inevitable errors of ex- 
perimenting would lead us to expect ; and the same 
statement may be made of all the consequences that 
have been based on these two laws as preliminary 
assumptions. 

Equal and similar triangles placed in paving 
alongside one another with their bases in one and 



am. Mfk III 


\ 


k/ 


Ä^Äklil 


4 





mlllllu 


1 


y 



Pig. 8. 



the same straight line must also have led to a very 
important piece of geometrical knowledge. (Fig. 
8.) If a triangle be displaced in a plane along a 
straight line (without rotation), all its points, in- 



6o SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 

eluding those of its bounding lines, will describe 
equal paths. The same bounding line will furnish, 
therefore, in any two different positions, a system 
of two straight lines equally distant from one an- 
other at all points, and the operation coincidently 
vouches for the equality of the angles made by the 
line of displacement on corresponding sides of the 
two straight lines. The sum of the interior angles 
on the same side of the line of displacement was 
consequently determined to be two right angles, and 
thus Euclid's theorem of parallels was reached. We 
may add that the possibility of exte^nding ä pave- 
ment of this kind indefinitely, necessarily lent in- 
creased obviousness to this discovery. The sliding 
of a triangle along a ruler has remained to this day 
the simplest and most natural method of drawing 
parallel lines. It is scarcely necessary to remark 
that the theorem of parallels and the theorem of 
the angle-sum of a triangle are inseparably con- 
nected and represent merely different aspects of the 
same experience. 

The stone masons above referred to must have 
readily made the discovery that a regular hexagon 
can be composed of equilateral triangles. Thus re- 
sulted immediately the simplest instances of the 
division of a circle into parts, — namely its division 
into six parts by the radius, its division into three 
parts, etc. Every carpenter knows instinctively and 
almost without reflection that a beam of rectangular 
symmetric cross-section may, owing to the perfect 
symmetry of the circle, be cut out from a cylindrical 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 6l 

tree-trunk in an infinite number of different ways. 
The edges of the beam will all lie in the cylindrical 
surface, and the diagonals of a section will pass 
through the center. It was in this manner, accord- 
ing to Hankel* and Tylor,^ that the discovery was 
probably made that all angles inscribed in a semi- 
circle are right angles. 

Role of Physical Experiences. 

A stretched thread furnishes the distinguishing 
visualisation^ of the straight line. The straight line 
is characterized by its physiological simplicity. All 
its parts induce the same sensation of direction; 
every point evokes the mean of the space-sensations 
of the neighboring points; every part, however 
small, is similar to every other part, however great. 
But, though it has influenced the definitions of many 
writers,* the geometer can accomplish little with 
this physiological characterization. The visual im- 
age must be enriched by physical experience con- 
cerning corporeal objects, to be geometrically avail- 
able. Let a string be fastened by one extremity at A, 
and let its other extremity be passed through a ring 
fastened at B. If we pull on the extremity at B, 
we shall see parts of the string which before lay 
between A and B pass out at B, while at the same 



^Loc. cit., pp. 206-207. 

' AnschaVfUng. 

* Euclid, Elements, I., Definition 3. 



62 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

time the string will approach the form of a straight 
line. A smaller number of like parts of the string, 
identical bodies, suffices to compose the straight line 
joining A and B than to compose a curved line. 

It is erroneous to assert that the straight line is 
recognized as the shortest line by mere visualization. 
It is quite true we can, so far as quality is concerned, 
reproduce in imagination with perfect accuracy and 
reliability, the simultaneous change of form and 
length which the string undergoes. But this is 
nothing more than a reviviscence of a prior experi- 
ence with bodies, — an experiment in thought. The 
mere passive contemplation of space would never 
lead to such a result. Measurement is experience in- 
volving a physical reaction, an experiment of super- 
position. Visualized or imagined lines having dif- 
ferent directions and lengths cannot be applied to 
one another forthwith. The possibility of such 
a procedure must be actually experienced with ma- 
terial objects accounted as unalterable. It is erron- 
eous to attribute to animals an instinctive knowledge 
of the straight line as the shortest distance between 
two points. If a stimulus excites an animal's at- 
tention, and if the animal has so turned that its 
plane of symmetry passes through the stimulating 
object, then the straight line is the path of motion 
uniquely determined by the stimulus. This is dis- 
tinctly shown in Loeb's investigations on the trop- 
isms of animals. 

Further, visualization alone does not prove that 
any two sides of a triangle are together greater 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 63 

than the third side. It is true that if the two sides 
be laid upon the base by rotation round the vertices 
of the basal angles, it will be seen by an act of imagi- 
natioft alone that the two sides with their free ends 
moving in arcs of circles will ultimately overlap, 
thus more than filling up the base. But we should 
not have attained to this representation had not the 
procedure been actually witnessed in connection 
with corporeal objects. Euclid^ deduces this truth 
rircuitously and artificially from the fact that the 
greater side of every triang:le is opposite to the 
greater angle. But the source of our knowledge 
here also is experience,^-experience of the motion 
of the side of a physical triangle; this source has, 
however, been laboriously concealed by the form of 
the deduction, — ^and this not to the enhancement of 
perspicuity or brevity. 

But the properties of the straight line are not ex- 
hausted with the preceding empirical truths. If a 
wire of any arbitrary shape be laid on a board in 
contact with two upright nails, and slid along so as 
to be always in contact with the nails, the form and 
position of the parts of the wire between the nails 
will be constantly changing. The straighter the 
wire is, the slighter the alteration will be. A straight 
wire submitted to the same operation slides in itself. 
Rotated round two of its own fixed points, a crooked 
wire will keep constantly changing its position, but 
a straight wire will maintain its position, it will ro- 



* Euclid, Elements, Book I., Prop. 20. 



64 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

täte within itself/ When we define, now, a straight 
line as the line which is completely determined by 
two of its points, there is nothing in this concept 
except the idealisation of the empirical notion de- 
rived from the physical experience mentioned, — a 
notion by no means directly furnished by the physi- 
ological act of visualization. 

The plane, like the straight line, is physiologically 
characterized by its simplicity. It appears the same 
at all parts.^ Every point evokes the mean of the 
space-sensations of the neighboring points. Every 
part, however small, is like every other part, how- 
ever great. But experiences gained in connection 
with physical objects are also required, if these prop- 
erties are to be put to geometrical account* The 
plane, like the straight line, is physiologically sym- 
metrical with respect to itself, if it coincides with 
the median plane of the body or stands at right 
angles to the same. But to discover that symmetry 
is a permanent geometrical property of the plane 
and the straight line, both concepts must be given 
as movable, unalterable physical objects. The 
connection of physiological symmetry with metrical 



* In a letter to Vitale Giordano (Leibnieens mathematische 
Schriften, herausgegeben v. Gerhardt, erste Aptheilung, Bd. /., 
S, 195-196), Leibnitz makes use of the above-mentioned prop- 
erty of a straight line for its definition. The straight lin« 
shares the property of displaeeability in itself with the circle 
and the cifcular cylindrical spiral. But the property of rotata- 
bility within itself and that of being determined by two points, 
are exclusively its own. 

■Compare Euclid, Elements I., Definition ?► 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 65 

« 

properties also is in need of special metrical demon- 
stration. 

Physically a plane is constructed by rubbing three 
bodies together until three surfaces, A, B, C, are ob- 
tained, each of which exactly fits the others, — ^a re- 
sult which can be accomplished, as Fig. 9 shows, 
with neither convex nor concave surfaces, but with 
plane surfaces only. The convexities and concavi- 
ties are, in fact, removed by the rubbing. Similarly, . 
a truer straight line can be obtained with the aid of 
an imperfect ruler, by first placing it with its ends 
against the points A, B, then turning it through an 
angle of 180** out of its plane and again placing it 
against A, B, afterwards taking the mean between 
the two lines so obtained as a more perfect straight 
line, and repeating the operation with the line last 



T 

a\ b 



Fig. 9. 



obtained. Having by rubbing, produced a plane, 
that is to say, a surface having the same form at 
all points and on both sides, experience furnishes ad- 
ditional results. Placing two such planes one on 



66 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

the other, it will be learned that the plane is dis- 
placeahle into itself, and rotatable within itself, just 
as a straight line is. A thread stretched between 
any two points in the plane falls entirely within the 
plane. A piece of cloth drawn tight across any 
bounded portion of a plane coincides with it. Hence 
the plane represents the minimum of surface within 
its boundaries. If the plane be laid on two sharp 
points, it can still be rotated around the straight 
line joining the points, but any third point outside 
of this straight line fixes the plane, that is, deter- 
mines it completely. 

In the letter to Vitale Giordano, above referred 
to, Leibnitz makes the frankest use of this experi- 
ence with corporeal objects, when he defines a plane 
as a surface which divides an unbounded solid into 
two congruent parts, and a straight line as a line 
which divides an unbounded plane into two con- 
gruent parts.* j 

If attention be directed |;o the symmetry of the 
plane with respect to itself, and two points be as- 
sumed, one on each side of it, each ^symmetrical to 
the other, it wijl be found that every point in the 
plane is equidistant from these two points, and Leib- 



*The passage reads literally: **Et difficulter absolvi poterit 
demonstratio, nisi quis assumat notionem rectsB, qualis est^qua 
ego uti soleo, quod corpore aliquo duobus punctis immotis 
revoluto locus omnium punctorum quieecentium sit recta, vel 
saltern quod recta sit linea secans planum interminatum in duas 
partes congruas; et planum sit superficies secans solidum inter- 
minatum in duas partes congruas. ' ' For similar definitions, see, 
for example, Halsted's Elements of Geometry, 6th edition. 
New York, 1895, p. 9.— T. J. MeC, 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 67 

nitz's definition of the pjane is reached/ The uni- 
formity and symmetry of the straight line and the 
plane are consequences of their being absolute min- 
ima of length and area respectively. For the 
boundaries given the minimum must exist, no other 
collateral condition being involved. The minimum 
is unique, single in its kind; hence the symmetry 
with respect to the bounding points. Owing to the 
absoluteness of the minimum, every portion, how- 
ever small, again exhibits the same minimal prop- 
erty; hence the uniformity. 

Empirical Origin of Geometry. 
Empirical truths organically connected may make 
their appearance independently of one another, and 
doubtless were so discovered long before the fact of 
their connection was known. But this does not pre- 
clude their being afterwards recognized as involved 
in, and determined by, one another, as being de- 
ducible from one another. For example, supposing 
we are acquainted with the symmetry and uniform- 
ity of the straight line and the plane, we easily 
deduce that the intersection of two planes is a 
straight line, that any two points of the plane can 
be joined by a straight line lying wholly within the 
plane, etc. The fact that only a minimum of incon- 
spicuous and unobtrusive experiences is requisite 
for such deductions should not lure us into the er- 
ror of regarding this minimum as wholly super- 

* Leibnitz, in re ** geometrical characteristic," letter to Huy- 
gens. Sept, 8, 1679 (Gerhardt, loc, cit, erste Abth,, Bä. JI,, 
8. 23). 



68 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

fluous, and of believing that visualization and rea- 
soning are alone sufficient for the construction of 
geometry. 

Like the concrete visual images of the straight 
line and the plane, so also our visualizations of the 
circle, the sphere, the cylinder, etc., are enriched 
by metrical experiences, and in this manner first 
rendered amenable to fruitful geometrical treatment. 
The same economic impulse that prompts our chil- 
dren to retain only the typical features in their con- 
cepts and drawings, leads us also to the schematiza- 
tion and conceptual idealisation of the images de- 
rived from our experience. Although we never 
come across in nature a perfect straight line or an 
exact circle, in our thinking we nevertheless de- 
signedly abstract from the deviations which thus 
occur. Geometry, therefore, is concerned with ideai 
objects produced by the schematization of experi- 
ential objects. I have remarked elsewhere that it 
is wrong in elementary geometrical instruction to 
cultivate predominantly the logical side of the sub- 
ject, and to neglect to throw open to young students 
the wells of knowledge contained in experience. It 
is gratifying to note that the Americans who are 
less dominated than we by tradition, have recently 
broken with this system and are introducing a sort 
of experimental geometry as introductory to sys- 
tematic geometric instruction.* 

*See the essays and books of Hanus, Campbell, Speer, Myers, • 

Hall and many others noticed in the reviews of School Science , 

and Mathematics (Chicago) during the last few years. — T. /. i 
McC. 



I 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 69 

Technical and Scientific Development of 
Geometry. 

No sharp line can be drawn between the instinc- 
tive, the technical, and the scientific acquisition of 
geometric notions. Generally speaking, we may say, 
perhaps, that with division of labor in the indus- 
trial and economic fields, with increasing employ- 
ment with very definite objects, the instinctive acqui- 
sition of knowledge falls into the background, and 
the technical begins. Finally, when measurement 
becomes an aim and business in itself, the connec- 
tion obtaining between the various operations of 
measuring acquires a powerful economic interest, 
and we reach the period of the scientific develop- 
ment of geometry, to which we now proceed. 

The insight that the measures of geometry de- 
pend on one another, was reached in divers ways. 
After surfaces came to be measured by surfaces, 
further progress was almost inevitable. In a paral- 
lelogrammatic field permitting a division into equal 
partial parallelogrammatic fields so that n rows of 
partial fields each containing m fields lay alongside 
one another, the counting of these fields was un- 
necessary. By multiplying together the numbers 
measuring the sides, the area of the field was found 
to be equal to mn such fields, and the area of each 
of the two triangles formed by drawing the diago- 
nal was readily discovered to be equal to ^ such 
fields. This was the first and simplest application of 



70 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

arithmetic to geometry. Coincidently, the depend- 
ence of measures of area on other measures, linear 
and angular, was discovered. The area of a rec- 
tangle was found to be larger than that of an ob- 
lique parallelogram having sides of the same length ; 
the area, consequently, depended not only on the 
length of the sides, but also on the angles. On the 
other hand, a rectangle constructed of strips of 
wood running parallel to the base, can, as is easily 
seen, be converted by displacement into any paral- 
lelogram of the same height and base without alter- 
ing its area. Quadrilaterals having their sides given 
are still undetermined in their angles, as every car- 
penter knows. He adds diagonals, and converts 
liis quadrilateral into triangles, which, the sides be- 
ing given, are rigid, that is to say, are unalterable 
as to their angles also. 

With the perception that measures were depend- 
ent on one another, the real problem of geometry 
was introduced. Steiner has aptly and justly en- 
titled his principal work ^^Systematic Development 
of the Dependence of Geometrical Figures on One 
Another."^ In Snell's original but unappreciated 
treatise on Elementary Geometry, the problem in 
question is made obvious even to the beginner.^ 

A plane physical triangle is constructed of wires. 
If one of the sides be rotated around ä vertex, so as 
to increase the interior angle at that point, the side 

* J. Steiner, SystematiscTie Entwicklung der AhhängigJceit der 
geometrischen Gestalten von einander. 

*Snell, Lehrbuch der Geometrie, Leipsic, 1869. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 7 1 

moved will be seen to change its position and the 
side opposite to grow larger with the angle. New 
pieces of wire besides those before present will be 
required to complete the last-mentioned side. This 
and other similar experiments can be repeated in 
thought, but the mental experiment is never any- 
thing more than a copy of the physical experiment. 
The mental experiment would be impossible if phys- 
ical experience had not antecedently led us to a 
knowledge of spatially unalterable physical bodies,^ 
— ^to the concept of measure. 

The Geometry of the Triangle. 

By experiences of this character, we are conducted 
to the truth that of the six metrical magnitudes dis- 
coverable in a triangle (three sides and three angles) 
three, including at least one side, suffice to determine 
the triangle. If one angle only be given among the 
parts determining the triangle, the angle in question 
must be either the angle included by the given sides, 
or that which is opposite to the greater side, — at 
least if the determination is to be unique. Having 
reached the perception that a triangle is determined 
by three sides and that its form is independent of its 
position, it follows that in an equilateral triangle all 
three angles and in an isosceles triangle the two 
angles opposite the equal* sides, must be equal, in 



*The whole construction of the Euclidean geometry shows 
traces of this foundation. It is still more conspicuous in the 
** geometric characteristic" of Leibnitz already mentioned. 
We shall revert to this topic later. 



^2, SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

whatever manner the angles and sides may depend 
on one another. This is logically certain. But the 
empirical foundation on which it rests is for that 
reason not a whit more superfluous than it is in the 
analogous cases of physics. 

The mode in which the sides and angles depend 
on one another is, naturally, first recognized in spe- 
cial instances. In computing the areas of rectangles 
and of the triangles formed by their diagonals, the 
fact must have been noticed that a rectangle having 
sides 3 and 4 units in length gives a right-angled 
triangle having sides, 3, 4, and 5 units in length. 
Rectangularity was thus shown to be connected \yith 
a definite, rational ratio between the sides. Th^ 
knowledge of this truth was employed to stake off 
right angles, by means of three connected ropes 
respectively 3, 4, and 5 units in length.* The equa- 
tion 3^ + 4^ = 5^, the analogue of which was proved 
to be valid for all right-angled triangles having sides 
of lengths a, b, c (the general formula being 
a^ + b^ = c^), now riveted the attention. It is well 
known how profoundly this relation enters into met- 
rical geometry, and how all indirect measurements 
of distance may be traced back to it. We shall en- 
deavor to disclose the foundation of this relation. 

It is to be remarked first that neither the Greek 
geometrical nor the Hindu arithmetical deductions 
of the so-called Pythagorean Theorem could avoid 
the consideration of areas. One essential point on 

*Gantor, Geschichte der Mathematik, Leipsic, 1880. I., pp. 
53, 56. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 73 

which all the deductions rest and which appears more 
or less distinctly in different forms in all of them, is 
the following. If a triangle, a, b, c (Fig. lo) be slid 
along a short distance in its own plane, it is as- 




Fig. 10. 



sumed that the space which it leaves behind is com- 
pensated for by the new space on which it enters. 
That is to say, the area swept out by two of the sides 
during the displacement is equal to the area swept 
out by the third side. The basis of this conception 
is the assumption of the conservation of the area of 
the triangle. If we consider a surface as a body, of 
very minute but unvarying thickness of third dimen- 
sion (which for that reason is uninfluential in the 
present connection), we shall again have the con- 
servation of the volume of bodies as our funda- 
mental assumption. The same conception may be 
applied to the translation of a tetrahedron, but it 
does not lead in this instance to new points of view. 
Conservation of volume is a property which rigid 
and liquid bodies possess in common, and was ideal- 
ized by the old physics as impenetrability. In the 
case of rigid bodies, we have the additional at- 
tribute that the distances between all the parts are 
preserved, while in the case of liquids, the proper- 



74 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



ties of rigid bodies exist only for the smallest time 
and space elements. 

If an oblique-angled triangle having the sides 

a, b, and c be displaced in the direction of the side 

b, only a and c will, by the principle above stated, 
describe equivalent parallelograms, which are alike 
in an equal pair of parallel sides on the same paral- 
lels. If a make with .& a right angle, and the tri- 
angle be displaced at right angles to c, the distance 

c, the side c will describe the square c^ while the 
two other sides will describe parallelograms the 
combined areas of which are equal to the area of the 




Fig. 11. 

square. But the two parallelograms are, by the ob- 
servation which just precedes, equivalent respectively 
to a^ and b^, — and with this the Pythagorean the- 
orem is reached. 

The same result may also be attained ( Fig. 1 1 ) 
by first sliding the triangle a distance a at right an- 
gles to a, and then a distance b at right angles to 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 75 

b, where a^ + b^ will be equal to the sum of 
the surfaces swept out by c, which is obviously c^. 
Taking an oblique-angled triangle, the same proced- 
ure just as easily and obviously gives the more gen- 
eral proposition, c^ = a^ + b^ — 2a6cosy. 

The dependence of the third side of the triangle 
on the two other sides is accordingly determined by 
the area of the enclosed triangle ; or, in our concep- 
tion, by a condition involving volume. It will also 
be directly seen that the equations in question ex- 
press relations of area. It is true that the angle in- 
cluded between two of the sides may also be re- 
garded as determinative of the third side, in which 
case the equations will aparently assume an en- 
tirely different form. 

Let us look a little more closely at these different 
measures. If the extremities of two straight lines 
of lengths a and b meet in a point, the length of the 
line c joining their free extremities will be included 
between definite limits. We shall hsfve c < a + b, 
and c>a — &. Visualization alone cannot inform 
us of this fact; we can learn it only from experir- 
meniing in thought, — a procedure which both re- 
poses on physical experience and reproduces it. This 
will be seen by holding a fast, for example, and 
turning b, first, until it forms the prolongation of a, 
and, secondly, until it coincides with a. A straight 
line is primarily a unique concrete image character- 
ized by physiological properties, — an image which 
we have obtained from a physical body of a definite 



76 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

specific character, which in the form of a string or 
wire of indefinitely small but constant thickness in- 
terposes a minimum of volume between the posi- 
tions of its extremities, — which can be accomplished 
only in one uniquely-determined manner. If sev- 
eral straight lines pass through a point, we distin- 
guish between them physiologically by their direc- 
tions. But in abstract space obtained by metrical 
experiences with physical objects, differences of di- 
rection do not exist. A straight line passing 
through a point can be completely determined in ab- 
stract space only by assigning a second physical 
point on it. To define a straight line as a line which 
is constant in direction, or an angle as a difference 
between directions, or parallel straight lines as 
straight lines having the same direction, is to define 
these concepts physiologically. 

The Measurement of the Angle. 

Different methods are at our disposal when we 
come to characterize or determine geometrically an- 
gles which are visually given. An angle is deter- 
mined when the distance is assigned between any 
two fixed points lying each on a separate side of 
the angle outside the point of intersection. To ren- 
der the definition uniform, points situated at the 
same fixed and invariable distance from the vertex 
might be chosen. The inconvenience that then equi- 
multiples of a given angle placed alongside one an- 
other in the same plane with their vertices coinci- 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY ^^ 

dent, would not be measured by the same equimulti- 
ples of the distance between those points, is the rea- 
son that this method of determining angles was not 
introduced into elementary geometry.^ A simpler 
measure, a simpler characterization of an angle, is 
obtained by taking the aliquot part of the circumfer- 
ence or the area of a circle which the angle inter- 
cepts when laid in the plane of the circle with its 
vertex at the center. The convention here involved 
is more convenient.^ 

In employing an arc of a circle to determine an 
angle, we are again merely measuring a volume, — 
viz., the volume occupied by a body of simple defi- 
nite form introduced between two points on the 
arms of the angle equidistant from the vertex. But 
a circle can be characterized by simple rectilinear 
distances. It is a matter of perspicuity, of immedi- 
acy, and of the facility and convenience resulting 
therefrom, that two measures, viz., the rectilinear 
measure of length and the angular measure, are 
principally employed as fundamental measures, and 
that the others are derived from them. It is in no 
sense necessary. For example (Fig. 12), it is possi- 
ble without a special angular measure to determine 
the straight line that cuts another straight line at 
right angles by making all its points equidistant 
from two points in the first straight line lying at 
equal distances from the point of intersection. The 

*A closely allied principle of measurement is, however, ap- 
plied in trigonometry. 

* So also the superficial portion of a sphere intercepted by the 
including planes is used as the measure of a solid angle. 



78 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

bisector of an angle can be determined in a quite 
similar manner, and by continued bisection an 
angular unit can be derived of any smallness we 
wish. -A straight line parallel to another straight 




Fig. 12. 

line can be defined as one, all of whose points can 
be translated by congruent curved or straight paths 
into points of the first straight line.^ 

Length as the Fundamental Measure. 
It is quite possible to start with the straight 
length alone as our fundamental measure. Let a 
fixed physical point a be given. Another point, m, 
has the distance r^ from the first point. Then this 
last point can still lie in any part of the spherical 
surface described about a with radius f^. If we 
know still a second fixed point h, from which m is 
removed by the distance r^, the triangle dbm will 

* If this form had been adopted, the doubts as to the Eucli- 
dean theorem of parallels would probably have risen much later. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 79^ 

be rigid, determined; but mean still revolve round 
in the circle described by the rotation of the triangle 
around the axis ab. If now the point m be held fast 
in any position, then also the whole rigid body to 
which the three points in question, a, b, m, belong 
will be fixed. 

A point m is spatially determined, accordingly, 
by the distances r«, r^, Vc from at least three fixed 
points in space, a, b, c. But this determination is 
still not unique, for the pyramid with the edg^es 
^ay TifyVcy in the vertex of which m lies, can be con- 
structed as well on the one as on the other side of 
the plane a, b, c. If we were to fix the side, say by 
a special sign, we should be resorting to a physiolog- 
ical determination, for geometrically the two sides 
of the plane are not different. If the point m is to 
be uniquely determined, its distance, r^, from a 
fourth point, d, lying outside the plane ai?c, must in 
addition be given. Another point, m', is determined 
with like completeness by four distances, r'^, r'^, 
r'^ r'^. Hence, the distance of m from pi^ is also 
given by this determination. Arid the same holds 
true of any number of other points as severally de- 
termined by four distances. Between four points 

4(4 — i) 

=6 distances are conceivable, and prer 

1-2 

cisely this number must be given to determine the 
form of the point complex. For 4 + .sr = n points, 
6 + 42 or 4n — 10 distances are needed for the de- 
termination, while a still larger number, viz.. 



8o SI»ACE AND GEOMETRY 

— ^ y distances exist, so that the excess of the 

1.2 

distances is also coincident ly determined.* 

If we start from three points and prescribe that 
the distances of all points to be further determined 
shall hold for one side only of the plane determined 
by the three points, then 3M — 6 distances will suf- 
fice to determine the form, magnitude, and position 
of a system of n points with respect to the three 
initial points. But if there be no condition as to the 
side of the plane to be taken, — a condition which 
involves sensuous and physiological, but not ab- 
stract metrical characteristics, — ^the system of 
points, instead of the intended form and position, 
may assume that symmetrical to the first, or be com- 
bined of the points of both. Symmetric geometrical 
figures are, owing to our symmetric physiological 
organizatiofir, very easily taken to be identical, 
whereas metrically and physically they are entirely 
different. A screw with its spiral winding to the 
right and one with its spiral winding to the left, two 
bodies rotating in contrary directions, etc., appear 
very much alike to the eye. But we are for this rea- 
son not permitted to regard them as geometrically 
or physically equivalent. Attention to this fact 
would avert many paradoxical questions. Think 
only of the trouble that such problems gave Kant ! 



*For an interesting attempt to found both the Euclidean 
and non-Euclidean geometries on the pure notion of distance, 
see De Tilly, '* Essai sur les principes fondamentaux de la 
g^om^trie et de la m^canique" {Mimoires de la 8oci4te de 
Bordeaux, 1880). 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 8l 

Sensuous physiological attributes are determined by 
relationship to our body, to a corporeal system of 
specific' constitution; while metrical attributes are 
determined by relations to the world of physical 
bodies at large. The latter can be ascertained only 
by experiments of coincidence, — ^by measurements. 

Volume the Basis of Measurement. 

As we see, every geometrical measurement is at 
bottom reducible to measurements of volumes, to 
the enumeration of bodies. Measurements of 
lengths, like measurements of areas, repose on the 
comparison of the volumes of very thin strings^ 
sticks, and leaves of constant thickness. This is not 
at variance with the fact that measures of area may 
be arithmetically derived from measures of length, 
or solid measures from measures of length alone, or 
from these in combination with measures of area. 
This is merely proof that diiferent measures of vol- 
ume are dependent on one another. To ascertain 
the forms of this interdependence is the fundamen- 
tal object of geometry, as it is the province of arith- 
metic to ascertain the manner in which the various 
numerical operations, or ordinative activities of the 
mind, are connected together. 

The Visual Sense in Geometry. 

It is extremely probable that the experiences of 
the visual sense were the cause of the rapidity with 
which geometry developed. But our great famil- 



82 . SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

larity with the properties of rays of light gained 
from the present advanced state of optical tech- 
nique, should not mislead us into regarding our 
experimental knowledge of rays of light as the 
principal foundation of geometry. Rays of light in 
dust or smoke-laden air furnish admirable visualiza- 
tions of straight lines. But we can derive the met- 
rical properties of straight lines from rays of light 
just as little as we can derive them from imaged 
straight lines. For this purpose experiences with 
physical objects are absolutely necessary. The rope- 
stretching of the practical geometers is certainly 
older than the use of the theodolite. But once 
knowing the physical straight line, the ray of light 
furnishes a very distinct and handy means of reach- 
ing new points of view. A blind man could scarcely 
have invented modern synthetic geometry. But the 
oldest and the most powerful of the experiences ly- 
ing at the basis of geometry are just as accessible to 
the blind man, through his sense of touch, as they 
are to the person who can see. Both are acquainted 
with the spatial permanency of bodies despite their 
mobility; both acquire a conception of volume by 
taking hold of objects. The creator of primitive 
geometry disregards, first instinctively and then 
intentionally and consciously, those physical proper- 
ties that are unessential to his operations and that 
for the moment do not concern him. In this man- 
ner, and by gradual growth, the idealized concepts 
of geometry arise on the basis of experience. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 83 

Various Sources of Our Geometric Knowl- 

^ EDGE. 

Our geometrical knowledge is thus derived from 
various sources. We are physiologically acquainted, 
from direct visual and tactual contact, with many 
and various spatial forms. With these are asso- 
ciated physical (metrical) experiences (involving 
comparison of the space-sensations evoked by dif- 
ferent bodies under the same circumstances), which 
experiences are in their turn also but the expres- 
sions of other relations obtaining between sensa- 
tions. These diverse orders of experience are so 
intimately interwoven with one another that they 
can be separated only by the most thoroughgoing 
scrutiny and analysis. Hence originate the widely 
divergent views concerning geometry. Here it is 
based on pure visualization (Anschauung), there on 
physical experience, according as the one or the 
other factor is overrated or disregarded. But both 
factors entered into the development of geometry 
and are still active in it to-day; for, as we have 
seen, geometry by no means exclusively employs 
purely metrical concepts. 

If we were to ask an unbiased, candid person un- 
der what form he pictured space, referred, for ex- 
ample, to the Cartesian system of co-ordinates, he 
would doubtless say : I have the image of a system 
of rigid (form-fixed), transparent, penetrable, con- 
tiguous cubes, having their bounding surfaces 
marked only by nebulous visual and tactual per- 



84 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

cepts, — a species of phantom cubes. Over and 
through these phantom constructions the real bod- 
ies or their phantom counterparts move, conserving 
their spatial permanency (as above defined), 
whether we are concerned with practical or theoret- 
ical geometry, or phoronomy. Gauss's famous in- 
vestigation of curved surfaces, for instance, is really 
concerned with the application of infinitely thin 
laminate and hence flexible bodies to one another. 
That diverse orders of experience have co-op- 
erated in the formation of the fundamental concep- 
tions under consideration, cannot be gainsaid. 

The Fundamental Facts and Concepts. 

Yet, varied as the special experiences are from 
which geometry has sprung, they may be reduced to 
a minimum of facts: Movable bodies exist having 
definite spatial permanency, — ^viz., rigid bodies ex- 
ist. But the movability is characterized as follows : 
we draw from a point three lines not all in the same 
plane but otherwise undetermined. By three move-' 
ments along these straight lines any point can be 
reached from any other. Hence, three measure- 
ments 'or dimensions, physiologically and metrically - 
characterized as the simplest, are sufficient for all 
spatial determinations. These are the fundamental 
facts.^ 

The physical metrical experiences, like all experi- 



* The historical development of this conception will be con- 
sidered in another place. 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 85 

ences forming the basis of experimental sciences, 
are conceptualized, — idealized. The need of repre- 
senting the facts by simple perspicuous concepts 
under easy logical control, is the reason for this. 
Absolutely rigid, spatially invariable bodies, per- 
fect straight lines and planes, no more exist than a 
perfect gas or a perfect liquid. Nevertheless, de- 
ferring the consideration of the deviations, we pre- 
fer to work, and we also work more readily, with 
these concepts than with others that conform more 
closely to the actual properties of the objects. The-» 
oretical geometry does not even need to consider 
these deviations, inasmuch as it assumes objects that 
fulfil the requirements of the theory absolutely, just 
as theoretical physics does. But in practical geom- 
etry, where we are concerned with actual objects, 
we are obliged, as in practical physics, to consider 
the deviations from the theoretical assumptions. 
But geometry has still the advantage that every 
deviation of its objects from the assumptions of the 
theory which inay be detected can be removed; 
whereas physics for obvious reasons cannot con- 
struct more perfect gases than actually exist in 
nature. For, in the latter case, we are concerned 
not with a single arbitrarily constructible spatial 
property alone, but with a relation (occurring in na- 
ture and independent of our will) between pressure, 
volume, and temperature. 

Tlie choice of the concepts is suggested by the 
facts; yet, seeing that this choice is the outcome of 
our voluntary reproduction of the facts in thought, 



86 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

some free scope is left in the matter. The impor- 
tance of the concepts is estimated by their range 
of application. This is why the concepts of the 
straight line and the plane are placed in the fore- 
ground, for every geometrical object can be split up 
with sufficient approximateness into elements 
bounded by planes and straight lines. The par- 
ticular properties of the straight line, plane, etc., 
which we decide to emphasize, are matters of our 
own free choice, and this truth has found expres- 
sion in the various definitions that have been given 
of the same concept.^ 

Experimenting in Thought. 

The fundamental truths of geometry have thus, 
unquestionably^ been derived from physical experi- 
ence, if only for the reason that our visualizations 
and sensations of space are absolutely inaccessible 
to measurement and cannot possibly be made the 
subject of metrical experience. But it is no less in- 
dubitable that when the relations connecting our 
visualizations of space with the simplest metrical 
experiences have been made familiar, then geomet- 
rical facts can be reproduced with great facility and 
certainty in the imagination alone, — that is by purely 
mental experiment. The very fact that a continuous 
change in our space-sensation corresponds to a con- 
tinuous metrical change in physical bodies, enables 



* Compare, for example, the definitions of the straight line 
given by Euclid and by Archimedes. - 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 87 

US to ascertain by imagination alone the particular 
metrical elements that depend on one another. Now, 
if such metrical elements are observed to enter dif- 
ferent constructions having different positions in pre- 
cisely the same manner, then the metrical results 
will be regarded as equal. The case of the isos- 
celes and equilateral triangles, above mentioned, 
may serve as an example. The gi^ometric mental 
experiment has advantage over the physical, only in 
the respect that it can be performed with far sim- 
pler experiences and with such as have been more 
easily and almost unconsciously acquired. 

Our sensuous imagings and visualizations of 
space are qualitative, not quantitative nor metrical. 
We derive from' them coincidences« and differences 
of extension, but never real magnitt^des. Conceive, 
for example. Fig. 13, a coin rolling tlockwise down 
and around the rim of another fixed coin of the 
same size, without sliding. Be our imagination as 
vivid as it will, it is impossible by a pure feat of re- 
productive imagery alone, to determine here the 
angle described in a full revolution. But if it be 
considered that at the beginning of the motion the 
radii a, of lie in one straight line, but that after a 
quarter revolution the radii b, V lie in a straight 
line, it will be seen at once that the radius a' now 
points vertically upwards and has consequently per- 
'formed half a revolution. The measure of the rev- 
olution is obtained from metrical concepts, which 
fix idealized experiences on definite physical ob- 
jects, but the direction of the revolution is retained 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



in the sensuous imagination. The metrical con- 
cepts simply determine that in equal circles equal 
angles are subtended by equal arcs, that the radii 
to the point of contact lie in a straight line, etc. 




Fig. 13. 

If I picture to myself a triangle with one of its 
angles increasing, I shall also see the side opposite 
the angle increasing. The impression thus arises 
that the interdependence in question follows a priori 
from a feat of imagination alone. But the imagina- 
tion has here merely reproduced a fact of experience. 
Measure of angle and measure of side are two phys- 
ical concepts applicable to the same fact,— concepts 
that have grown so familiar to us that they have 
come to be regarded as merely two different at- 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 89 

tributes of the same imaged group of facts, and 
hence appear as linked together of sheer necessity. 
Yet we should never have acquired these concepts 
without physical experience. 

The combined action of the sensuous imagina- 
tion with idealized concepts derived from experi- 
ence is apparent in every geometrical deduction. 
Let us consider, for example, the simple theorem 
that the perpendicular bisectors of the sides of a tri- 
angle ABC meet in a common point. Experiment 
and imagination both doubtless led to the theorem. 
But the more carefully the construction is executed, 
the more one becomes convinced that the third per- 
pendicular does not pass exactly through the point 
of intersection of the first two, and that in any ac- 
tual construction, therefore, three points of intersec- 
tion will be found closely adjacent to one another. 
For in reality neither perfect straight lines nor per- 
fect perpendiculars can be drawn ; nor can the lat- 
ter be erected exactly at the midpoints; and so on. 
Only on the assumption of these ideal conditions 
does the perpendicular bisector of AB contain all 
points equally distant from A and B, and the perpen- 
dicular bisector of BC all points equidistant from 
B and C. From which it follows that the point of 
intersection of the two is equidistant from A, B, and 
Cj and by reason of its equidistance from A and C 
is also a point of the third perpendicular bisector, 
of AC. The theorem asserts therefore that the more 
accurately the assumptions are fulfilled the more 
nearly will the three points of intersection coincide. 



90 space and geometry 

Kant^s Theory. 

The importance of the combined action of the 
sensuous imagination [viz., of the Anschauung or 
intuition so called] and of concepts, will doubtless 
have been rendered clear by these examples. Kant 
says : "Thoughts jwithout contents are empty, in- 
tuitions without concepts are blind."^ Possibly we 
might more appropriately say: "Concepts without 
intuitions are blind, intuitions without concepts are 
lame." For it would a:ppear to be not so absolutely 
correct to call intuitions [viz., sensuous images] 
blind and concepts empty. When Kant further 
says that "there is in every branch of natural knowl- 
edge only so much science as there is "mathematics 
contained in it,"^ one might possibly also assert of 
all sciences, including mathematics, "that they are 
only in so far sciences as they operate with con- 
cepts." For our logical mastery extends only to 
those concepts of which we have ourselves deter- 
mined the contents. 

The Present Form of Geometry. 

The two facts that bodies are rigid and movable 
would be sufficient for an understanding of any 
geometrical fact, no matter how complicated, — suffi- 
cient, that is to say, to derive it from the two facts 



^Kritik der reinen Vernunft, 1787, p. 75. Max Müller 's 
translation, 2nd ed., 1896, p. 41. 

' Metaphysische Anfangsgründe der Naturwissenschaft, Vor- 
%Oort, 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 9 1 

mentioned. But geometry is obliged, both in its 
own interests and in its role as an auxiliary science, 
as well as in the pursuit of practical ends, to answer 
questions that recur ^repeatedly in the same form. 
Now it would be uneconomical, in such a contin- 
gency, to begin each time with the most elementary 
facts and to go to the bottom of each new case that 
presented itself. It is preferable, rather, to select 
a few simple, familiar, and indubitable theorems, in 
our choice of which caprice is by no means ex- 
cluded,* and to formulate from these, once for all, 
for application to practical ends, general proposi- 
tions answering the questions that most frequently 
recur. From this point of view we understand at 
once the form geometry has assumed, — ^the empha- 
sis, for example, that it lays upon its propositions 
concerning triangles. For the purpose designated 
it is desirable to collect the most general possible 
propositions having the widest range of application. 
From history we know that propositions of this 
character have been obtained by embracing various 
special cases of knowledge under single general 
cases. We are forced even today to resort to this 
procedure when we treat the relationship of two 
geometrical figures, or when the different special 
cases of form and position compel us to modify our 
modes of deduction. We may cite as the most fa* 
miliar instance of this in elementary geometry, the 



*Zindler. Zur Theorie der m^ithematischen ErTcenntnisa, 
Sitzungsberichte der Wiener Akademie: Thilos-histor. ÄJ)th, 
Bd. 118. 1889. ... 



92 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

mode of deducing the relation obtaining between 
angles at the centre and angles at the circumference. 

Universal VaLidity. 

Kroman^ has put the question, Why do we regard 
a demonstration made with a special figure (a spe- 
cial triangle) as universally valid for all figures? 
and finds his answer in the supposition that we are 
able by rapid variations to impart all possible forms 
to the figure in thought and so convince ourselves 
of the admissibility of -the same mode of inference 
in all special cases. History and introspection de- 
clare this idea to be in all essentials correct. But 
we may not assume, as Kroman does, that in each 
special case every individual student of geometry 
acquires this perfect comprehension "with the rapid- 
ity of lightning," and reaches immediately the 
lucidity and intensity of geometric conviction in 
question. Frequently the required operation is abso- 
lutely impracticable, and errors prove that in other 
cases it was actually not performed but that the in- 
quirer rested content with a conjecture based on 
analogy.^ 

But that which the individual does not or cannot 
achieve in a jiffy, he may achieve in the course of 
his life. Whole generations labor on the verifica- 
tion of geometry. And the conviction of its certi- 
tude is unquestionably strengthened by their collec- 



* Unsere NaturerTcenntniss, Copenhagen, 1883, pp. 74 et seq. 
•Hoelder, Anschauung und DenTcen in der Geometrie, p. 12, 



PSYCHOLOGY AND DEVELOPMENT OF GEOMETRY 93 

tive exertions. I once knew an otherwise excellent 
teacher who compelled his students to perform all 
their demonstrations with incorrect figures, on the 
theory that it was the logical connection of the con- 
cepts, not the figure, that was essential. But the ex- 
periences imbedded in the concepts cleave to our 
sensuous images. Only the actually visualized or 
imaged figure can tell us what particular concepts 
are to be employed in a given case. The method 
of this teacher is admirably adapted for rendering 
palpable the degree to which logical operations par- 
ticipate in reaching a given perception. But to em- 
ploy it habitually is to miss utterly the truth that 
abstract concepts draw their ulitmate power from 
sensuous sources. 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY FROM THE 
POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICAL 
INQUIRY/ . 

Our notions of space are rooted in our physiologi- 
cal organism. Geometric concepts are the product 
of the idealization of physical experiences of space. 
Systems of geometry, finally, originate in the logical 
classification of the conceptual materials so obtained. 
All three factors have left their indubitable traces in 
modern geometry. Epistemological inquiries re- 
garding space and geometry accordingly concern 
the physiologist, the psychologist, the physicist, the 
mathematician, the philosopher, and the logician 
alike, and they can be gradually carried to their 
definitive solution only by the consideration of the 
widely disparate points of view which are here of- 
fered. 

Awakening in early youth to full consciousness, 
we find ourselves in possession of the notion of a 
space surrounding and encompassing our body, in 
which space move divers bodies, now altering and 



*I shall endeavor in , this essay to define my attitude as a 
physicist toward the subject of metageometry so called. De- 
tailed geometric developments will have to be sought in the 
sources. I trust, however, that by the employment of illustra- 
tions which are familiar to every one I have made my exposi- 
tions as popular as the subject permitted. 

94 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 95 

now retaining their size and shape. It is impossible 
for us to ascertain how this notion has been begot- 
ten. Only the most thoroughgoing analysis of ex- 
periments purposefully and methodically performed 
has enabled us to conjecture that inborn idiosyn- 
cracies of the body have cooperated to this end with 
simple and crude experiences of a purely physical 
character. 

Sensational and Locative Qualties. 

An object seen or touched is distinguished not 
only by a sensational quality (as "red," "rough," 
"cold," etc.), but also by a locative quality (as "to 
the left," "above," "before," etc.). The sensational 
quality may remain the same, while the locative 
quality continuously changes ; that is, the same sen- 
suous object may move in space. Phenomena of this 
kind being again and again induced by physico-phys- 
ilogical circumstances, it is found that however va- 
ried the accidental sensational qualities may be, the 
same order of locative qualities invariably occurs, so 
that the latter appear perforce as a fixed and perma- 
nent system or register in which the sensational 
qualities are entered and classified. Now, although 
these qualities of sensation and locality can be ex- 
cited only in conjunction with one another, and can 
make their appearance only concomitantly, the im- 
pression nevertheless, easily arises that the more fa- 
miliar system of locative qualities is given antece- 
dently to the sensational qualities (Kant). 

Extended objects of vision and of touch consist 



96 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

of more or less distinguishable sensational qualities, 
conjoined with adjacent distinguishable, contin- 
uously graduated locative qualities. If such objects 
move, particularly in the domain of .our hands, we 
perceive them to shrink or swell (in whole or in 
part), or we perceive them to remain the same; in 
other words, the contrasts characterizing their 
bounding locative qualities change or remain con- 
stant. In the latter case, we call the objects rigid. 
By the recognition of permanency as coincident with 
spatial displacement, the various constituents of our 
intuition of space are rendered comparable with one 
another, — ^at first in the physiological sense. By the 
comparison of different bodies with one another, by 
the introduction of physical measures, this compar- 
ability is rendered quantitative and more exact, and 
so transcends the limitations of individuality. Thus, 
in the place of an individual and non-transmittable 
intuition of space are substituted the universal con- 
cepts of geometry, which hold good for all m.en. 
Each person has his own individual intuitive space; 
geometric space is common to all. Between the 
space of intuition and metric space, which contains 
physical experiences, we must distinguish sharply. 

Riemann's Physical Conception of Geometry. 

The need of a thoroughgoing epistemolog^cal 
elucidation of the foundations _of geometry induced 
Riemann,^ about the middle of the century just 



* Ueher die Hypothesen, welche der Geometrie zu Chrtmde 
liegen. Göttingen, 1867. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 97 

closed, to propound the question of the nature of 
space; the attention of Gauss, Lobachevski, arid 
Bolyai having before been drawn to the empirically 
hypothetical character of certain of the fundamental 
assumptions of geometry. In characterizing space 
as a special case* of a multiply-extended "magni- 
tude," Riemann had doubtless in mind some geo- 
metric construct, which may in the same manner be 
imagined to fill all space, — for example, the system 
of Cartesian co-ordinates. Riemann further asserts 
that "the propositions of geometry cannot be deduced 
from general conceptions of magnitude, but that the 
peculiar properties by which space is distinguished 
from other conceivable triply-extended magnitudes 

can be derived from experience only These 

facts, like all facts, are in no wise necessary, but 
possess empirical certitude only, — they are hypo- 
theses." Like the fundamental assumptions of 
every natural science, so also, on. Riemann's theory, 
the fundamental assumptions of geometry, to which 
experience has led us, are merely idealizations of 
experience. 

In this physical conception of geometry, Riemann 
takes his stand on the same ground as his master 
Gauss, who once expressed the conviction that it 
was impossible to establish the foundations of 
geometry entirely a priori,^ and who further as- 
serted that "we must in humility confess that if 
number is exclusively a product of the mind, space 



^ Brief von Gauss an Bessel, 27. Januar 1829. 



98 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

possesses in addition a reality outside of our mind, 
of which reality we cannot fully dictate a priori the 
laws."^ 

Analogies of Space with Colors. 

Every inquirer knows that the knowledge of an 
object he is investigating is materially augmented 
by comparing it with related objects. Quite natur- 
ally therefore Riemann looks about him for objects 
which oflfer some analogy to space. Geometric 
space is defined by him as a triply-extended contin- 
uous manifold, the elements of which are the points 
determined by every possible three co-ordinate val- 
ues. He finds that "the places of sensuous objects 
and colors are probably the only concepts [sic^ 
whose modes of determination form a multiply-ex- 
tended manifold." To this analogy others were add- 
ed by Riemann's successors and elaborated by them, 
but not always, I think, felicitously.^ 

^ Brief von Gauss an Bessel, April 9, 1830. — The phrase, 
"Number is a product or creation of the mind,'* has since 
been repeatedly used by mathematicians. Unbiased psycho- 
logical observation informs us, however, that the formation of 
the concept of number is just as much initiated by experience 
as the formation of geometric concepts. We must at least 
know that virtually equivalent objects exist in multiple and 
unalterable form before concepts of number can originate. 
Experiments in counting also play an important part in the de- 
velopment of arithmetic. 

* When acoustic pitch, intensity, and timbre, when chromatic 
tone, saturation, and luminous intensity are proposed as an- 
alogues of the three dimensions of space, few persons will be 
satisfied. Timbre, like chromatic tone, is dependent on several 
variables. Hence, if the analogy has any meaning whatever, 
several dimensions will be found to correspond to timbre and 
chromatic tone. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 99 

Comparing sensation of space with sensation of 
color, we discover that to the continuous series 
"above and below," "right and left," "near and far," 
correspond the three sensational series of mixed col- 
ors, black-white, red-green, blue-yellow. The sys- 
tem of sensed (seen) places is a triple continuous 
manifold like the system of color-sensations. The 
objection which is raised against this analogy, viz., 
that in the first instance the three variations (^di- 
mensions) are homogeneous and interchangeable 
with one another, while in the second instance they 
are heterogeneous and not interchangeable, does not 
hold when spact-sensation is compared with color- 
sensation. For from the psycho-physiological point 
of view "right and left" as little permit of being 
interchanged with "above and below" as do red 
and green with black and white. It is only when 
we compare geometric space with the system of col- 
ors that the objection is apparently justified. But 
there is still a great deal lacking to the establish- 
ment of a complete analogy between the space of in- 
tuition and the system of color-sensation. Whereas 
nearly equal distances in sensuous space are imme- 
diately recognized as such, a like remark cannot be 
made of differences of colors, and in this latter prov- 
ince it is not possible to compare physiologically the 
different portions with one another. And, further- 
more, even if there be no difficulty, by resorting to 
physical experience, in characterizing every color of 
a system by three numbers, just as the places of 
geometric space are characterized, and so in creat- 



lOO SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

ing a metric system similar to the latter, it will 
nevertheless be difficult to find anything which cor- 
responds to distance or volume and which has an 
analogous physical significance for the system of 
colors. 

Analogies of Space with Time. 

There is always an arbitrary element in analogies, 
for they are concerned with the coincidences to 
which the attention is directed. But between space 
and time doubtless the analogy is fully conceded, 
whether we use the word in its physiological or its 
physical sense. In both meanings of the term, space 
is a triple, and time a simple, continuous manifold. 
A physical event, precisely determined by its condi- 
tions, of moderate, not too long or too short dura- 
tion, seems to us physiologically, now and at any 
other time, as having the same duration. Physical 
events which at any time are temporarily coinci- 
dent are likewise temporarily coincident at any other 
time. Temporal congruence exists, therefore, just 
as much as does spatial congruence. Unalterable 
physical temporal objects exist, therefore, as much 
as unalterable physical spatial objects (rigid bodies). 
There is not only spatial but there is also temporal 
substantiality. Galileo employed corporeal phenom- 
ena, like the beats of the pulse and breathing, for the 
determination of time, just as anciently the hands 
and the feet were employed for the estimation of 
space. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS lOI 

The simple manifold of tonal sensations is like- 
wise analogous to the triple manifold of space-sen- 
sations/ The comparability of the different parts 
of the system of tonal sensations is given by the 
possibility of directly sensing the musical interval, 
A metric system corresponding to geometric space 
is most easily obtained by expressing tonal pitch in 
terms of the logarithm of the rate of vibration. For 
the constant musical interval we have here the ex- 
pression, 

n' 
log — = log w' — log n = log T — log t' = const., 

where w', n denote the rates, and t', t the periods of 
vibration of the higher and the lower note respec- 
tively. The difference between the logarithms here 
represents the constancy of the length on displace- 
ment. The unalterable, substantial physical object 
which we sense as an interval is for the ear tempor- 
ally determined, whereas the analogous object for 
the senses of sight and touch is spatially deter- 
mined. Spatial measure seems to us simpler solely 
because we have chosen for the fundamental meas- 
ure of geometry distance itself, which remains un- 
alterable for sensation, whereas in the province of 
tones we have reached our measure only by a long 
and circuitous physical route. 



*My attention was drawn to this analogy in 1863 by my 
study of the organ of hearing, and I have since then further 
developed the subject. See my Analysis of the Sensations. 



102 space and geometry 

Differences of the Analogies. 

Having dwelt on the coincidences of our analo- 
gized constructs, it now remains for us to emphasize 
their differences. Conceiving time and space as sen- 

' sational manifolds, the objects whose motions are 
made perceptible by the alteration of temporal and 

.gpatial qualities are characterized by other sensa- 
tional qualities, as colors, tactual sensations, tones, 
etc. If the system of tonal sensations is regarded 
as analogous to the optical space of sense, the 
curious fact results that in the first province the 
spatial qualities occur alone, unaccompanied by sen- 
sational qualities corresponding to the objects, just 
as if one could see a place or motion without seeing 
the object which occupied this place or executed this 
motion. Conceiving spatial qualities as organic 
sensations which can be excited only concomitantly 
with sensational qualities,^ the analogy in question 
does not appear particularly attractive. For the 
manifold-mathematician, essentially the same case 
is presented whether an object of definite color 
moves continuously in optical space, or whether an 
object spatially fixed passes continuously through 
the manifold of colors. But for the physiologist 
and psychologist the two cases are widely different, 
not only because of what was above adduced, but 
also, and specifically, because of the fact that the 
system of spatial qualities is very familiar to us, 
whereas, we can represent to ourselves a system of 



* Compare supra, page 14 et seq. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS IO3 

color-sensations only laboriously and artificially, by 
means of scientific devices. Color appears to us as 
an excerpted member of a manifold the arrange- 
ment of which is in no wise familiar to us. 

The Extension of Symbols. 

The manifolds here analogized with space are, 
like the color-system, also threefold, or they repre- 
sent a smaller number of variations. Space con- 
tains surfaces as twofold and lines as onefold mani- 
folds, to which the mathematician, generalizing, 
might also add points as zero-fold manifolds. There 
is also no difficulty in conceiving analytical mechan- 
ics, with Lagrange, as an analytical geometry of 
four dimensions, time being considered the fourth 
co-ordinate. In fact, the equations of analytical 
geometry, in their conformity to the co-ordinates, 
suggest very clearly to the mathematician the ex- 
tension of these considerations to an unlimited 
larger number of dimensions. Similarly, physics 
would be justified in considering an extended mate- 
rial continuum, to each point of which a tempera- 
ture, a magnetic, electric, and gravitational poten- 
tial were ascribed, as a portion or section of a multi- 
ple manifold. Employment with such symbolic 
representations must, as the history of science 
shows us, by no means be regarded as entirely un- 
fruitful. Symbols which initially appear to have no 
meaning whatever, acquire gradually, after subjec- 
tion to what might be called intellectual experi- 
menting, a lucid and precise significance. Think 



104 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

only of the negative, fractional, and variable expo- 
nents of algebra, or of the cases in which important 
and vital extensions of ideas have taken place which 
otherwise would have been totally lost or have made 
their appearance at a much later date. Think only 
of the so-called imaginary quantities with which 
mathematicians long operated, and from which they 
even obtained important results ere they were in a 
position to assign to them a perfectly determinate 
and withal visualizable meaning. But symbolic rep- 
resentation has likewise the disadvantage that the 
object represented is very easily lost sight of, and 
that operations are continued with the symbols to 
which frequently no object whatever corresponds/ 

*As a young student I was always irritated with symbolic 
deductions of which the meaning was not perfectly clear and 
palpable. But historical studies are well adapted to eradicat- 
ing the tendency to mysticism which is so easily fostered and 
bred by the somnolent employment of these methods, in that 
they clearly show the heuristic function of them and at the 
same time elucidate epistemologically the points wherein they 
furnish their essential assistance. A symbolical r^resentation 
of a method of calculation has the same significance for a 
mathematician as a model or a visualisable working hypothesis 
has for the physicist. The symbol, the model, the hypothesis 
runs parallel with the thing to be represented. But the paral- 
lelism may extend farther, or be extended farther, than was 
originally intended on the adoption of the symbol. Since the 
thing represented and the device representing are after all 
different, what would be concealed in the one is apparent in 
the other. It is scarcely possible to light directly on an opera- 
tion like a^' B^t operating with such symbols leads us to 

attribute to them an intelligible meaning. Mat hemat icians 
worked many years with expressions like cos x X V — 1 sin ts 
and with exponentials having imaginary exponents before 
in the struggle for adapting concept and symbol to each other 
the idea that had been germinating for a century finally found 
expression in 1806 in Argand, viz., that a relationship cou ld be 
conceived between magnitude and direction by which V — 1 
was represented as a mean direction-proportional between + 1 
and — 1. 



from the point of view of physics io5 

Another View of Riemann's Manifold. 

It is easy to rise to Riemann's conception of an 
w-fold continuous manifold, and it is even possible 
to realize and visualize portions of such a manifold. 
Let Ol, aj, ttj, 04 c „+i be any elements whatso- 
ever (sensational qualities, substances, etc.). If we 
conceive these elements intermingled in all their 
possible relations, then each single composite will be 
represented by the expression 

«1^1 + a^Ch + «808 + a^^iUn+i = I, 

where the coefficients a satisfy the equation 

«1 + «2 + «3 + a«+i = I. 

Inasmuch, therefore, as n of these coefficients a may 
be selected at pleasure, the totality of the composites 
of the n+ I elements will represent an n-fold con- 
tiauous manifold.^ As co-ordinates of a point of 
this manifold, we may regard expressions of the 
form 

But in choosing definition of distance, or that of 
any other notion analogous to geometrical concepts, 
we shall have to proceed very arbitrarily unless ex- 
periences of the manifold in question inform us that 
certain metric concepts have a real meaning, and are 
therefore to be preferred, as is the case for geomet- 



*If the six fundamental color-sensations were totally inde- 
pendent of one another, the system of color-sensations would 
represent a five-fold manifold. Since they are contrasted in 
pairs, the system corresponds to a three-fold manifold. 



I06 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

ric Space with the definition^ derived from the volum- 
inal constancy of bodies for the element of distances 
ds^ = dx^ + d'f + dz^, and as is likewise the case 
for sensations of tone with the logarithmic expres- 
sion mentioned above. In the majority of cases 
where such an artificial construction is involved, 
fixed points of this sort are wanting, and the entire 
consideration is therefore an ideal one. The anal- 
ogy with space loses thereby in completeness, fruit- 
fulness, and stimulating power. 

Measure of Curvature, and Curvature of 
Space. 

In still another direction Riemann elaborated 
ideas of Gauss; beginning with the latter's investi- 
gations concerning curved surfaces. Gauss's meas- 
ure of the curvature^ of a surface at any point is 

given by the expression ^ = j- where ds is an ele- 
ment of the surface and d(r is the superficial element 
of the unit-sphere, the limiting radii of which are 
parallel to the limiting normals of the element ds. 
This measure of curvature may also be expressed in 

the form k = — i— , where f>i>f>2 are the principal 
P1P2 

radii of curvature of the surface at the point in 

question. Of special interest are the surfaces whose 

measure of curvature for all points has the same 



^ Comp, supra, p. 73 et passim, 

^ Bisquisitiones generales circa superficies curvas, 1827. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS IO7 

value, — the surfaces of constant curvature. Con- 
ceiving the surfaces as infinitely thin, non-distensi- 
ble, but flexible bodies, it will be found that sur- 
faces of like curvature may be made to coincide by 
bending, — ^as for example a plane sheet of paper 
wrapped round a cylinder or cone, — ^but cannot be 
made to coincide with the surface of a sphere. Dur- 
ing such deformation, nay, even on crumpling, the 
proportional parts of figures drawn in the surface 
remain invariable as to lengths and angles, provided 
we do not go out of the two dimensions of the sur- 
face in our measurements. Conversely, likewise, 
the curvature of the surface does not depend on its 
conformation in the third dimension of space, but 
solely upon its interior proportionalities. Riemann, 
now, conceived the idea of generalizing the notion 
of measure of curvature and applying it to spaces 
of three or more dimensions. Conformably there- 
to, he assumes that finite unbounded spaces of con- 
stant positive curvature are possible, corresponding 
to the unbounded but finite two-dimensional surface 
of the sphere, while what we commonly take to be 
infinite space would correspond to the unlimited 
plane of curvature zero, and similarly a third spe- 
cies of space would correspond to surfaces of neg- 
ative curvature. Just as the figures drawn upon a 
surface of determinate constant curvature can be 
displaced without distortion upon this surface only 
(for example, a spherical figure on the surface of 
its sphere only, or a plane figure in its plane only) , 
so should analogous conditions necessarily hold for 



I08 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

spatial figures and rigid bodies. The latter are 
capable of free motion only in spaces of constant 
curvature, as Helmholtz^ has shown at length. Just 
as the shortest lines of a plane are infinite, but on 
the surface of a sphere occur as great circles of defi- 
nite finite length, closed and reverting into them- 
selves, so Riemann conceived in the three-dimen- 
sional space of positive curvature analogues of the 
straight line and the plane as finite but unbounded. 
But there is a difficulty here. If we possessed the 
notion of a measure of curvature for a four-dimen- 
sional space, the transition to the special case of 
three-dimensional space could be easily and ration- 
ally executed; but the passage from the special to 
the more general case involves -a certain arbitrari- 
ness, and, as is natural, different inquirers have 
adopted here different courses^ (Riemann and Kro- 
necker). The very fact that for a one-dimensional 
space (a curved line of any sort) a measure of curv- 
ature does not exist having the significance of an in- 
terior measure, and that such a measure first occurs 
in connection with two-dimensional figures, forces 
upon us the question whether and to what extent 
something analogous has any meaning for three- 
dimensional figures. Are we not subject here to an 
illusion, in. that we operate with symbols to which 
perhaps nothing real corresponds, or at least noth- 

***Ueber die Thatsachen, welche der Geometrie zu Grunde 
liegen. ' ' Göttinger Nachrichten, 1868, June 3. 

* Compare, for example, Kronecker, "Ueber Systeme von 
Functionen mehrerer Variablen." Ber. d, Berliner Akademie, 
1869. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS IO9 

ing representable to the senses, by means of which 
we can verify and rectify our ideas? 

Thus were reached the highest and most univer- 
sal notions regarding space and its relations to 
analogous manifolds which resulted from the con- 
viction of Gauss concerning the empirical founda- 
tions of geometry. But the genesis of this convic- 
tion has a preliminary history of two thousand 
years, the chief phenomena of which we can perhaps 
better survey from the height which we have now 
gained. 

The Early Discoveries in Geometry. 

The unsophisticated men, who, rule in hand, ac- 
quired our first geometric knowledge, held* to the 
simplest bodily objects (figures) : the straight line, 
the plane, the circle, etc., and investigated, by means 
of forms which could be conceived as combinations 
of these simple figures, the connection of their 
measurements. It could not have escaped them that 
the mobility of a body is restricted when one and 
then two of its points are fixed, and that finally it 
is altogether checked by fixing three of its points. 
Granting that rotation about an axis (two points), 
or rotation about a point in a plane, as likewise dis- 
placement with constant contact of two points with 
a straight line and of a third point with a fixed 
plane laid through that straight line, — ^granting that 
these facts were separately observed, it would be 
known how to distinguish between pure rotation. 



no 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



pure displacement, and the motion compounded of 
these two independent motions. The first geometry 
was of course not based on purely metric notions, 
but made many considerable concessions to the phy- 
siological factors of sense.^ Thus is the appearance 
explained of two different fundamental measures: 
the (straight) length and the angle (circular meas- 
ure). The straight line was conceived as a rigid 
mobile body (measuring-rod), and the angle as the 




Fig. 14. 

rotation of a straight line with respect to another 
(measured by the arc so described). Doubtless no 
one ever demanded special proof for the equality of 
angles at the origin described by the same rotation. 
Additional propositions concerning angles resulted 
quite easily. Turning the line b about its intersec- 
tion with c so as to describe the angle a (Fig. 14), 
and after coincidence with c turning it again about 

*Oomp. supra, p. 83. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 



III 



its intersection with a till it coincides with a and so • 
describes the angle ß, we shall have rotated b from 
its initial to its final position a through the angle /* 
in the same sense.^ Therefore the exterior angle /«. 
= a + )8, and since /*+ y = 2R, also a + ß + y = 
2R. Displacing (Fig. 15) the rigid system of lines 
a, b, Cy which intersect at i, within their plane to the 
position 2, the line a always remaining within itself, 
no alteration of angles will be caused by the mere 




Fig. 15. 



motion. The sum of the interior angles of the tri- 
angle I 2 3 so produced is evidently 2 R, The same 
consideration also throws into relief the properties 



*C. B. Kosack, Beiträge zu einer systematischen EntwicTceU 
ung der Geometrie aus der Anschauung, Nordhausen, 1852. I 
was able to see this programme through the kindness of Prof. 
F. Pietzker of Nordhausen. Similar simple deductions are 
found in Bernhard Becker's Leitfaden für den ersten Unter- 
richt in der Geometrie, Frankfort on the Main, 1845, and in 
the same author's treatise TJeher die Methoden des geo- 
metrischen Unterrichts, Frankfort, 1845. I gained access to 
the first-named book through the kindness of Dr. M. Schuster 
of Oldenburg. 



112 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

of parallel lines. Doubts as to whether successive 
rotation about several points is equivalent to rota- 
tion about one point, whether pure displacement is 
at all possible, — which are justified when a surface 
of curvature differing from zero is substituted for 
the Euclidean plane, — could never have arisen in 
the mind of the ingenuous and delighted discoverer 
of these relations, at the period we are considering. 
The study of the movement of rigid bodies, which 
Euclid studiously avoids and only covertly intro- 
duces in his principle of congruence, is to this day 
the device best adapted to elementary instruction in 
geometry. An idea is best made the possession of 
the learner by the method by which it has been 
found. 

Deductive Geometry. 

This sound and naive conception of things van- 
ished and the treatment of geometry underwent es- 
sential modifications when it became the subject of 
professional and scholarly contemplation. The ob- 
ject now was to systematize the knowledge of this 
province for purposes of individual survey, to sepa- 
rate what was directly cognizable from what was 
deducible and deduced, and to throw into distinct 
relief the thread of deduction. For the purpose of 
instruction the simplest principles, those most easily 
gained and apparently free from doubt and contra- 
diction, are placed at the beginning, and the remain- 
der based upon them. Efforts were made to reduce 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS II3 

these initial principles to a minimum, as is observ- 
able in the system of Euclid. Through this en- 
deavor to support every notion by another, and to 
leave to direct knowledge the least possible scope, 
geometry was gradually detached from the empiri- 
cal soil out of which it had sprung. People accus- 
tomed themselves to regard the derived truths as of 
higher dignity than the directly perceived truths, 
and ultimately came to demand proofs for proposi- 
tions which no one ever seriously doubted. Thus 
aro^e, — ^as tradition would have it, to check the on- 
slaughts of the Sophists, — the system of Euclid with 
its logical perfection and finish. Yet not only were 
the ways of research designedly concealed by this 
artificial method of stringing propositions on an 
arbitrarily chosen thread of deduction, but the var- 
ied organic connection between the principles of 
geometry was quite lost sight of.* This system was 
more fitted to produce narrow-minded and sterile 
pedants than fruitful, productive investigators. 



* Euclid's system fascinated thinkers by its logical excel- 
lences, and its drawbacks were overlooked amid this admiration. 
Great inquirers, even in recent times, have been misled into 
following Euclid's example in the presentation of the results 
of their inquiries, and so into actually concealing their methods 
of investigation, to the great detriment of science. But sei 
ence is not a feat of legal casuistry. Scientific presentation 
aims so to expound all the grounds of an idea so that it can 
at any time be thoroughly examined as to its tenability and 
power. The learner is not to be led half-blindfolded. There 
therefore arose in Germany among philosophers and education- 
ists a healthy reaction, which proceeded mainly from Herbart, 
Schopenhauer, and Trendelenburg. The effort was made to 
introduce greater perspicuity, more genetic methods, and logi- 
cally more lucid demonstrations into geometry. 



114 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

And these conditions were not improved when 
scholasticism, with its preference for slavish com- 
ment on the intellectual products of others, culti- 
vated in thinkers scarcely any sensitiveness for the 
rationality of their fundamental assumptions and 
by way of compensation fostered in them an exag- 
gerated respect for the logical form of their deduc- 
tions. The entire period from Euclid to Gauss suf- 
fered more or less from this affection of mind. 

Euclid's Fifth Postulate. 

Among the propositions on which Euclid based 
his system is found the so-called Fifth Postulate 
(also called the Eleventh Axiom and by some the 
Twelfth) : *Tf a straight line meet two straight 
lines, so as to make the two interior angles on the 
same side of it taken together less than two right 
angles, these straight lines being continually pro- 
duced, shall at length meet upon that side on which 
are the angles which are less than two right an- 
gles." Euclid easily proves that if a straight line 
falling on two other straight lines makes the alter- 
nate angles equal to each other, the two straight 
lines will not meet but are parallel. But for the 
proof of the converse, that parallels make equal 
alternate angles with every straight line falling on 
them, he is obliged to resort to the Fifth Postulate. 
This converse is equivalent to the proposition that 
only one parallel to a straight line can be drawn 
through a point. Further, by the fact that with the 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS IIS 

aid of this converse it can be proved that the sum 
of the angles of a triangle is equal to two right an- 
gles and that from this last theorem again the first 
follows, the relationship between the propositions in 
question is rendered distinct and the fundamental 
significance of the Fifth Postulate for Euclidean 
geometry is made plain. 

The intersection of slowly converging lines lies 
without the province of construction and observa- 
tion. It is therefore intelligible that in view of the 
great importance of the assertion contained in the 
Fifth Postulate the successors of Euclid, habituated 
by him to rigor, should, even in ancient times, have 
strained every nerve to demonstrate this postulate, 
or to replace it by some immediately obvious propo- 
sition. Numberless futile efforts were made from 
Euclid to Gauss, to deduce this Fifth Postulate from 
the other Euclidean assumptions. It is a sublime 
spectacle which these men offer: laboring for cen- 
turies, from a sheer thirst for scientific elucidation, 
in quest of the hidden sources of a truth which no 
person of theory or of practice ever really doubted ! 
With eager curiosity we follow the pertinacious ut- 
terances of the ethical power resident in this human 
search for knowledge, and with gratification we 
note how the inquirers gradually are led by their 
failures to the perception that the true basis of 
geometry is experience. We shall content ourselves 
with a few examples. 



ii6 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



Saccheri's Theory of Parallels. 

Among the inquirers notable for their contribu- 
tions to the theory of parallels are the Italian Sac- 
cheri and the German mathematician Lambert. In 
order to render their mode of attack intelligible, we 
will remark first that the existence of rectangles and 
squares, which we fancy we constantly observe, can- 
not be demonstrated without the aid of the Fifth 
Postulate. Let us consider^ for example, two con- 
gruent isosceles triangles ABC, DBC, having right 
angles at A and D (Fig. i6), and let them be laid 
together at their hypothenuses EC so as to form the 




Fig. 16. 



equilateral quadrilateral ABCD; the first twenty- 
seven propositions of Euclid do not suffice to deter- 
mine the character and magnitude of the two equal 
(right) angles at B and C. For measure of length 
and measure of angle are fundamentally different 
and directly not comparable; hence the first propo- 
sitions regarding the connection of sides and angles 
are qualitative only, and hence the imperative neces- 
sity of a quantitative theorem regarding angles, like 
that of the angle-sum. Be it further remarked that 
theorems analogous to the twenty-seven planimetric 
propositions of Euclid may be set up for the surface 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 



117 



of a sphere and for surfaces of constant negative 
curvature, and that in these cases the analogous 
construction gives respectively obtuse and acute an- 
gles at B and C. 

Saccheri's cardinal achievement was his form of 
stating the problem/ If the Fifth Postulate is in- 
volved in the remaining assumptions of Euclid, 
then it will be possible to prove without its aid that 
in the quadrilateral ABCD (Fig. 17) having right 
angles at A and B and AC = BD, the angles at C 
and D likewise are right angles. And, on the other 
hand, in this event, the assumption that C and D 




M 

Fig. 17. 

are either obtuse or acute will lead to contradictions. 
Saccheri, in other words, seeks to draw conclusions 
from the hypothesis of the right, the obtuse, or the 
acute angle. He shows that each of these hypothe- 
ses will hold in all cases if it be proved to hold in 
one. It is needful to have only one triangle with 

its angles = 2R in order to demonstrate the univer- 
sal validity of the hypothesis of the acute, the right, 
or the obtuse angle. Notable is the fact that Sac- 
cheri also adverts to physico-geometrical experi- 

^Eucli4€8 db omni naevo vindicatus. Milan, 1733. German 
translation in Engel and Staeckel's Die Theorie der Farallel- 
linien, Leipsic, 1895, 



Il8 SPACE. AND GEOMETRY 

ments which support the hypothesis of the right 
angle. If a line CD (Fig. 17) join the two extremi- 
ties of the equal perpendiculars erected on a straight 
line AB, and the perpendicular dropped on AB from 
any point N of the first line, viz., NM, be equal to 
CA = DB, then is the hypothesis of the right angle 
demonstrated to be correct. Saccheri rightly does 
not regard it as self-evident that the line which is 
equidistant from another straight line is itself a 
straight line. Think only of a circle parallel to a 
great circle on a sphere which does not represent a 




Fig. 18. Fig. 19. 

shortest line on a sphere and the two faces of which 
cannot be made congruent. 

Other experimental proofs of the correctness of 
the hypothesis-of the right angle are the following. 
If the angle in a semicircle (Fig. 18) is shown to be 
a right angle, a-\-ß = R, then is 2a-\'2ß = 2R, 
the sum of the angles of the triangle ABC. If the 
radius be subtended thrice in a semicircle and the 
line joining the first and the fourth extremity pass 
through the center, we shall have at C (Fig. 19) 
3a = 2i?, and consequently each of the three tri- 
angles will have the angle-sum 2R, The existence 
of equiangular triangles of different sizes (similar 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 



119 



triangles) is likewise subject to experimental proof. 
For (Fig. 20) if the angles at B and C give j8 + 8 + 
y + € = /^R, so also is 4R the angle-sum of the 
quadrilateral BCB'C\ Even Wallis' (1663) based 
his proof of the Fifth Postulate on the assumption 
of the existence of similar triangles, and a modern 
geometer, Delboeuf, deduced from the assumption 
of similitude the entire Euclidean geometry. 
The hypothesis of the obtuse angle, Saccheri fan- 




Fig. 20. 

cied he could easily refute. But the hypothesis of 
the acute angle presented to him difficulties, and in 
his quest for the expected contradictions he was car- 
ried to the most far-reaching conclusions, which 
Lobachevski and Bolyai subsequently rediscovered 
by methods of their own. Ultimately he felt com- 
pelled to reject the last-named hypothesis as incom- 
patible with the nature of the straight line; for it 

^ Engel and Staeckel, loc, oit,, p. 21 et seq. 



I20 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

led to the assumption of different kinds of straight 
lines, which met at infinity, that is, had there a com- 
mon perpendicular. Saccheri did much in anticipa- 
tion and promotion of the labors that were subse- 
quently to elucidate these matters, but exhibited 
withal toward" the traditional views a certain bias. 

Lambert's Investigations. 

Lambert's treatise^ is allied in method to that of 
Saccheri, but it proceeds farther in its conclusions, 
and gives evidence of a less constrained vision. 
Lambert starts from the consideration of a quadri- 
lateral with three right angles, and examines the 
consequences that would follow from the assumption 
that the fourth angle was right, obtuse, or acute. 
The similarity of figures he finds to be incompatible 
with the second and third assumptions. The case of 
the obtuse angle, which requires the sum of the an- 
gles of a triangle to exceed 2R, he discovers to be 
realized in the geometry of splierical surfaces, in 
which the difficulty of parallel lines entirely van- 
ishes. This leads him to the conjecture that the 
case of the acute angle, where the sum of the angles 
of a triangle is less than 2R, might be realized on 
the surface of a sphere of imaginary radius. The 
amount of the departure of the angle-sum from 2R 
is in both cases proportional to the area of the tri- 
angle, as may be demonstrated by appropriately di- 



*Published in 1766. Engel and Staeckel, loc cit, p. 152 et 
seq. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 121 

viding large triangles into small triangles, which on 
diminution may be made to approach as near as we 
please to the angle-sum 2/?. Lambert advanced 
very closely in this conception to the point of view 
of modern geometers. Admittedly a sphere of im- 
aginary radius, rV — i is not a visualizable geo- 
metric construct, but analytically it is a surface hav- 
ing a negative constant Gaussian measure of curva- 
ture. It is evident again from this example how 
experimenting with symbols also may direct inquiry 
to the right path, in periods where other points of 
support are entirely lacking and where every help- 
ful device must be esteemed at its worth.^ Even 
Gauss appears to have thought of a sphere of im- 
aginary radius, as is obvious from his formula for 
the circumference of a circle (Letter to Schumacher, 
July 12, 1831). Yet in spite of all, Lambert actu- 
ally fancied he had approached so near to the proof 
of the Fifth Postulate that what was lacking could 
be easily supplied. 

View of Gauss. 

We may turn now to the investigators whose 
views possess a most radical significance for our 
conception of geometry, but who announced their 
opinion only briefly, by word of mouth or letter. 
"Gauss regarded geometry merely as a logically con- 
sistent system of constructs, with the theory of par- 
allels placed at the pinnacle as an axiom ; yet he had 

* See note, p. 104, 



122 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



reached the conviction that this proposition could 
not be proved, though it was known from experi- 
ence, — for example, from the angles of the triangle 
joining the Brocken, Hohenhagen, and Inselsberg, 
— that it was approximately correct. But if this 
axiom be not conceded, then, he contends, there re- 
sults from its non-acceptance a different and entirely 
independent geometry, which, he had once investi- 
gated and called by the name of the Anti-Euclidean 
A 



E 



H 





7-< 




a/ 

% ■ 



Ä 



C 



G 



Fig. 21. 

geometry.** Such, according to Sartorius von Wal- 
tershausen, was the view of Gauss.^ 



Researches of Stolz. 

Starting at this point, O. Stolz, in a small but 
very instructive pamphlet,^ sought to deduce the 
principal propositions of the Euclidean geometry 
from the purely observable facts of experience. We 
shall reproduce here the most important point of 
Stolz's brochure. Let there be given (Fig. 21) one 

* Gauss zvm Gedächtniss, Leipsic, 1856. 

***Das letzte Axiom der Geometrie," Berichte des naturw.- 
medicin. Vereins zu Innsbruck^ 1886, pp. 25-34. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 



123 



large triangle ABC having the angle-sum 2R, We 
draw the perpendicular AD on BC, complete the 
figure by BAE ^ ABD and CAP ^ ACD, and add 
to the figure BCFAE the congruent figure CBHA'G. 
We obtain thus a single rectangle, for the angles 
E, F, G, H are right angles and those at A, C, A\ 
ß are straight angles (equal to 2/?), the boundary 
lines therefore straight lines and the opposite sides 
equal. A rectangle can be divided into two congru-« 
ent rectangles by a perpendicular erected at the 
middle point of one of its sides, and by continuing 
this procedure the line of division may be brought 




Fig. 22. 



to any point we please in the divided side. And the 
same holds true of the other two opposite sides. It 
is possible, therefore, from a g^ven rectangle ABCD 
(Fig. 22) to cut out a smaller AMPQ having sides 
bearing any proportion to one another. The diag- 
onal -of this last divides it into two congruent right- 
angled triangles, of which each, independently of 
the ratio of the sides, has the angle-sum 2R. Every 
oblique-angled triangle can by the drawing of a per- 
pendicular be decomposed into right-angled trian- 
gles, each of which can again be decomposed into 



124 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

right-angled triangles having smaller sides, — so 
that 2R, therefore, results for the angle-sum of 
every triangle if it holds true exactly of one. By the 
aid of these propositions which repose on observa- 
tion we conclude easily that the two opposite sides 
of a rectangle (or of any so-called parallelogram) 
are everywhere, no matter how far prolonged, the 
same distance apart, that is, never intersect. They 
have the properties of the Euclidean parallels, and 
may be called and defined as such. It likewise fol- 
lows, now, from the properties of triangles and rect- 
angles, that two straight lines which are cut by a 
third straight line so as to make the sum of the in- 
terior angles on the same side of them less than two 
right angles will meet on that side, but in either 
direction from their point of intersection will move 
indefinitely far away from each other. The straight 
line therefore is infinite. What was a groundless 
assertion stated as an axiom or an initial principle 
may as inference have a sound meaning. 

Geometry and Physics Compared. 

Geometry, accordingly, consists of. the application 
of mathematics to experiences concerning space. 
Like mathematical physics, it can become an exact 
deductive science only on the condition of its repre- 
senting the objects of experience by means of 
schematizing and idealizing concepts. Just as me- 
chanics can assert the constancy of masses or reduce 
the interactions between bodies to simple accelera- 
tions only within the limits of errors of observation, 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 125 

SO likewise the existence of straight lines, planes, the 
amount of the angle-sum, etc., can be maintained 
only on a similar restriction. But just as physics 
sometimes finds itself constrained to replace its ideal 
assumptions by other more general ones, viz., to put 
in the place of a constant acceleration of falling bod- 
ies one dependent on the distance, instead of a con- 
stant quantity of heat a variable quantity, — so a 
similar procedure is permissible in geometry, when 
it is demanded by the facts or is necessary tempor- 
arily for sciehtific elucidation. And now the en- 
deavors of Legendre, Lobachevski, and the two 
Bolyais, the younger of whom was probably indi- 
rectly inspired by Gauss, will appear in their right 
light. 

The Contributions of Lobachevski and 

BOLYAI. 

Of the labors of Schweickart and Taurinus, also 
contemporaries of Gauss, we will not speak. Lo- 
bachevski's works were the first to become known 
to the thinking world and so productive of results 
(1829). Very soon afterward the publication of 
the younger Bolyai appeared (1833), which agreed 
in all essential points with Lobachevski's, departing 
from it only in the form of its developments. Ac- 
cording to the originals which have been made al- 
most completely accessible to us in the beautiful 
editions of Engel and Staeckel,^ it is permissible to 



^ UrJctmden zur Geschichte der nichteukUdischen Geometrie, 
L. N. I. Lobatschefskij. Leipzig, 1899. 



126 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



. assume that Lobachevski also undertook his inves- 
tigations in the hope of becoming involved in con- 
tradictions by the rejection of the Euclidean axiom. 
But after he found himself mistaken in this expec- 
tation, he had the intellectual courage to draw all 
the consequences from this fact. Lobachevski gives 
his conclusions in synthetic form. But we can 
fairly well imagine the general analyzing considera- 
tions that paved the way for the construction of his 
geometry. 

From a point lying outside a straight line g ( Fig. 
23) a perpendicular p is dropped and through the 




Fig. 23. 

same point in the plane pg a straight line h is drawn, 
making with the perpendicular an acute angle s. 
Making tentatively the assumption that g and h do 
not meet but that on the slightest diminution of the 
angle s they would meet, we are at once forced by 
the homogeneity of space to the conclusion that a 
second line k having the same angle s similarly de- 
ports itself on the other side of the perpendicular. 
Hence all non-intersecting lines drawn through the 
same point are situate between h and k. The latter 
form the boundaries between the intersecting and 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 12^ 

non-intersecting lines and are called by Lobachev- 
ski parallels. 

In the Introduction to his New Elements of 
Geometry (1835) Lobachevski proves himself a 
thorough natural inquirer. No one would think of 
attributing even to an ordinary man of sense the 
crude view that the "parallel-angle" was very much 
less than a right angle, when on slight prolongation 
it could be distinctly seen that they would intersect. 
The relations here considered admit of representa- 
tion only in drawings that distort the true propor- 
tions, and we have rather to picture to ourselves 
that in the dimensions of the illustration the vari- 
ation of J from a right angle is so small that h 
and k are to the eye undistinguishably coincident. 
Prolonging, now, the perpendicular /? to a point be- 
yond its intersection with h, and drawing, through 
its extremity a new line / parallel to h and therefore 
parallel also to g, it follows that the parallel-angle 
/ must necessarily be less than s, if h and / are not 
again to fulfill the conditions of the Euclidean case. 
Continuing in the same manner, the prolongation of 
the perpendicular and the drawing of parallels, we 
obtain a parallel-angle that constantly decreases. 
Considering, now, parallels which are more remote 
and consequently converge more rapidly on the side 
of convergence, we shall logically be compelled to 
assume, not to be at variance with the preceding 
supposition, that on approach or on the decrease of 
the length of the perpendicular the parallel-angle 
will again increase. The angle of parallelism. 



128 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY 



therefore, is an inverse function, of the perpendicu- 
lar p, and has been designated by Lobachevski by 
n (p). A group of parallels in a plane has the ar- 
rangement shown schematically in Figure 24. They 
all approach one another asymptotically toward the 
side of their convergence. The homogeneity of 
space requires that every "strip" between two paral- 
lels can be made to coincide with every other strip 
provided it be displaced the requisite distance in a 
longitudinal direction. . 



Fig. 24. 

If a circle be imagined to increase indefinitely, its ' 
radii will cease to intersect the moment the increas- 
ing arcs reach the point where the convergence of 
the radii corresponds to parallelism. The circle then 
passes over into the so-called ^^houndary-line" Sim- 
ilarly the surface of a sphere, if it indefinitely in- 
crease, will pass into what Lobachevski calls a 
''boundary-surface," The boundary-lines bear a 
relation to the boundary-surface analogous to that 
which a great circle bears to the surface of a sphere. 
The geometry of the surface of a sphere is inde- 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS 



129 



pendent of the axiom of parallels. But since it can 
be demonstrated that triangles formed from boun- 
dary-lines on a boundary-surface no more exhibit 
an excess of angle-sum than do finite triangles 
on a sphere of infinite radius, consequently the 
rules of the Euclidean geometry likewise hold 
good for these boundary-triangles. To find points 
of the boundary-line, we determine (Fig. 25) 

in a bundle of parallels, aa, bß, cy, dB 

lying in a plane points a, b, c, d in each of these par- 
allels so situated with respect to the point a in oa 




Fig. 25. 

that Z, aab= Z. ßba, /. aac= /. yea, L aad =^ 

ZSda Owing to the sameness of the entire 

construction, each of the parallels may be regarded 
as the ''axis'' of the boundary line, which will gen- 
erate, when revolved about this axis, the boundary- 
surface. Likewise each of the parallels may be re- 
garded as the axis of the boundary-surface. For 
the same reason all boundary-lines and all boundary- 
surfaces are congruent. The intersection of every 
plane with the boundary-surface is a cirele; it is a 
boundary-line only when the cutting plane contains 



130 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

the axis. In the Euclidean geometry there is no 
boundary-line, nor boundary-surface. The analo- 
gues of them are here the straight line and the plane. 
If no boundary-line exists, then necessarily must 
any three points not in a straight line lie on a circle. 
Hence the younger Bolyai was able to replace the 
Euclidean axiom by this last postulate. 

Let aa, bß, (^ he Si system of parallels, and ae, 
aid, 02^2. .a system of boundary-lines, each of which 
systems divides the other into equal parts (Fig. 25). 
The ratio to each other of any two boundary-arcs 
between the same parallels, e. g., the arcs ae = u 
and 02^2 = w', is dependent therefore solely on their 
distance apart 002 = x. We may put generally 

—7 = ^* , where k is so chosen that e shall be the 

base of the Naperian system of logarithms. In this 
manner exponentials and by means of these hyper- 
bolic functions are introduced. For the angle of 

parallelism we obtain s= cotiii(p) =e 1^. If 
p = o, ^=-f ; if p= 00, ^ = 0. 

An example will illustrate the relation of the Lo- 
bachevskian to the Euclidean and spherical geom- 
etries. For a rectilinear Lobachevskian triangle 
having the sides a, b, c, and the angles A, B, C, we 
obtain, when C is a right angle, 

sinh f5= sinhf sin A. 
k h 

Here sinh stands for the hyperbolic sine, 
sinh X = — 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS I3I 



whereas sin x = 



21 



and - sm^ = — : -A — r r+ 

I I 3 I 5 1 7I 

Considering the relations sin(;r/) =i (sinh^), or 
sinh {xi) == i sin x, involved in the foregoing form- 
ulae, it will be seen that the above-given formula for 
the Lobachevskian triangle passes over into the 

formula holding for the spherical triangle, viz., sin -j 

=5: sin -J sin A, when ki is put in the place of k in 

the former and k is considered as the radius of the 
sphere, which in the usual formulae assumes the 
value unity. The re-transformation of the spherical 
formula into the Lobachevskian by the same method 
is obvious. If k be very great in comparison with 
a and c, we may restrict ourselves to the first mem- 
ber of the series for sinh or sin, obtaining in both 

cases, 4 = 4- sin A or a=^csmA, the formula of 
plane Euclidean geometry, which we may regard as 
a limiting case of both the Lobachevskian and spher- 
ical geometries for very large values of k, or for 
A=s 00. It is likewise permissible to say that all 
three geometries coincide in the domain of the infi- 
nitely small. 



*r. Engel, N, I, Lohat8chef$kij, Zm^i geometrische Ahhßn^ 
lurigen, Leipsic, 1899, 



132 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

The Different Systems of Geometry. 

As we see, it is possible to construct a self-consist- 
ent, non-contradictory system of geometry solely on 
the assumption of the convergence of parallel lines. 
True, there is not a single observation of the geomet- 
rical facts accessible to us that speaks in favor of 
this assumption, and admittedly the hypothesis is at 
so. great variance with our geometrical instinct as 
easily to explain the attitude toward it of the earlier 
inquirers like Saccheri and Lambert. Our imagina-. 
tiori, dominated as it is by our modes of visualizing 
and by the familiar Euclidean concepts, is competent 
to grasp only piecemeal and gradually Lobachev- 
ski's views. We must suffer ourselves to be led here 
rather by mathematical concepts than by sensuous 
images derived from a single narrow portion of 
space. But we must grant, nevertheless, that the 
quantitative mathematical concepts by which we 
through our own initiative and within a certain arbi- 
trary scope represent the facts of geometrical expe- 
rience, do not reproduce the latter with absolute ex- 
actitude. Different ideas can express the facts with 
the same exactness in the domain accessible to ob- 
servation. The facts must hence be carefully dis- 
tinguished from the intellectual constructs the for- 
mation of which they suggested. The latter — con- 
cepts — ^must be consistent with observation, and 
must in addition be logically in accord with one an- 
other. Now these two requirements can be fulfilled 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS I33 

in more than one manner, and hence the different 
systems of geometry. 

Manifestly the labors of Lobachevski were the 
outcome of intense and protracted mental effort, 
and it may be surmised that he first gained a clear 
conception of his system from general considera- 
tions and by analytic (algebraic) methods before he 
was able to present it synthetically. Expositions in 
this cumbersome Euclidean form are by no means 
alluring, and it is possibly due mainly to this fact 
that the significance of Lobachevski's and Bolyai's 
labors received such tardy recognition. 

Lobachevski developed only the consequences of 
the modification of Euclid's Fifth Postulate. But if 
we abandon the Euclidean assertion that "two 
straight lines cannot enclose a space," we shall ob- 
tain a companion-piece to the Lobachevskian geom- 
etry. Restricted to a surface, it is the geometry of 
the surface of a sphere. In place of the Euclidean 
straight lines we have great circles, all of which 
intersect twice and of which each pair encloses two 
spherical lunes. There are therefore no parallels. 
Riemann first intimated the possibility of an analo- 
gous geometry for three-dimensional space (of 
positive curvature), — a conception that does not ap- 
pear to have occurred even to Gauss, possibly owing 
to his predilection for infinity. And Helmholtz,* 
who continued the researches of Riemann physically, 
neglected in his turn, in his first publication, the de- 

^"Ueber die thatsächlichen Grundlagen der Geometrie," 
Wissensch. Abhandl., 1866. II., p. 610 et seq. 



134 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

velapment of the Lobachevskian case of a space of 
negative curvature (with an imaginary parameter 
k)\ The consideration of this case is in point of 
fact more obvious to the mathematician than it is to 
the physicist. Helmholtz treats in the publication 
mentioned only the Euclidean case of the curvature 
zero and Riemann's space of positive curvature. 

Applicability of the Different Systems to 
Reality. 

We are able, accordingly, to represent the facts 
of spatial observation with all possible precision by 
both the Euclidean geometry and the geometries of 
Lobachevski and Riemann, provided in the two lat- 
ter cases we take the parameter k large enough. 
Physicists have as yet found no reason for depart- 
ing from the assumption fe= oo of the Euclidean 
geometry. It has been their practice, the result of 
long and tried experience, to adhere steadfastly to 
the simplest assumptions until the facts forced their 
complication or modification. This accords likewise 
with the attitude of all great mathematicians to- 
ward applied geometry. The deportment of phys- 
icists and mathematicians toward these ques- 
tions is in the main diflferent, but this is 
explained by the circumstance that for the 
former class of inquirers the physical facts are of 
most significance, geometry being for them merely 
a convenient implement of investigation, while for 
the latter class these very questions are the main 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS I35 

material of research, and of greatest technical and 
particularly epistemological interest. Supposing a * 
mathematician to have modified tentatively the sim- 
plest and most immediate assumptions of our geo- 
metrical experience, and supposing his attempt to 
have been productive of fresh insight, certainly 
nothing is more natural than that these researches 
should be prosecuted farther from a purely mathe- 
matical interest. Analogues of the geometry we 
are familiar with, are constructed on broader and 
more general assumptions for any number of di- 
mensions, with no pretension of being regarded as 
more than intellectual scientific experiments and 
with no idea of being applied to reality. In sup- 
port of my remark it will be sufficient to advert to 
the advances made in mathematics by Clifford, 
Klein, Lie, and others. Seldom have thinkers be- 
come so absorbed in revery, or so far estranged from 
reality, as to imagine for our space a number of 
dimensions exceeding the three of the given space 
of sense, or to conceive of representing that space 
by any geometry that departs appreciably from the 
Euclidean. Gauss, Lobachevski, Bolyai, and Rie- 
mann were perfectly clear on this point, and cannot 
certainly be held responsible for the grotesque fic- 
tions which were subsequently constructed in this 
domain. 

It little accords with the principles of a physicist 
to make suppositions regarding the deportment of 
geometrical constructs in infinity and in non-acces- 
sible places, then subsequently to compare them 



136 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

with our immediate experience and adapt them to 
it. He prefers, like Stolz, to regard what is directly 
given as the source of his ideas, which he likewise 
considers applicable to what is inaccessible until 
obliged to change them. But he too may be ex- 
tremely grateful for the discovery that there exist 
several sufficing geometries, that we can make shift 
also with 2i finite space, etc., — grateful in short, for 
the abolition of certain conventional barriers of 
thought. 

If we lived on the surface of a planet with a tur- 
bid, opaque atmosphere and if, on the supposition 
that the surface of the earth was a plane and our 
only instruments were square and chain, we were 
to undertake geodetic measurements; then the in- 
crease in the excess of the angle-sum of large tri- 
angles would soon compel us to substitute a spher- 
ometry for our planimetry. The possibility of an- 
alogous experiences in three-dimensional space the 
physicist cannot as a matter of principle reject, al- 
though the phenomena that would compel the ac- 
ceptance of a Lobachevskian or a Riemannian ge- 
ometry would present so odd a contrast with those 
to which we have been hitherto accustomed, that no 
one wiir regard their actual occurrence as probable. 

The question whether a given physical object is 
a straight line or the arc of a circle is not properly 
formulated. A stretched chord or a ray of light is 
certainly neither the one nor the other. The ques- 
tion is simply whether the object so spatially reacts 
that it conforms better to the one concept than to 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS . I37 

the Other, and whether with the exactitude which is 
sufficient for us and obtainable by us it conforms at 
all to any geometric concept. Excluding the latter 
case, the question arises, whether we can in practice 
remove, or at least in thought determine and make 
allowance for, the deviation from the straight line 
or circle, in other words, correct the result of the 
measurement. But we are ^ dependent always, in 
practical measurements, on the comparison of phys- 
ical objects. If on direct investigation these coin- 
cided with the geometric concepts to the highest at- 
tainable point of accuracy, but the indirect results 
of the measurement deviated more from the theory 
than the consideration of all possible errors per- 
mitted, then certainly we should be obliged to 
change our physico-metric notions. The physicist 
will do well to await the occurrence of such a situa- 
tioil, while in the meantime the mathematician may 
be allowed full and free scope for his speculations. 

The Concepts of Mathematics and Physics. 

Of all the concepts which the natural inquirer 
employs, the simplest are the concepts of space and 
time. Spatial and temporal objects conforming to 
his conceptual constructs can be framed with great 
exactness. Nearly every observable deviation can 
be eliminated. We can imagine any spatial or tem- 
poral construct realized without doing violence to 
any fact. The other physical properties of bodies 
are so intimately interconnected that in their case 
arbitrary fictions are subjected to narrow restric- 



138 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

tions by the facts. A perfect gas, a perfect fluid, a 
perfectly elastic body does not exist; the physicist 
knows that his fictions conform only approximately 
and by arbitrary simplifications to the facts; he is 
perfectly aware of the deviation, which cannot be re- 
moved. We can conceive a sphere, a plane, etc., 
constructed with unlimited exactness, without run- 
ning counter to any fact. Hence, when any new 
physical fact occurs which renders a modification of 
our concepts necessary, the physicist always prefers 
to sacrifice the less perfect concepts of physics rather 
than the simpler, more perfect, and more lasting 
ccwicepts of geometry, which form the solidest 
foundation of all his theories. 

But the physicist can derive in another direction 
substantial assistance from the labors of geometers. 
Our geometry refers always to objects of sensuous 
experience. But the moment we begin to operate 
with mere things of thought like atoms and mole- 
cules, which from their very nature can never be 
made the objects of sensuous contemplation, we are 
under no obligation whatever to think of them as 
standing in spatial relationships which are peculiar 
to the Euclidean three-dimensional space of our sen- 
suous experience. This may be recommended to the 
special attention of thinkers who deem atomistic 
speculations indispensable.^ 



* While still an upholder of the atomic theory, I sought to 
explain the line-spectra of gases by the vibrations of the atomic 
constituents of a gas-molecule with respect to another. The 
difficulties which I here encountered suggested to me (1863) 
the idea that non-sensuous things did not necessarily have to 



from the point of view of physics i39 

The Relativity of All Spatial Relations. 

Let us go back in thought to the origin of geom- 
etry in the practical needs of life. The recognition 
of the spatial substantiality and spatial invariability 
of spatial objects in spite of their movements is a 
biological necessity for human beings, for spatial 
quantity is related directly to the quantitative satis- 
faction of our needs. When knowledge of this sort 
is not sufficiently provided for by our physiological 
organization, we employ our hands and feet for 
comparing the spatial objects. When we begin to 
compare bodies with one another, we enter the 
domain of physics, whether we employ our hands 
or an artificial measure. All physical determinations 
are relative. Consequently, likewise all geomet- 
rical determinations possess validity only relatively 
to the measure. The concept of measurement is 
a concept of relation, which contains nothing not 
contained in the measure. In geometry we sim- 
ply assume that the measure will always and every- 
where coincide with that with which it has at 
some other time and in some other place coincided. 
But this assum|)tion is determinative of nothing con- 
be pictured in our sensuous space of three dimensions. In this 
way I also lighted upon analogues of spaces of different num- 
bers of dimensions. The collateral study of various physio- 
logical manifolds (see footnote on page 98 of this book) led 
me to the problems discussed in the conclusion of this paper. 
The notion of finite spaces, converging parallels, etc., which 
can come only from a historical study of geometry, was at that 
time remote from me. I believe that my critics would have 
done well had they not overlooked the italicised paragraph. 
For details see the notes to my Erhaltung der Arbeit, Prague, 
1872. 



140 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

cerning the measure. In place of spatial physiolog- 
ical equality is substituted an altogether differently 
defined physical equality, which must not be con- 
founded with the former, no more than the indica- 
tions of a thermometer are to be identified with the 
sensation of heat. The practical geometer, it is true, 
determines the dilatation of a heated measure, by 
means of a measure kept at a constant temperature, 
and takes account of the fact that the relation of con- 
gruence in question is disturbed by this non-spatial 
physical circumstance. But to the pure theory of 
space all assumptions regarding the measure are for- 
eign. Simply the physiologically created habit of 
regarding the measure as invariable is tacitly but un- 
justifiably retained. It would be quite superfluous 
and meaningless to assume that the measure, and 
therefore bodies generally, suffered alterations on 
displacement in space, or that they remained un- 
changed on such displacement, — a fact which in 
its turn could only be determined by the use of a 
new measure. The relativity of all spatial relations 
is made manifest by these considerations. 

Introduction of the Notion of Number. 

If the criterion of spatial equality is substantially 
modified by the introduction of measure, it is sub- 
jected to a still further modification, or intensifica- 
tion, by the introduction of the notion of number 
into geometry. There is nicety of distinction gained 
by this introduction which the idea of congruence 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS I4I 

alone could never have attained. The application 
of arithmetic to geometry leads to the notion of in- 
commensurability and irrationality. Our geometric 
concepts therefore contain adscititious elements not 
intrinsic to space; they represent space with a cer- 
tain latitude, and, arbitrarily also, with greater pre- 
cision than spatial observation alone could possibly 
ever realize. This imperfect contact between fact 
and concept explains the possibility of different sys- 
tems of geometry.^ 

Significance of the Metageometric Move- 
ment. 

The entire movement which led to the transforma- 
tion of our ideas of geometry must be characterized 
as a sound and healthful one. This movement, 
which began centuries ago but is now greatly inten- 
sified, is not to be looked upon as having terminated. 
On the contrary, we are quite justified in the ex- 
pectation that it will long continue, and redound not 
only to the great advancement of mathematics and 
geometry, especially in an epistemological regard, 
but also to that of the other sciences. This move- 
ment was, it is true, powerfully stimulated by a few 
eminent men, but it sprang, nevertheless, not from 
an individual, but from a general need. This 
will be seen from the difference in the pro- 
fit would be too much to expect of matter that it should 
realize all the atomistic fantasies of the physicist. So, too, 
space, as an object of experience, can hardly be expected to 
satisfy all the ideas of the mathematician, though there be no 
doubt whatever as to the general value of their investigations. 



M I 



142 SPACE AND GEOMETRY 

fessions of the men who have taken part in it. Not 
only the mathematician, but also the philosopher 
and the educationist, have made considerable contri- 
butions to it. So, too, the methods pursued by the 
different inquirers are not unrelated. Ideas which 
Leibnitz* uttered recur in slightly altered form in 
Fourier,^ Lobachevski, Bolyai, and H. Erb.* The 
philosopher Ueberweg,* closely approaching in his 
opposition to Kant the views of the psychologist 
Beneke,'* and in his geometrical ideas starting from 
Erb (which later writer mentions K. A. Erb® as his 
predecessor) anticipates a goodly portion of Helm- 
holtz's labors. 

Summary. 

The results to which the preceding discussion has 
led, may be summarized as follows: 

1. The source of our geometric concepts has 
been found to be experience. 

2. The character of the concepts satisfying the 



*See above pp. 66-67. 

^ Stances de VEcole Normale. Dehats. Vol. I., 1800, p. 28. 

"H. Erb, Grossherzoglich Badischer Finanzrath, Die Pro- 
bleme der geraden Linie, des Winkels und der ebenen Fläche, 
Heidelberg, 1846. 

*"Die Principien der Geometrie wissenschaftlich darge- 
stellt." Archiv für Philologie und Pädagogik. 1851. Re- 
printed in Brasch's Welt- und Lebensanschauung F. Ueber- 
wegs, Leipzig, 1889, pp. 263-317. 

'^ Logik als Kunstlehre des Denkens, Berlin, 1842, Vol. IT., 
pp. 51-55. 

^ Zur Mathematik und Logik, Heidelberg, 1821. I was un- 
able to examine this work. 



FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF PHYSICS I43 

same geometrical facts has been shown to be many 
and varied. 

3. By the comparison of space with other mani- 
folds, more general concepts have been reached, of 
which the geometric represents a special case. Geo- 
metric thought has thus been freed from conven- 
tional limitations, heretofore imagined insuperable. 

4. By the demonstration of the existence of 
manifolds allied to but different from space, en- 
tirely new questions have been suggested. What 
is space physiologically, physically, geometrically? 
To what are its specific properties to be attributed, 
since others are also conceivable? Why is space 
three-dimensional, etc. ? 

^ With questions such as these, though ^ve must not 
expect the answer to-day or to-morrow, we stand 
before the entire profundity of the domain to be 
investigated. We shall say nothing of the inept 
strictures of the Boeotians, whose coming Gauss 
predicted; and whose attitude determined him to re- 
serve. But what shall we say to the acrid and cap- 
tious criticisms to which Gauss, Riemann and their 
associates have been subjected by men of highest 
standing in the scientific world? Have these men 
never experienced in their own persons the truth 
that inquirers on the outermost boundaries of 
knowledge frequently discover many things that 
will not slip smoothly into all heads, but which are 
not on that account arrant nonsense? True, such 
inquirers are liable to error, but even the errors of 
some men are often more fruitful in their conse- 
quences than the discoveries of others. 



INDEX. 



Acute angle, 119. 
Agrimensores, 46. 
Angle, iro; Measurement of the, 

76. 
Angle-sum of a triangle, 116; of 

large triangles, 136. 
Anschauung, 61 n, ff., 75, 83, 89, 

90. 
Anti-Euclidean geometry, 122. 
A priori theory of space, 34. 
Archytas, 37. 
Area, Measures of, 70. 
Aristarchus, 37. 
Atomic theory, 138 n. 
Attention, Locality of the, 13. 
Augustine, St., 37. 
Axioms» Eleventh and Twelfth, 

114. 

Becker, Bernard, iii n. 

Biol<^:ical necessity paramount in 
the perception of space, 25; 
theory of apatiai perception, 3z. 

Blind person. Sensations of, 20, 

Bodice All measurement by, 47; 
Geometry requires experience 
concerning, 38 C; Spatial per- 
manency of, 82; Spatially un- 
alterable physical, 71. 

Bolyai, 119^ 125 tL 

Boondarics^ 126. 

Bo^s Uw, 5S. 

Breuer, tj n. 

Cantor, M^ 46 n-, S' o-» 72»- 
Caitcsian gffomrtry, j6; system of 

f^ lyniinaffs, 93* 
Caralieri, 50. 
Qnldrai, Dravings of, 5$. 



Circular measure, xxo. 

Clifford, 135. 

Color-sensations, 99. 

Colors, Analogies of space with, 

98. 
Comparison, Bodies of, 43. 
Concepts of geometry, 84; arise 

on the basis of experience, 62. 
Constancy, Notion of, 40; Spatial, 

53. 
Counting, Experiments in, 98 n. 
Curvature, Measure of, 107 ff. 

Deductive geometry, 112. 

Delboeuf, 119. 

De Tilly, 80 n. 

Directions, Three cardinal, 18, 

Distance, 78. 

Dvorak, 24. 

Egyptians, Land-surveying among, 

54- 
Eisenlohr, 46 n. 
Equality, 44- 
Erb, 142. 
Euclid, 63 n«, 113, 114, 116 If.; 

Space of, 6. 
Euclidean geometry, 71 n«, 116 If. 
Eudenuu^ 54. 
Euler, 7. 
Experience^ source of our knowU 

edge, 6j. 
Ejqierimenting in thought, 75, 86. 

Fictions, 138. 

Figures in demr/nstrations» tocz/T' 

rect, 93- 
Fluid, A perfect, 138, 
Fourier, 142, 



146 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 



Galileo, 100. 

Gas, A perfect, 138. 

Gauss, 50, 84, 97, 115, 121, 143. 

Geometric concepts, 94; and phys- 
iological space. Correspondence 
of, 11; instruction, 68; knowl- 
edge, Various sources of our, 
83; space, 5 ff. 

Geometry, compared with physics, 
124; Applicability of the differ- 
ent systems of, to reality, .134; 
Concepts of, arise on the basis 
of experience, 82; concerned 
with ideal objects produced by 
the schematization of experi- 
mental objects, 68; Deductive, 
112; Early discoveries in, 109; 
Empirical origin of, 67, 109; 
Experimental, 58; from the 
point of view of physical in- 
quiry, 94 ff.; Fundamental as- 
sumptions of, 42, 49, 97; Fun- 
damental facts and concepts of, 
84; Physical origin of, 43; Phys- 
iological influences in, 35; Prac- 
tical origin of, 53; Present form 
of, 90; Psychology and natural 
development of, 38 ff.; Real 
problem of, 70; Riemann*s con- 
ception of, 96; requires expe- 
rience concerning bodies, 38 ff.; 
Role of volume in the begin- 
nings of, 45; Systems of 94, 
132 ff.; Technical and scientific 
development of, 69 ; Visual sense 
in, 81. 

Gerhardt, 51 n. 

Giordano, Vitale, 64 n. 

Hankel, 56 n. 

Haptic space, 10. See also Touch, 

Space of. 
Helmholtz, 51, 133. 
Herbart, 113. 
Hering, 5, 13, 14, 19. 
Herodotus, 36, 47 n., 54. 
Holder, 49 n. 

Idealizations of experience, 97. 
Imaginary quantities, 104. 
Impenetrability, jz- 



Incommensurability, 141. 
Indivisibles, Method of, 51. 
Inequality, 44. 
Infinitesimal method, 49. 
Irrationality, 141. 

James, Prof. William, 13, 14, 15. 

Kant, 34, 80, 90. 
Killing, W., 49 n. 
Klein, 135. 
Kosack, III n. 
Kronecker, xo8. 

Labyrinthine canals, 27, 

Lactantius, 36. 

Lagrange, 103. 

Lambert, 116, 120 ff. 

Land-surveying among the Egyp- 
tians, 54. 

Leibnitz, 50, 640., 66, 67 n., 71 n. 

Length as fundamental measure, 
78. 

Lever, Law of the, 59. 

Lie, 135. 

Lines, 49. 

Lobach6vski, 119; and Bolyai, 
Contributions of 125 ff. 

Locality of sensation, 7. 

Locative qualities, 95. 

Loeb, 23 n. 

Manifold, Riemann's conception 
of an M-fold continuous, 105. 

Manifolds, 109; Multiply-extend- 
ed, 98 ff. 

Mathematics and physics, Con- 
cepts of, 137. 

Measure, Concept of, 71; Funda- 
mental, 78, no; of curvature, 
121. 

Measures dependent on one an- 
other, real problem of geometry, 
70; Names of the oldest, 45. 

Measurement, 44; a physical reac- 
tion, 62; Volume the basis of, 
81. 

Mental experiment, 86. 

Metageometric movement. Signifi- 
cance of the, 141. 

Metageometricians, Space of, 6. 



INDEX. 



147 



Metageometry, 94 n. 
Metrie space, 7. 

.Motion, Rate of, felt directly, 24- 
Movement, Sensations of, 2^ 
Müller, Johannes, s« 
Multiply - extended "magnitude," 
97. 

Necessity, Biological, paramount 
in the perception of space, 25. 

Number, Introduction of the no- 
tion of, 140; a product of the 
mind, 98 n. 

Obtuse angle, 119. 

Oppel, 24. 

Ornamental themes, 55« 

Paper-folding, 57- 
Papyrus Rhind, 46 n. 
Parabola, Quadrature of the, 52. 
Parallels, 112, 114, 127; Saccheri's 
theory of, 1x6; Theorem of, 

59. 

Paving, 59. 

Physical origin of geometry, 43. 
61. 

Physics and mathematics, Concepts 
of, 137; Properties of physio- 
logical space traceable in, 36. 

Physiological and geometrical 
space, 5 ff. 

Plane, The, 64, 65. 

Plateau, 6, 24. 

Playfair, 56 n. 

Postulate, Fifth, 114. 

Proclus, 54- 

Psychology and natural develop- 
ment of geometry, 38 ff 

Ptolemy, 7- 

Purkynje, 28. 

Pythagorean theorem, 55. 7«' 

Rays of light, 82. 

Relativity of all spatial relations, 

Riemann, 105; his conception of 

geometry, 9, 96 ff. 
Rigidity, Notion of, 42. 
Rope-stretching. 82. 



Rotation, 109; about the vertical 
axis, 24. 

Saccheri's theory of parallels, 
116 ff. 

Saunderson, blind geometer, 21. 

Scholasticism, 114. 

Schopenhauer, 113. 

Schweickart, 125. 

Scientific presentation, ix3> 

Semicircle, All angles right angles 
in a, 61. 

Sensation, All, spatial in charac- 
ter, 13; in its biological rela- 
tionship, 16; of movement, ZT. 

Sensations, Complexes of, 39; Iso- 
lated, 39* 

Sensational qualities, 95' 

Sense-impression, ZZ' 

Sensible space, a system of grad- 
uated feelings, 17. 

Skin, Space-sense of the, 8. 

Snell, ^o. 

Sophists, 113* 

Sosikles, 36. 

Sound, Localizing sources of, 14- 

Space, A priori theory of, 34; 
Analogies of, with colors, 98; 
Analogies of, with time, 100; 
and time as sensational mani- 
folds, 102; Biological necessity 
paramount in the perception of, 
35; Correspondence of physio- 
logical and geometric, 11; Feel- 
ings of, involve stimulus to mo- 
tion, 2z\ Four-dimensional, xo8; 
from the point of view of phys- 
ical inquiry, 94 ff'J Mere pas- 
sive contemplation of, 62; Met- 
ric, 7; of Euclid, 6; of meta- 
geometricians, 6; of touch, 7ff.; 
of vision, 5 ff.; Our notions of, 
94; Physiological and geomet- 
rical, 5; Primary and second- 
ary, 30; Riemannian, 9; Sense 
of, dependent on biological 
function, 10 ff.; Three-dimen- 
sional, 108. 
Space-sensation, 33; System of, 

finite, II. 
Spatial perception. Biological the- 



148 



SPACE AND GEOMETRY. 



ory of, 52; relations» Relativity 
of all, 139. 

Steiner, 70. 

Steinhauser, 14. 

Stolz, 122, 136. 

Stone-workers of Assyria, Egypt, 
Greece, etc., 55. 

Straight line, 62, 63, 75, 86 n., 
no, 136. 

Substantiality, Spatial, 41; Tem- 
poral, 100. 

Surfaces, 49; Measurement of, 46, 
69; of constant curvature, 107. 

Symbols, 108; Exetension of, 103. 

Symmetric figures, 80. 

Tactual and visual space corre- 
lated, 19; sensibility, 10; space, 
Biological importance of, 18. 

Taurinus, 125. 

Teleological explanation of sense- 
adaptation, 12. 

Thibaut, 56. 

Thought, Experiment in, 62, 86. 

Three dimensions of space, 98 n.; 
Origin of the, 18. 

Thucydides, 47 n. 

Time and space as sensational 
manifolds. Difference of the 
analogies of, 102. 

Tonal sensations, loi. 

Tones, spatial, 14. 

Touch, Space of, 7 ff. 

Trendelenburg, 113, 



Triangle, Angle-sum of, 56, 59, 

in; Geometry of the, 71. 
Troltsch, 14 n. 
Tropisms of animals, 6a. 
Tylor, 57. 

Ueberweg, 142. 

Validity, Universal, 92. 

Vision, Space of, 5 ff. 

Visual and tactual space corre- 
lated, 19; sense in geometry, 81. 

Visualization (Anschauung), 61 
ff'* 7S* 83, 89, 90; of space, 
qualitative, 87. 

Volume of bodies. Conservation 
of the, 73; Role of, in the be- 
ginnings of geometry, 45; the 
basis of measurement, 81. 

Voluminousness ascribed to sen- 
sations, 14. 

Wallis, 119. 
Weaving, 54. 
Weber, E. H., 8, 10. 
Weissenborn, 51 n. 
Will, The central motor organ and 
the, to move, 25. 

Xerxes, 47. 

Zindler, 91 n. 
Zoth, 7. 



TITLE LIST OF OPEN COURT PUBLICATIONS 
ARRANGED ALPHABETICALLY BY AUTHORS 



ANESAKI, M. 
345. BUDDHIST AND CHRISTIAN GOSPELS, Being Gospel Paral- 
lels from Pali Texts. Now first compared from the originals 
by Albert J. Edmunds. Edited with parallels and notes from 
the Chinese Buddhist Triptaka by if. Anesaki $1.50 net. 

BAYNE, JULIA TAFT. 
323. HADLEY BALLADS. Julia Taft Bayne, 75c net. 

BERKELEY,' GEORGE. 

307. A TREATISE CONCERNING THE PRINCIPLES OF HUMAN 

KNOWLEDGE. George Berkeley. Cloth, 6oc net. (3s. net.) 

308. THREE DIALOGUES BETWEEN HYLAS AND PHILONOUS. 

George Berkeley. Qoth, 60c net. (3s. net.) 

BINET, ALFRED, 
aoi. THE PSYCHIC LIFE OF MICRO-ORGANISMS. Alfred Binet. 
75c (38. 6d.) 

270. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF REASONING. Alfred Binet. TransL 
by Adam Gowans Whyte, 75c net. (3s. 6d.) 

296. ON DOUBLE CONSCIOUSNESS. Alfred Binet. Cloth. 50c net. 
(as. 6d. net.) 

BLOOMFIELD, MAURICE, 

334. CERBERUS, THE DOG OF HADES. The History of an Idea. 
Prof. M. Bloomdeld. Boards, 50c net. (as. 6d. net.) 

BONNEY, HONORABLE CHARLES CARROLL. 
304. WORLD'S CONGRESS ADDRESSES, Delivered by the Presi- 
dent, the Hon. C. C. Bonney. Cloth, 50c net. (as. 6d. net.) 

BONNEY, FLORENCE PEORIA. 

286. MEDITATIONS (Poems). Florence Peoria Bonney. Qoth, $x.oo 

net.) 

BUDGE, E .A. WALLIS. 

325. THE GODS OF THE EGYPTIANS OR STUDIES IN EGYP- 
TIAN MYTHOLOGY. E. A. Wallis Budge. With plates and 
illustnitions. 2 vols. Qoth, $20.00 net. 

226. THE BOOK OF THE DEAD, a translation of the Chapters^ 
Hymns, etc., of the Theban Recension« E. A. Wallis Budge* 
lUustratcd. 3 vols. $3-75 Pcr set net. Vols. VI, VII, VIII 
in the series of Books on Egypt and Chaldea. 



rSend for Complete Illustrated Catalogue.' 



TITLE LIST 



317. A HISTORY OF EGYPT, From the End of the NeoUthlc Period 
to the Death of Cleopatra VII, B. C. 30. B, A, IVallis Budge. 
Richly Uluatrated. 8 toIs. Qoth. $xo.oo net. 

I. Egirpt in the Neolithic and Archaic Period. 

II. Egypt Under the Great Pyramid Builders. 

III. Egypt Under the Amenembata and Hykao«. 

IV. Egypt and her Asiatic Empire. 

V. Egypt Under Rametes the Great. 

VI. Egypt Under the Priest Kings and Tanites and Nubians. 

VII. Egypt Under the Saites, Persians and Ptolemies. 

VIII. Egypt Under the Ptolemies and Cleopatra VII. 

CARUS, DR. PAUL. 
404. FUNDAMENTAL PROBLEMS, the Method of PhUosophy as a 
Systematic Arrangement of Knowledge. Poui Cams. Qoth, 
$1.50. (7S. 6d.) 

- ao7. THE SOUL OF MAN, an Investigation of the Facto of Physio- 
logical and Experimental Psychology. Pau^ Cams. Illustrated. 
Cloth, $1.50 net. (6s. net.) 

>ao8. PRIMER OF PHILOSOPHY. Poui Cams. Cloth, $1.00. (5s.) 

^410. MONISM AND MELIORISM, A Philosophical Essay on Causal 
ity and Ethics. Paul Cams. Paper, 50c. (2s. 6d.) 

213. (a) THE PHILOSOPHY OF THE TOOL 10c. (6d.) (b) OUR 
NEED OF PHILOSOPHY, sc (3d.) (c) SCIENCE A 
RELIGIOUS REVELATION, sc . (3d.) Paul Cams. 

ago. THE SURD OF METAPHYSICS, An Inquinr into the Question 
Aax THsas Things-in-thxmsxlves? Paul Cams, Cloth, $x.ss 
net. (s>* 6d. neL) 

' 303. KANT AND SPENCER, A Study of the Fallacies of Agnosticism. 
Paul Carus. Goth, soc net. (as. 6d. net.) 

.3X3. KANT'S PROLEGOMENA TO ANY FUTURE METAPHYS- 
ICS. Edited by Paul Cams. Cloth, 75c net. (38. 6d. net.) 

J 15. THE (K)SPEL OF BUDDHA, According to Old Records, told by 
Paul Cams. Qoth, $1.00. (ss.) 

aS4. BUDDHISM AND ITS CHRISTIAN CRITICS. Paul Cams. 
$1.25. (68. 6d.) 

a6i. CK>DWARD, A Record of Religious Progress. Paul Carus. soc 
(28. 6d.) 

«78. THE HISTORY OF THE DEVIL AND THE IDEA OF EVIL, 
From the Earliest Times to the Present day. Paul Cams. Il- 
lustrated. $6.00. (30s.) 

a8o. HISTORY OF THE CROSS- Paul Cams. (In preparation.) 

321. THE AGE OF CHRIST. A Brief Review of the Conditions 
under which Christianity originated. Paul Carus. Paper, xsc 
net. (lod.) 

341. THE DHARMA, or the Religion of Enlightenment, An Exposi- 
tion of Buddhism. Paul Cams. i$c. (gd.) . 

216. DAS EVANGELIUM BUDDHAS. A German translation of Thb 
Gospel of Buddba. Cloth, $1.25. (5 marks.) 



TSend for Complete Illustrated Catalogue.^t 



OPEN COtJRT PUBLICATIONS 



2SS- LAO-TZE*S TAO TEH. KING. Chinete English. With Introduc- 
tion, Transliteration and Notes by Paul Carus, $3.00 (15s.) 

«75. THE WORLD'S PARUAMENT OF RELIGIONS AND THE 
RELIGIOUS PARLIAMENT EXTENSION, a Memorial Pub- 
lished by the Religious Parliament Extension Committee. Popu- 
lar edition. C. C* Bonney and Paul Carus, 

205. HOMILIES OF SCIENCE. Paul Carus, Cloth, gilt top, $1.50. 
(78. 6d.) 

^ 206. THE IDEA OF GOD. Paul Carus. Paper, 15c. (9d.) 

N^aix. THE RELIGION OF SCIENCE. Paul Carus. Cloth, 500 net. 
(2S. 6d.) 

aiJ. KARMA. A STORY OF BUDDHIST ETHICS. Paul Carus. 
Illustrated by Kwason Suguki, American edition, xsc (xod.) 

^268. THE ETHICAL PROBLEM. Three Lectures on Ethics as a 
Science. Paul Carus, Cloth, $1.25. (68. 6d.) 

^••285. WHENCE AND WHITHER. An Inquiry into the Nature of 
the Soul, Its Origin and Its Destiny. Paul Carus. Cloth, 75c 
net. (3s. 6d. net.) 

291. NIRVANA, A STORY OF BUDDHIST PSYCHOLOGY, Paul 
Carus. Illustrated by Kwason SusukL Cloth, 60c net. (38. net.) 

302. THE DAWN OF A NEW RELIGIOUS ERA, AND OTHER 
ESSAYS. Paul Carus. Cloth, 50c net. (2s. 6d. net.) 

209. TRUTH IN FICTION, Twelve Tales with a Moral. Paul Carus. 
Qoth, x.oo net. (5s.) 

217. KARMA, A STORY OF EARLY BUDDHISM. Paul Carus, 
Illustrated. Crepe paper, tied in silk. 75c. (3s. 6d.) 

21 7G. KARMA, Eine buddhistische Erzählung. Paul Carus, Illustrated. 
3SC. 

246. THE CROWN OF THORNS, a story of the Time of Christ, 

Paul Carus. Illustrated. Cloth 75c net. (3s. 6d. net.) 

247. THE CHIEFS DAUGHTER, a Legend of Niagara. Paul Carus. 

Illustrated. Qoth, $x.oo net (4s. 6d.) 

267. SACRED TUNES FOR THE CONSECRATION OF LIFE. 
H]nnns of the Religion of Science. Paul Carus. 50c. 

281. GREEK MYTHOLOGY. Paul Carus. In preparation. 

282. EROS AND PSYCHE, A Fairy-Tale of Ancient Greece, Retold 

after Apuleius, by Paul Carus, Illustrated. $1.50 net. (6s. net) 

^^295. THE NATURE OF THE STATE. Paul Carus. Qoth 50c net 
(28. 6d. net) 

224. GOETHE AND SCHILLER'S XENIONS. Selected and trans- 
lated by Paul Carus. Paper, 50c. (2s. 6d.) 

243. FRIEDRICH SCHILLER, A Sketch of His Life and an Appre. 
elation of His Poetry. Paul Carus. Bds. 75c. 



O'Ssnd for CompUto Illustraiod Cataloguo.' 



TITLE LIST 



CLEMENT, ERNEST W. 
331. THE JAPANESE FLORAL CALENDAR. E, W, Clement. Il- 
lustrated. Boards, 50c net. (as. 6d. net.) 

CONWAY, MONCURE DANIEL. 
277. SOLOMON AND SOLOMONIC LITERATURE. M, D. Conway. 
Cloth, $1.50 net. (6s.) 

COPE, E. D. 
219. THE PRIMARY FACTORS OF ORGANIC EVOLUTION. E. 
D, Cope, Ph. D, ad ed. Illustrated. Cloth, $a.oo net. (los.) 

CORNILL, CARL HEINRICH, 
aao. THE PROPHETS OF ISRAEL, Popular Sketches from Old 
Testament History. C. H, ComUl, Transl. by S. F. Corkran. 
' $1.00 net. (5s.) 

as9. THE HISTORY OF THE PEOPLE OF ISRAEL, From the 
Earliest Times to the Destruction of Jerusalem by the Romans. 
C. H. CornUl. Transl. by IV. H. Carruth. Cloth, $1.50 (78. 6d.) 

a6a. GESCHICHTE DES VOLKES ISRAEL, C. H. Cornill. Ge- 
bunden $a.oo. (8 Mark.) 

as I. THE RISE OF THE PEOPLE OF ISRAEL. C. H. Cornill. in 
Epitomes of Thsbb Sciences: Comparative Philology, Psy- 
chology AND Old Testament History. H. H. Oldenberg, /. 
Jastrow, C. H. Cornill, Colth, 50c net. (as. 6d.) 

CUMONT, FRANZ. 

319. THE MYSTERIES OF MITHRA. Prof. Frans Cumont. Transl. 
by T. J. McCormack. lUus. Cloth, $1.50 net. (6s. 6d. net.) 

DEDEKIND, RICHARD. 

a87. ESSAYS ON THE THEORY OF NUMBERS. L Continuity 
AND Irrational Numbers. II. The Nature and Meaning of 
Numbers. R. Dedekind. Transl. by W. W. Beman. Cloth, 
75c net. (3s. 6d. net.) 

DELITZSCH, DR. FRIEDRICH. 

a93. BABEL AND BIBLE, A Lecture on the Significance of Assyrio- 
logical Research for Religion. Prof. F. Delitzsch. Translated 
by T. J. McCormack. Illustrated, see net. 

a93a. BABEL AND BIBLE. Two Lectures on the Significance of 
Assyriological Research for Religion, Embodying the most im- 
portant Criticisms and the Author's Replies. Prof. F. Delitzsch. 
Translated by T. J. McCormack and *K. H, Carruth. 75c net 

DE MORGAN, AUGUSTUS. 
a64. ON THE STUDY AND DIFFICULTIES OF MATHEMATICS. 
Augustus DeMorgan. Cloth, $i.a5 net. (4s. 6d. net.) 

J7I. ELEMENTARY ILLUSTRATIONS OF THE DIFFERENTIAL 
AND INTEGRAL CALCULUS. Augustus DeMorgan. Cloth, 
$1.00 net. (48. 6d. net.) 

^ 

trSend for Completg Illustraied Caialogue.'^Bk 



OPEN COURT PUBLICATIONS 



DESCARTES, RENE. 
301. DISCOURSE ON THE METHOD OF RIGHTLY CONDUCT 

ING THE REASON AND SEEKING TRUTH IN THE SCI 

ENCES. RenS Descartes, Transl. by John Veitch. Cloth, 6oc 

net. (38. net.) 
310. THE MEDITATIONS AND SELECTIONS FROM THE PRIN- 

CIPLES of RenS Descartes. Transl. hyJohn Veitch, Cloth, 

75c net. (38. 6d. net.) 
346. THE PRINCIPLES OF DESCARTES' PHILOSOPHY by Bene- 

dictus de Spinoza. Introduction by H albert Hains Brit an, Ph. 

D. Cloth, 75c net, mailed 85c. 

DE VRIES, HUGO. 
33a. SPECIES AND VARIETIES. THEIR ORIGIN BY MUTA- 
TION. Prof. Hugo de Vries. Edited by D. T. MacDougat. 
$5.00 net. (2 IS. net.) 

EDMUNDS, ALBERT J. 

218. HYMNS OF THE FAITH (DHAMMAPADA), being an Ancient 
Anthology Preserved in the Sacred Scriptures of the Buddhists. 
Transl. by Albert J. Edmunds. Cloth, $1.00 net. (4s. 6d. net.) 

345. BUDDHIST AND CHRISTIAN GOSPELS, Being Gospel Paral- 
lels from Pali Texts. Now first compared from the originals 
by Albert J. Edmunds. Edited with parallels and notes from 
the Chinese Buddhist Triptaka by M. Anesaki $1.50 net. 

EVANS, HENRY RIDGELY. 
330. THE NAPOLEON MYTH. H. R. Evans. With "The Grand 
Erratum," by /. B. PSris, and Introduction by Paul Cams. 
Illustrated. Boards, 75c net. (38. 6d. net.) 



347. THE OLD AND THE NEW MAGIC. Henry R. Evans. lUustr. 
Cloth, gilt top. $1.50 net, mailed $1.70. 

FECHNER, GUSTAV THEODOR. 

349. ON LIFE AFTER DEATH. Gustav Theodor Fechner. Tr. from 
the German by Hugo Wernekke. Bds. 7 sc. 

FINK, DR. CARL. 
272. A BRIEF HISTORY OF MATHEMATICS. Dr. Karl Fink. 
Transl. from the German by IV. W. Beman and D. E. Smith. 
Cloth, $1.50 net. (5s. 6d. net.) 

FREYTAG, GUSTAV. 
248. MARTIN LUTHER. Gustav Freytag. Transl. hy H. E. O. Heine- 
mann. Illustrated. Cloth, $1.00 net. (5s.) 

221. THE LOST MANUSCRIPT. A Novel. Gustav Freytag. Two 

vols. Cloth, $4.00. (2 IS.) 
22ia. THE SAME. One vol. $1.00. (5s.) 

GARBE, RICHARD. 
223. THE PHILOSOPHY OF ANCIENT INDIA. Prof. R. Garbe. 

Cloth, 50c net. (2s. 6d. net.) 

222. THE REDEMPTION OF THE BRAHMAN. A novel. Richard 

Garbe. Cloth, 7 sc. (3s. 6d.) 



t^Send for Complete Illustrated Catalogue.^Sk 



TITLE LIST 



GOODWIN. REV. T. A. 

335. LOVERS THREE THOUSAND YEARS AGO, M Indicated by 

Thi Bono or SotouoN. Rev. T. A. Cpodwin, 50c net. (3s. 6d.) 

GUNKEL. HERMANN. 

337. THE LEGENDS OF GENESIS. Prof. H. GunkeL Transl. by 

Prof, W. H. CofTMl/i, Cloth, $1.00 net. (4«. 6d. net.) 

HAUPT, PAUL. 
393. BIBLICAL LOVE -DITTIES, A CRITICAL INTERPRETA- 
TION AND TRANSLATION OF THE SONG OF SOLO- 
MON. Prof. Paul Haupt. Paper, sc (3d.) 

HERING. PROF. EWALD. 
398. ON MEMORY AND THE SPECIFIC ENERGIES OF THE 
NERVOUS SYSTEM. E. Hering. CI. 50c net. (as. 6d. net.) 

HILBERT, DAVID. 

389. THE FOUNDATIONS OF GEOMETRY. Prof. David Hubert. 
Tranal. by B. /. Totfnuend. Cloth, $1.00 net. (4a. 6d. net.) 

HOLYOAKE, GEORGE JACOB. 

338. ENGLISH SECULARISM, A Confeaaion of BeUef. G. J. Holy 

oake. Cloth, 50c net. 

HUC, M. 
344. TRAVELS IN TARTARY, THIBET AND CHINA, During the 

Years 1844*5-6. M. Hue, Transl. by W. Haaliit, Illustrated. 

One volume. Iz.35 net. (5s. net.) 
260. THE SAME. Two volumes. $3.00. (los net.) 

HUEPPE, DR. FERDINAND. 
357. THE PRINCIPLES OF BACTERIOLOGY. Ferdinand Hueppe. 
Transl. by Dr. £. O. Jordan. $1.75 net. (9s.) 

HUME, DAVID. 

305. AN ENQUIRY CONCERNING HUMAN UNDEI^STANDING. 

David Hume. Cloth, 60c net. (js. net.) 

306. AN ENQUIRY CONCERNING THE PRINCIPLES OF MOR- 

ALS. David Hume, Qotb, 60c net. (3s. net.) 

HUTCHINSON, WOODS. 
356. THE GOSPEL ACCORDING TO DARWIN. Woods Hutchineon. 
Qoth, $1.50. (6s.) 

HYLAN, JOHN P. 

309. PUBLIC WORSHIP, A STUDY IN THE PSYCHOLOGY OF 
RELIGION. /. P. Hylan. Cloth, 6oc net. (3s. net.) 

INGRAHAM, ANDREW. 

333. SWAIN SCHOOL LE(rrURES. Andrew Ingraham. $1.00 net. 

KHEIRALLA, GEORGE IBRAHIM. 

336. BEHA 'U'LLAH (THE GLORY OF GOD). Ibrahim Georgf 

Kheiralla, assisted by Howard MacNutt. $3,00. 



t^Send for Complete Illustrated Catalogue.' 



OPEN COURT PUBLICATIONS 



LAGRANGE, JOSEPH LOUIS. 
'258. LECTURES ON ELEMENTARY MATHEMATICS. /. L. La- 
grange. Transl. by 7. J. McCormack, Qoth, $x.oo net. (4s. 
6d. net.) 

LEIBNIZ, G. W 

311. LEIBNIZ: DISCOURSE ON METAPHYSICS, CORRESPONl> 
ENCE WITH ARNAULD and MONADOLOGY. Dr.GsorgeR, 
Montgom§ry, Cloth, 75c net. (3s. 6d' net.) 

LEVY-BRUHL, LUCIEN. 
273. HISTORY OF MODERN PHILOSOPHY IN FRANCE. Luctm 
Livy'BruhL With portraits. $3.00 net. (xas. net) 

LOYSON, EMILIE HYACINTHE. 

338. TO JERUSALEM THROUGH THE LANDS OF ISLAM. EmUit 

Hyacinthe Loyson, Illustrated. Qoth, $2.50. 

MACH, ERNST. 

229. THE SCIENCE OF MECHANICS, A Critical and Historical Ac- 

count of its Development. Prof, Ernst Mack, Trsnsl. by T, /. 
McCormack, Illustrated. $2.00 net. (9s. 6d. net.) 

230. POPULAR SCIENTIFIC LECTURES. Profissor Ernst Maeh. 

TransL by T, /. McCormack, lUusL $1.50 net. (7s. 6d. net.) 

250. CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE ANALYSIS OF THE SENSA- 
TIONS. Prof. Ernst Mack. TransL by C. M. IVÜliams. $2.25 
net. (6iL 6d.) 

MILLS, LAWRENCE H. 

3x8. ZARATHUSHTRIAN GATHAS, in Meter and Rhythm. Prof, 
Lawrence H, Mills, Cloth, $2.00. 

339. ZARATHUSHTRA AND THE GREEKS, a Treatise upon the 

Antiquities of the Avesta with Special Reference to the Logos- 
Conception. Prof. Lawronco H. MiUs. Qoth, $2.00 net 

MUELLER, F. MAX. 

231. THREE INTRODUCTORY LECTURES ON THE SCIENCE 

OF THOUGHT. F. Max Müller, With a correspondence on 
Thought without woaos between F. Max Müller and Francis 
Galten, the Duke of Argyll, G. J. Romanes and Others. Cloth, 
75c (3». 6d.) 

232. THREE LECTURES ON THE SCIENCE OF LANGUAGE. 

With a supplement. My PasDZCSssoas. F. Max Müller. Qoth, 
7SC. (38. 6d.) 

NAEGELI, CARL VON. 
300. A MECHANICOPHYSIOLOGICAL theory OF ORGANIC 
EVOLUTION. Carl von Nägeli, Qoth, 50c net. (2s. 6d. net) 

NOIRE, LUDWIG. 

297. ON the origin of language, and THE LOGOS THE- 
ORY. Ludwig Noiri, Cloth, 50c net. (28. 6d. net.) 



trSend for Complete Illustrated Catalogue,' 



TITLE LIST 



OLDENBERG, PROF. H. 

233. ANCIENT INDIA, Its Language and Religions. Prof, H, Olden- 

berg, Cloth, 50c net. (2s. 6d.) 

POWELL, J. W. 

265. TRUTH AND ERROR, or the Science of Intellection. /. W. 

Powell, $1.75. (78. 6d.) 

315. JOHN WESLEY POWELL: A Memorial to an American Ex- 
plorer and Scholar. Mrs. M, D. Lincoln. G. K, Gilbert, M. 
Baker and Paul Carus, Edited by G, K, Gilbert. Paper, 50c net. 

RADAU, DR. HUGO. 

294. THE CREATION STORY OF GENESIS I. A Sumerian Theog- 
ony and Cosmogony. H. Radau, Bds., 75c net. (3s. 6d. net!) 

RIBOT, TH. 

234. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ATTENTION. Th, Ribot. Cloth, 7SC. 

(3». 6d.) 

235. THE DISEASES OF PERSONALITY. Th, Ribot. Goth, 7Sc 

(3s. 6d.) 

236. THE DISEASES OF THE WILL. Th. Ribot, Transl. by Mer- 

win-Marie Snell, Cloth, 75c. (3s. 6d.) 
279. THE EVOLUTION OF GENERAL IDEAS. Th, Ribot. Transl. 
by France* A. Welby. Qoth, $1.25. (5s.) 

ROMANES, GEORGE JOHN. 

237. DARWIN AND AFTER DARWIN, An Exposition of the Dar- 

winian Theory and a Discussion of Post-Darwinian Questions. 
Oeorge John Romanes. Three volumes. $4.00 net. 

238. Part I. Thb Darwinian Theory. Qoth, $2.00. 

239. Part II. Post- Darwinian Questions: Heredity and 
Utility. Cloth, $1.50. 

252. Part III. Post-Darwinian Questions: Isolation and 
Physiological Selection. Cloth, $1.00. 

240. AN EXAMINATION OF WEISMANNISM. George John Ro- 
manes, Cloth, $1.00 net. 

214. A CANDID EXAMINATION OF THEISM. Physicus (the 
late G. J. Romanes). Cloth, $2.00. 

242. THOUGHTS ON RELIGION. The late G, J, Romanes. Edited 
by Charles Gore, Cloth, $1.25 net. 

ROW, T. SUNDARA. 
284. GEOMETRIC EXERCISES IN PAPER FOLDING. T. Sundara 
Row. Edited by W, W, Beman, and D, E, Smith, Illustrated. 
Cloth, $1.00 net. (4s. 6d. net.) 

RUTH, J. A. 

329. WHAT IS THE BIBLE? /. A, Ruth. 7Sc net. (3s. 6d. net.) 

SCHUBERT, HERMANN. 

266. MATHEMATICAL ESSAYS AND RECREATIONS. Prof. Her- 

mann Schubert, Transl. by T, J, McCormack, Cloth, 7 sc net. 
(3s. 6d. net.) 



ierSend for Complete Illustrated Cataloguc'^Sk 



OPEN COURT PUBLICATIONS 



SHUTE, D. KERFOOT. 
276, A FIRST BOOK IN ORGANIC EVOLUTION. D, Kerfoot 
Shute. Cloth» $2.00 net. (7s. 6d. net.) 

STANLEY, HIRAM M. 

274. PSYCHOLOGY FOR BEGINNERS. An Outline Sketch. Hiram 
M, Stanley, Boards, 40c net. (2s.) 

ST. ANSELM. 

324. ST. ANSELM: PROSLOGIUM; MONOLOGIUM; AN APPEN- 
DIX IN BEHALF OF THE FOOL, by Gaunilon; and CUR 
DEUS HOMO. Tranil. by 5*. N, Deane, Qoth, $1.00 net. 

STARR, FREDERICK. 

327. READINGS FROM MODERN MEXICAN AUTHORS. Fred- 

erick Starr, $1.25 net. (5s. 6d. net.) 

328. THE AINU GROUP AT THE SAINT LOUIS EXPOSITION. 

Frederick Starr, Illustrated. Boards, 75c net. (3s. 6d. net.) 

STRODE, MURIEL. 
333. MY LITTLE BOOK OF PRAYER. Muriel Strode, Boards, soc 

net. (2s. 6d. net.) 
333a. THE SAME. Cloth, $x.oo net. (48. 6d. net.) 

SUZUKI, TEITARO. 
283. ACVAGHOSHA'S DISCOURSE ON THE AWAKENING OF 
FAITH IN THE MAHAYANA. Translated by Teitaro Su- 
suku Cloth, $1.25 net. .(5s. net.) 

TOLSTOY, COUNT LEO. 

348. CHRISTIANITY AND PATRIOTISM with Pertinent Extracts 
from other Essays. Count Leo Tolstoy. Trans, by Paul Borger 
and others. Paper, 35c net, mailed 40c. 

TOPINARD, PAUL. 
269. SCIENCE AND FAITH, OR MAN AS AN ANIMAL, AND 
MAN AS A MEMBER OF SOCIETY, with a DISCUSSION 
OF ANIMAL SOCIETIES, by Paul Topinard. Transl. by T, 
J, McCormack, $1.50 net. (6s. 6d. net.) 

TRUMBULL, M. M. 

243. WHEELBARROW, Articles and Discussions on the Larok 
Question, including the Controversy with Mr. Lyman J. Gage 
on the Ethics of the Board of Trade; and also the Controversy 
with Hugh O. Pentecost and Others, on the Single Tax Ques- 
tion. Cloth, $1.00. (5s.) 

245. THE FREE TRADE STRUGGLE IN ENGLAND. M, M, Trum- 
bull. Ooth, 75c. (3s. 6d.) 

WAGNER, RICHARD. 
249. A PILGRIMAGE TO BEETHOVEN. A Novel by Richard Wag- 
ner, Transl. by O, W, Weyer, Boards, soc net. (2s. 6d.) 

WEISMANN, AUGUST. 

299. ON GERMINAL SELECTION, as a Source of definite Variation. 
August Weismann, Transl. by T. J, McCormack. Cloth, 60c 
net. (3s. net.) 



t^Send for Complete Illustrated Cataloguc^Sk 



10 . TITLE LIST 



WITHERS, JOHN WILLIAM. 
335. EUCLID'S PARALLEL POSTULATE; Its Natuw, Validity 
AND Place in Gkometkical Systems. /. W, JVither*» Ph. D,r 
Cloth, $1.25 net. (4s. 6d. net.) 

YPMADK KEICHYU. 

265. SCENES FROM THE LIFE OF BUDDHA. Reproduced from 
paintings by Prof, Keichyu Yamada,. $2.50 net. (i5s.> 

316. THE TEMPLES OF THE ORIENT AND THEIR MESSAGE 
IN THE LIGHT OF HOLY SCRIPTURE, Dante's Vision, and 
Bunjran's Allegory. By the author of *'Clear Round!" "Things 
Touching the iCing," etc. $4.00 



PORTRAITS AND ILLUSTRATIONS 

332a. FRAMING PORTRAIT OF HUGO DE VRIES. Platino finUh. 
10X12", unmounted. Postpaid, $1.00. (4s. 6d. net.) 

336. PORTFOLIO OF BUDDHIST ART. A collection of illustra- 
tions of Buddhism, Historical and Modem in portfolio. 50c net. 
(2s. 6d. net.) 

2oa. PHILOSOPHICAL AND PSYCHOLOGICAL PORTRAIT SE- 
RIES. 68 portraits on plate paper, $7.50 (35s.) per set 

202a. PHILOSOPHICAL PORTRAIT SERIES. 43 portraits on plate 
paper, $6.25 (30s.) Single portraits, on plate paper, 25c. (xs. 
6d.) 

202b. PSYCHOLOGICAL PORTRAIT SERIES. 25 portraiU on Japa- 
nese paper, $$.00 (248.) per set; plate psper, $3.75 (18s.) per 
set Smgle portraits, Japanese paper, 50c (2s. 6d.); single 
portraits, on plate paper, 25c (is. 6a.) 

SMITH, PROF. DAVID EUGENE. 

20JC PORTRAITS OF MATHEMATICIANS. Edited by Prof. D. B. 
Smith, 12 portraits on Imp. Jap. Vellum, $s*oo; ij portraits 
on Am. plate paper, $3.00. 



THE RELIGION OF SCIENCE LIBRARY 

THE RELIGION OF SCIENCE. Paul Carus. 25c maUed 30c. 
(IS. 6d.) 

THREE INTRODUCTORY LECTURES ON THE SCIENCE 
OF THOUGHT. F. Max MüiUr. With a correspondence on 
"Thought Without Words" between F. Max Müller and Francis 
Galton, the Duke of Argyll, Georgo J, Romanes and others. 
25c, mailed 29c. (is. 6d.) 

THREE LECTURES ON THE SCIENCE OF LANGUAGE. 
With My Prsdbcbssors. F. Max Müller, »sc, mailed 29c. 
(is. 6d.) 

THE DISEASES OF PERSONALITY. Prof. Th. Ribot. asc. 
mailed 29c. (is. 6d.) 



trSend for Complete Illustrated Catalogue.'msk 



OPEN COURT PUBUCATIONS 11 



5. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ATTENTION. Prof, Th. Ribot. asc, 

mailed age. (is. 6d.) 

6. THE PSYCHIC_LIFE OF MICRO-ORGANISMS. A Study in 

£xp«rime 
6d0 

7. THE NATURE OF THE STATE. Paul Conu, 15c. mailed 18c. 

(9d.) 

8. ON DOUBLE CONSCIOUSNESS. Experimental Psychological 

Studies. Alfred Binet, xs'c, mailed x8c. (pd.) 

9. FUNDAMENTAL PROBLEMS. The Method of Philosophy as 

a Systematic Arrangement of Knowledge. Paul Carus. 50c* 
mailed 6oc. (as. 6d.) 

10, DISEASES OF THE WILL. Prof. Th, Ribat, Tranal. by Mer- 
win-Marie Snell, 25c, mailed 29c. (is. 6d.) 

XI. ON THE ORIGIN OF LANGUAGE and the Logos Theory. L. 
Noiri. X5c, mailed x8c (is. 6d.) 

la. THE FREE TRADE STRUGGLE IN ENGLAND. Af . M, Trum- 
bull, 25c, mailed 31c (is. 6d.) 

13. WHEELBARROW^ ARTICLES AND DISCUSSIONS ON THE 

LABOR QUESTION, including the Controversv with Mr. Ly- 
man T. (iage on the Ethics of the Board of Trade; and also 
the Controversy with Mr. Hugh O. Pentecost, and others, on 
the Single Tax Question. 3 sc, mailed 43c. (as.) 

14. THE GOSPEL OF BUDDHA, According to Old Records told by 

Paul Carus, 35c mailed 4ac. (as.) 

15. PRIMER OF PHILOSOPHY. Paul Carus, asc, mailed 32c, 

(is. 6d.) 

x6. ON MEMORY AND THE SPECIFIC ENERGIES OF THE 
NERVOUS SYSTEM. Prof, E, Heriug. 15c. mailed 18c. (9d.) 

17. THE REDEMPTION OF THE BRAHMAN. A Novel. Richard 
Garbs, asc, mailed a8c. (xs. 6d.) 

x8. AN EXAMINATION OF WEISMANNISM. G, J, Romanes, 
35c, mailed 41c. (as.) 

19. ON GERMINAL SELECTION AS A SOURCE OF DEFINITE 
VARIATION. August Weismann, Transl. by T, J, McCor- 
mack, asc mailed a8c. (xs. 6d.) 

ao. LOVERS THREE THOUSAND YEARS A(K) as Indicated by 
Thk Song or Solomon. Rev, T, A, Goodwin, xsc mailed x8c. 
(9d.) 

a I. POPULAR SCIENTIFIC LECTURES. Professor Ernst Mach, 
Transl. by T, J, MeCormack, 50c mailed 60c. (as. 6d.) 

22, ANCIENT INDIA, ITS LANGUAGE AND RELIGIONS. Prof, 
H, Oldenberg, asc, mailed a8c. (xs. 6d.) 

a3. THE PROPHETS OF ISRAEL. Popular Sketches from Old 
Testament Histor^r. Prof, C, H, CornUl, Transl. by S, F, 
Corkran, asc, mailed 30c (xs. 6d.) 



rSend for Complete Illustrated Catalogue,^t 



12 TITLE LIST 



»4. HOMILIES OF SCIENCE. Paul Carus, 35c, mailed 43c (2s.) 

as. THOUGHTS ON RELIGION. The late G. /. Romanes. Edited 
by Charles Gore, 50c mailed 550. (2s. 6d.) 

26. THE PHILOSOPHY OF ANCIENT INDIA. Prof, R. Garbe. 

25c mailed 28c. (is. 6d.) 

27. MARTIN LUTHER. Gustav Freytag. Transl. by H. E. 0. 

Heinemann, 25c mailed 30c. (is. Bd.) 

28. ENGLISH SECULARISM. A Confession of Belief. George J. 

Holyoake. 25c, mailed 30c. (is. 6d.) 

29. ON ORTHOGENESIS AND THE IMPORTANCE OF NATU- 

RAL SELECTION IN SPECIES-FORMATION. Prof. Th. 
Eimer. Transl. by T. J. McCormack. 2sc, mailed 30. (is. 6d.) 

30. CHINESE PHILOSOPHY. An Exposition of the Main Char- 

acteristic Features of Chinese Thought. Dr, Paul Carus. 2SCt 
mailed 30c. (is. 6d.) 

31. THE LOST MANUSCRIPT. A Novel. Gustav Freytag. One 

volume. 6oCy mailed 80c. (3s.) 

32. A MECHANICO-PHYSIOLOGICIAL THEORY OF ORGANIC 

EVOLUTION. Carl von Nageli. 15c, mailed i8c (gd.) 

33. CHINESE FICTION. Rev. G. T. Candlin, Illustrated. 15c, 

mailed i8c. (gd.) 

34. MATHEMATICAL ESSAYS AND RECREATIONS. Prof. H. 

Schubert. Tr. by T. J. McCormack, 25c, mailed 30c (is. 6d.) 

35. THE ETHICAL PROBLEM. Three Lectures on Ethics as a 

Science. Paul Carus. 50c, mailed 6oc. (23. 6d.) 

36. BUDDHISM AND ITS CHRISTIAN CRITICS. Paul Carus. 

50C, mailed 58c. (2s. 6d.) 

37' PSYCHOLOGY FOR BEGINNERS. An Outline Sketch. Hiram 
M, Stanley. 20c, mailed 23c. (is.) 

38. DISCOURSE ON THE METHOD OF RIGHTLY CONDUCT- 

ING THE REASON, AND SEEKING TRUTH IN THE 
SCIENCES. Ren4 Descartes. Transl. by Prof. John Veitch, 
2 sc, mailed 29c. (is. 6d.) 

39. THE DAWN OF A NEW RELIGIOUS ERA and other Essays. 

Paul Carus. isc mailed i8c. (pd.) 

40. KANT AND SPENCER, a Study of the Fallacies of Agnosti- 

cism. Paul Carus. 20c, mailed 25c. (is.) 

41. THE SOUL OF MAN, an Investigation of the Facts of Physio 

logicsd and Experimental Psychology. Paul Carus. 75c, mailed 
8sc. (3s. 6d.) 

42. WORLD'S CONGRESS ADDRESSES, Delivered by the Presi- 

dent, the Hon, (^. C. Bonney. 15c, mailed 20c (9d.) 

43. THE GOSPEL ACCORDING TO DARWIN. Woods Hutchinson. 

50c, mailed 57c (2s. 6d.) 

44. WHENCE AND WHITHER. The Nature of the Soul, Its 

Origin and Destiny. Paul Carus. 25c, mailed 32c. (is. 6d.) 



S3rSend for Complete Illustrated Catalogue.'^ 



OPEN COURT PUBLICATIONS 13 



45. AN ENQUIRY CONCERNING HUMAN UNDERSTANDING. 

David Hume. 25c, mailed 31c. (is. 6d.) 

46. AN ENQUIRY CONCERNING THE PRINCIPLES OF MOR 

ALS. David Hume, 350, mailed 31c. (is. 6d.) 

47. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF REASONING, Based on Experimental 

Researches in Hypnotism. Alfred Binet, Transl. by Adam 
Cowans Whyte, 25c, mailed 31c (is. 6d.) 

48. A TREATISE CONCERNING THE PRINCIPLES OF HUMAN 

KNOWLEDGE. George Berkeley, 250, mailed 31c (is. 6d.) 

49. THREE DIALOGUES BETWEEN HYLAS AND PHILONOUS. 

George Berkeley. 25c, mailed 30c. (is. 6d.) 

so. PUBLIC WORSHIP, A STUDY IN THE PSYCHOLOGY OF 
RELIGION. John P. Hylan. 250, mailed 29c. (is. 6d.) 

51. THE MEDITATIONS AND SELECTIONS FROM THE PRIN- 

CIPLES of Reni Descartes. Transl. by Prof. John Veitch. 
35c, mailed 42c. (2s.) 

52. LEIBNIZ: DISCOURSE ON METAPHYSICS, CORRESPOND- 

ENCE WITH ARNAULD and MONADOLOGY, with an In- 
troduction by Paul Janet. Transl. by Dr. G. R. Montgomery. 
50c, mailed 58c. (2s. 6d.) 

53. KANT'S PROLEGOMENA to any Future Metaphysics. Edited 

by Dr. Paul Carus. soc, mailed 59c. (2s. 6d.) 

54 ST. ANSELM: PROSLOGIUM; MONOLOGIUM; AN APPEN 
DIX ON BEHALF OF THE FOOL, by Gaunilon; and CUR 
DEUS HOMO. Tr. by S. N. Deane. soc, mailed 60c. (2s. 6d.) 

55. THE CANON OF REASON AND VIRTUE (Lao-Tzk's Tag Tkh 

King). Translated from the Chinese by Paul Carus. 2sc, 
mailed 28c. (is. 6d.) 

56. ANTS AND SOME OTHER INSECTS, an Inquiry into the 

Psychic Powers of these Animals, with an Appendix on the 
Peculiarities of Their Olfactory Sense. Dr. August Forel. 
Transl. by Prof. W. M. Wheeler, soc, mailed S3c. (2s. 6d.) 

57. THE METAPHYSICAL SYSTEM OF HOBBES, as conUined 

in twelve chapters from his "Elements of Philosophy Concern- 
ing Body," and in briefer Extracts from his ''Human Nature^' 
and "Leviathan," selected by Mary Whiton Calkins. 40c, 
mailed 47c. (2s.) 

58. LOCKE'S ESSAYS CONCERNING HUMAN UNDERSTAND- 

ING. Books II and IV (with omissions). Selected by Mary 
WhUon Calkins, soc, mailed 60c. (2s. 6d.) 

59. THE PRINCIPLES OF DESCARTES' PHILOSOPHY. Bene- 

dictus de Spinoza. Introduction by Halbert Hains Britan, Ph. 
D. Paper t 3 sc net, mailed 42c. 



THE OPEN COURT PUBLISHING CO. 
1322 Wabash Avenne, Chicago 

London : Eegan Paul, Trench, Trubner & Co., Ltd. 
t^Send for Complete Illustrated Catalogue. "msk 



^THE OPEN COURTS 

An Illustrated Monthly Magazine 

Devoted to the Science of Beliffion, The 
Religion of Science and the Extension 
of The Religious Parliament Idea 

THE OPEN COURT is a popular 
magazine discussing the deepest 
questions of life. It offers the 
maturest thought in the domains of 
Religion, Philosophy, Psychology, Evo- 
lution and kindred subjects. 

THE OPEN COURT contains articles 
on the recent discoveries of Babylonian 
and Egyptian excavations, on Old 
Testament Research, the Religion of 
the American Indians, Chinese culture, 
Brahmanism, Buddhism, Mithraism — 
in short anything that will throw light 
on the development of religion and 
especially on Christianity. 

THE OPEN COURT investigates the 
problems of God and Soul, of life and 
death and immortality, of conscience, 
duty, and the nature of morals, the 
ethics of political and social life — 
briefly all that will explain the bottom 
facts of Religion and their practical 
significance. The illustrations though 
artistic are instructive and frequently 
reproduce rare historical pictures. 



HFC 8 ^^?ft 



